http://www.blavatnikarchive.org/blog/a68d6619-7aa7-4b58-8916-0016b28937f9
	Moltke disliked the Schlieffen Plan and severely altered it by making two critical decisions. The first critical change Moltke made was removing two of his armies that were supposed to push through Belgium and placing them in another area to counter the expected French invasion. But this wasn’t a decision made based on military strategy but on pride. Moltke felt that it would be unacceptable and disgraceful to allow French troops onto German soil. The original plan would have allowed the French invasion since it would have been a small sacrifice and would concentrate a large faction of the French Army in the South while 90% of the German Army would push through Belgium and storm France.

	This change proved to be disastrous because Moltke decided to use scorched earth tactics to intimidate the Belgians in order to keep up with the Schlieffen Plan timetable. Not only did Moltke anger the Belgian people, but he also inspired rebellion movements that managed to hold out long enough until British reinforcements showed up. The Belgian Army managed to fight the Germans for 13 weeks with support from the British and reduced the might of their army. Because of his actions Moltke and his troops had to retreat. To make things worse German commanders decided to waive the plan of attacking France at its undefended rear and decided to make a full-frontal attack on the Franco-German border. This was one of the gravest mistake of the war because the full frontal attack began where the line was heavily protected by the French.


Moltke decides to Attack France where they are most heavily defended instead of rear for suspicious reasons, then apparently decides to piss off Belgian's, ruining the Germany's chances further.

	Moltkes second slew of mistakes began with his strategic failures during the Battle of Marne. After the German Armies had successfully made their way through Belgium, they began their advance to Paris and aimed to cut a large portion of the French Army off from the coastlines. The German Army was making good progress until a strategic error early in the campaign would eventually derail any hopes of winning the Battle of the Marne. Moltkes managed to do the unthinkable, he had lost command over his armies! The lack of communication became obvious when the offensives of both armies fell out of synch and opened up a gap near Paris that the British Forces and the French exploited. As a result, the 2nd German Army was in grave danger of being destroyed and the field commanders thought it was best to avoid an encirclement. They then retreated to a more favorable positioning which forced their other comrades to fend for themselves. Moltkes could no longer encircle Paris by flanking nor control his men. Not only did the Battle of the Marne successfully stop the advancement of German troops, it also created the trench warfare system that WWI is known for.


apparently Moltke loses control of his armies, screws up battle of Marne and invents trench warfare



------


http://www.history.com/topics/world-war-i/first-battle-of-marne
	The First Battle of the Marne was fought to the north and east of Paris in early September 1914. The opportunity opened for Anglo-French forces to reverse the hitherto victorious German advance through Belgium and France when First Army commander Heinrich von Kluck, who anchored the right wing of the German advance, swung north, rather than west, of Paris, across the front of Michel-Joseph Maunoury’s French Sixth Army.


why did he do that

	...The British Expeditionary Force (BEF) rallied together with elements of the French Fifth Army to surge into the breach von Kluck had opened in the German front. The tenacious defense of Ferdinand Foch’s Ninth Army in the St.-Gond marshes against repeated attacks of the German Second and Third Armies frustrated German attempts to dislocate the French thrust by collapsing Joffre’s right wing. 


did the battle help Ferdinand Foch too?


	...The Anglo-French victory had been due in part to the fact that the Germans had outrun their logistics and their heavy artillery, used to crushing advantage in earlier battles. Moltke, whose command style has been compared to that of an orchestral conductor whose players disregarded his baton, lost control of his army commanders.


how did he lose control of his commanders?


from taylor:

	Moltke had hoped to knock France out of the war within six weeks and then throw the whole combined weight of the German and Austrian armies against Russia. His own errors of judgment and failure of nerve—he had weakened his striking force in the west to bolster the hard-pressed eastern front—helped to cheat him of the victory that was in his grasp. Stolid as an ox—and hardly more imaginative—the French commander-in-chief, General Joseph Joffre, retreated as best he could under the sledgehammer blows of the enemy, then sensing a slackening, lowered his head and butted back. The three-day French counterattack (September 6-9) on the Marne and along the Nancy-Verdun front, brilliantly improvised by Joffre’s subordinate commanders, shivered the German offensive.



so basically saying the same thing--he screws up the plan, then screws up the execution




------

https://www.britannica.com/biography/Helmuth-Johannes-Ludwig-von-Moltke
	He allowed several army commanders on the German left wing to attack into France instead of remaining on the defensive. Moreover, he reinforced these attacks with divisions taken from the crucial right wing and then sent several more divisions to the Eastern Front to check the Russian advance into East Prussia. The German high command lost touch with the advancing armies of the right wing, and the movements of that wing’s constituent units became disjointed. These and other factors culminated not only in the right wing failing to encircle the French left but becoming itself the victim of a French and British flank attack that halted the entire German offensive at the Battle of the Marne (Sept. 6–12, 1914). Moltke’s mood became more and more despairing during this time, and he finally abdicated responsibility completely. On Sept. 14, 1914, Emperor William II replaced Moltke as chief of staff, though he retained nominal command until the end of the year. A speedy victory in the west had eluded Germany’s grasp, and within a few months of the Battle of the Marne the Western Front had settled down to the murderous and static trench warfare that was to persist unabated for almost three years. Moltke died a broken man less than two years later.



how did he abdicate and get replaced


------


http://www.dw.com/en/moltke-the-fallen-chief-of-staff/a-17523361
	Relations between Moltke and Wilhelm remained distant through the years leading up to the war, and they were severed completely on the day the conflict began, when Wilhelm issued the order to halt the mobilization against France and send all units to Russia - a move Moltke himself would soon reverse.


what would have happened otherwise? French sneak-attack?

iirc this was only because Grey mislead Lichnowsky


	..."The worst still awaits us," he prophesied on September 4, 1914, exactly one day before the French and British began what would become the Battle of the Marne. The Germans were forced to retreat, which effectively ended their plans for a quick advance through French territory and forced them into a war on two fronts.

	Moltke was responsible for the failure, a blow that garnered him further disapproval from the emperor and one that would eventually cost him his career and his health. The 66-year-old suffered a mental breakdown, and six weeks after the outbreak of war, Germany lost its top commander. Against his wishes, Moltke was replaced by the Minister of War, Erich von Falkenhayn. Officially, he was relieved due to complications with his liver and gall bladder. However, even the German propaganda apparatus wasn't able to veil the disaster that had visited the army just two months into the war. The failure of the chief of the staff, as well, simply couldn't be cloaked. Two years after his release, Helmuth von Moltke died of a stroke.


apparently, the failure was a big deal and Moltke was clearly to blame.



------


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Helmuth_von_Moltke_the_Younger
	Although earlier in the campaign, German generals and the press had been proclaiming the campaign as good as won, on 4 September, Moltke was found despondent that the lack of prisoners meant that the Germans had not yet really won a decisive victory.[6]:186–7 Moltke may well have been overly preoccupied with the unsuccessful German offensive in Lorraine, and he issued no orders to the First, Second and Third Armies between 2 and 5 September whilst the Battle of the Marne was in progress.[6]:192

	Following the German retreat from the Marne, Moltke allegedly reported to the Kaiser, "Your Majesty, we have lost the war."[7]

   		Whether General von Moltke actually said to the Emperor, "Majesty, we have lost the war," we do not know. We know anyhow that with a prescience greater in political than in military affairs, he wrote to his wife on the night of the 9th, "Things have not gone well. The fighting east of Paris has not gone in our favour, and we shall have to pay for the damage we have done".
   		 — Churchill

------


https://archive.org/details/LudendorffErich-DasMarne-drama-DerFallMoltke-hentsch

Ludendorff wrote an essay "The Marne Drama--the Fall of Moltke"


sounds like there is more to this

from Annikka's biography of Moltke, pg 262:

	Ludendorff's post-war publication *Das Marne-Drama - Der Fall Moltke-Hentsch* (The Drama of the Marne - the Moltke-Hentsch Case) is a good example of a typical anti-Moltke account, and as such deserves attention. During Moltke's lifetime, Ludendorff and Moltke had been on friendly terms, and had collaborated closely in the years following Ludendorff's appointment in 1908. They had also been fellow conspirators against Falkenhayn during the early months of the latter's tenure as Cheif of Staff. In his publication Ludendorff explained that his change of attitude towards Moltke was due to 'my realization of the seriousness of the circumstances. ...Not in order to devalue the army, but in in honour of the old army and as a warning to coming generations, do I lay a finger on the wound that is Moltke.'

	While Ludendorff's portrayal of Moltke's character is interesting, he is not a reliable witness. His post-war writings are marred by his obsession with the 'secret forces of freemasonry' on which he ultimately blamed the loss of the war. THus, in Ludendorff's opinion, Moltke was subjected to 'secret powers', and Hentsch was almost certainly a freemason--implicit proof, Ludendorff alleged, that Hentsch had deliberately oversepped his authority and ruined Germany's chances of victory. In the 1930s, such allegations were only too gladly taken up, when Jews and freemasons were blamed for stabbing the 'undefeated' German army in the back. Of all the interpretations of the Hentshc Mission, this is without doubt the furthest from the truth, and Ludendorff's allegations and conspiracy theories cannot be taken seriously. Ludendorff emphasized Moltke's connection with Rudolf Steiener, and particularly Eliz von Moltke's influence on her husband's Anthroposophical and 'occult' beliefs.


From Herwig "Cilo Deceieved:"

		Last but not least, attention should be drawn to several attempts to suppress or to "revise" memoirs after the First World War. One of the most celebrated cases involved General Helmuth von Moltke the Younger. The former Chief of the General Staff had died in 1916, and his widow with the assistance of Rudolf Steiner, the founder of anthroposophy, had prepared by the spring of 1919 a detailed memoir that promised to shed light on Moltke's role before and during the July crisis. Before the book could go to press, however, Eliza von Moltke was paid a visit by "certain persons" who advised her not to publish her husband's papers. Stiener, in turn, was informed by the Prussian envoy at Stuttgart, Legation Secretary Hans Adolf von Moltke (!), that "Berlin did not desire" General von Moltke's memoirs in print; an unnamed general, who had served both Wilhelm II and Moltke, also sought out Steiner to caution against publication of the book. These efforts were successful, and the Erinnerungen eventually put out by Eliza von Moltke in 1922 proved devoid of any information on the origins of the war.


back to Annika:

	He alleged that 'strangely enough, the importance of his wife ... in this is underrated and never emphasized'. Ludendorff's allegation that Eliza von Moltke had assured her husband, even before her arrival in Koblenz, that 'the whole operation of the Germany Army would end unhappily, according to Lisbeth Seidler [a spiritualist medium]', is important particularly in the context of Moltke's alleged pessimistic tendencies.


Moltke superstitious?

	
	Such warnings, if they were really given, might indeed have influenced his decision-making in the crucial days of September. Whether they actually occurred is impossible to affirm. In terms of creating a particular post-war image of Moltke, however, the importance of Ludendorff's account cannot be rated too highly.


hmmmm


	Whateer the truth behind Ludendorff's allegations, Eliza von Moltke's role and influence should certainly not be underestimated. Not only did she accompany her husband to the headquarters in Koblenz, but she also went along when the headquarters were moved to Luxembourg, apparently as a nurse, for whom Ludendorff claims Moltke had good use. The medium Lisbeth Siedler [the so-called 'Heeres-Sybille'] was allegedly also present as a nurse. Ludendorff maintains that Rudolf Steiner had also arrived in Koblenz, 'to increase the influencing of General v. Moltke.' Steiner and Moltke did indeed meet in August 1914, when Steiner was staying in Niederlahnstein near Koblenz, and Moltke visited him there on 26 August. However, Ludendorff's phrasing suggests more influence than Steiner actually had at the time, and his views have given credence to the widely held assumption that Moltke was in some way under Steiner's spell during those crucial first weeks of the war.


this Stiener guy might be worht looking into

same with Siedler and Ludendorff's wife


	Ludendorff dates Moltke's 'loss of nerve' to even before the Battle of Marne. During a brief stay in the General Headquarters on 22 August, he claims to have noticed that Moltke had 'completely lost his nerve.' At that date Plessen, a more reliable witness, considered Moltke still to have been in control of events. Plessen detected a worsening of Moltke's condition only *after* the retreat on the Marne. Admiral von Muller, who was alert to mood swings, also did not record that Moltke was deteriorating as early as Ludendorff suggests. With hindsight at least, however, the image of Moltke that contemporaries remembered was that of a nervous man who was increasingly losing control, and such accounts are certainly true following the Battle of Marne.


was Moltke "losing his nerve" before the battle of Marne too? his letters to his wife are odd.

	
	Major Mews recalled a striking image of the Chief of Staff:

		The nervousness of the General was displayed outwardly, particularly in that he walked ceaselessly up and down the room and exhaled with a whistling sound through his teeth. Within the General Staff there was the general point of view that General von Moltke was unequal to his great task on account of his physical condition, and that he let the heads of departments do as they pleased.

	Followng the fatefule events on the Marne, Motke suffered something resembling a nerouvs breakdown. Contemporary accounts confirm this impression. During the fateful events, 'Moltke was reported to have been terribly agitated and had been quite harsh (*grob*) in his excitement. His wife! [sic] had continualy remained in the roomm next door in order to be able to calm him.' Hermann von Santen recorded the following image in his diary on 10 September, following a conversation that he witnessed between Moltke and another officer, in which Moltke outlined the need to withdraw troops even further. Santen's vivid description deserves to be quoted at length:

		The condition of the Cheif of the German General Staff is disheartening (nie-dershmetternd): he is the image of a man whose nerves have completely crumbled. His excitement is such that he is unable to point on the map to the position that the army is now to hold. His trembling finger oscillates wildly on the map. Obserstletnant Hasse has trouble understanding the new order for the army from the words wich are uttered with such strong emotion. To [Moltke's] visible relief (*Berhhigung*) [Hasse] aures him repeatedly that he would deal with everything else through direct contact with the two neighbouring armies, and soon after the Chief of the German General Staff leaves us to conintue on to the Fourth AOK. I am glad to know that there were only a ew witnesses to this spectacle, which was far from uplifting. My Prussian pride has received another blow.

	At the end of August, Moltke had given Plessen the impression of a man in control of events, even a man who made decisions single-handedly. THus the latter record on 29 Augut how he was being beseeched to ensure that the general headquarters was not moved to Luxembourg because of possible danger to the Kaiser. Plessen noted: 'It was not I who chose this place, but Moltke, who is doing everything himself --and a good thing, too, in war-time.' As Plessen explained to Haeften after the war, the choice of military headquarters was always the Chief of Staff's domain. When a move to Luxembourg was suggested by Moltke, the Channcellor, the Foreign Secretary and the Cheif of the Civil Cabient expressed serious oobjections, because the population's attitude culd not be gauged, and because his Majesty's safety might be endagered. They suggested Trier as a possible alternative. Ultimately, however, it was Moltke's choice that was decisive.


what's up with Plessen? is he trustworthy? why did Moltke want to move the general headquarters to Luxemberg?


pg 266: on Sept 12 (last day of battle of Marne) Kaiser says Moltke was nervous. The Kaiser wanted Falkenhayn to assist him, but Pleseen disagreed with this (openly to the Kaiser? not sure)

	...Later that day, however, Moltke was to lose control completely. Plessen went to see him, urged by the Kaiser to check on his condition and to find out what Moltke thought of the recently received news that the First and Second Armies had again been attacked by the enemy. Plessen recorded:

		[At] 10 p.pm I find him in his hotel, in the large dining room, which is completely filled with General Staff officers - at a small table with his wife (!!!) [sic], who unfortunately followed him here, too. . . . M[oltke] was very excited, nervous and very pessimistic, I stayed with him until 12 o'clock and tried to calm him ...


Do Plessen and Annika call attention to his wife specifically? Not sure but something seems off about that--if his wife was in some sort of conspriacy to throw Marne (as Ludendorff implies), why would they need to stop her from publishing his memoirs?

	For Moltke, the Marne was more than the first set-back in the hitherto victorious German campaign--it was his personal defeat. Voices demanding his dismissal, which had made themselves heard in influential places even before the disaster,


who? why?

	
	now found willing listeners, especially as it was easier to blame Moltke for the turn of events than address other possible shortcomings. Muller recorded on 14 September: 'Apparently the news has been received from the General Staff that things cannot go on with Moltke, while Moltke himself is of a different opinion. Lyncker should convince him.' Lyncker had asked Falkenhayn as early as 10 August if he were willing to replace Moltke.


Lyncher one of the "early critics" of Moltke?

	
	...When, in the aftermath of defeat, the Chief of the General Staff suffered a nervous breakdown, Lyncker's and Falkenhayn's time had come and they succeeded in convincing the Kaiser that Moltke should be replaced. Plessen recorded on 14 September:

		Big crisis in the evening. The Chief of the Military Cabinet Lyncker and his head of dept. Marschall urged H.M. - without my knowledge - immediately before dinner, to dismiss Moltke and to entrust the Minister of War, Falkenhayn with the business of Cheif of the General Staff of the Field Army. H.M. agreed straight away.


Was Plessen upset by this? not sure, but sounds like it--calls it a "big crisis" and points out they acted "without my knowledge."

	
	At the same time Moltke's deputy, Hermann von Stein, was demoted to commander of the Fourteenth Reserve Corps. Officially, Falkenhayn took over Stein's position, although in reality he replaced the Chief of the General Staff. Muller commented on 14 September that Stein's disappearance from the General Staff 'is being greeted with joy by many.' Apparently, Moltke had already excluded the unpopular Stein from military decision-making. Stein took revenge on Moltke by travelling to the front without orders and arranging troop movements without authorization.


doubtful of this characteriztion--if Moltke was doing a bad job, that enough would be reason for his subordinates to try to take things into their own hands


	Personal animosities and the wish for revenge superseded the overall concern for the war effort in some quarters-an astonishing lack of professionalism in the acclaimed German leadership. As will be seen, the intrigues against Moltke's successor Falkenhayn display a similar preoccuptation with personal advancement.


doubtful of this too. Falkenhayn and "intrigues" targetting him might be worth looking into. If there were a conspiracy of pro-German and pro-Bolshevik (or pro-Okhrana or whatever you'd call them) officials vying for power, power-struggles like this could illuminate which people were on which side.


------


http://www.perseus.ch/PDF-Dateien/MoltkeIntroduction.pdf
	It is precisely in this direction that Rudolf Steiner took action after Moltkes death in 1916 and before the final proclamation of the so called peace treaty of Versailles. Steiners endeavours in this direction were based on the ‹Reflections and Memories› of Moltke which he wrote down in November 1914, immediately after his dismissal by the Kaiser from the post of Chief of the General Staff (see next heading). Moltke wrote these memories for his wife, without any intention of ever publishing them. In 1919 Eliza von Moltke consented to a publication by Steiner. Steiner wrote a forword and published the memories under the title ‹Who was to blame for the War? Thoughts and Recollections of the Chief of Staff H. v. Moltke on the events of July 1914 to November 1914.›

	Steiner first of all wished the Germans to have clear ideas about the outbreak of the War. He beginns his forword with the words: ‹The German people must confront the truth about the outbreak of the war.› And he considered the memories of Moltke as ‹the most important document to be found in Germany on the beginnings of war›.



Did Steiner know framing Moltke's memoirs this way created a pretext for the German government to censor it?


	Moltkes memories show that in the years leading up to the war, and quite particularly on the 1st of August 1914, Germany's political leadership had reached an absolute ‹nadir›, as Steiner puts it. Had this little publication appeared in time it would undoubtetdly have had a very significant influence on the progress of the peace negotiations in Versailles. It would, above all, have been of cardinal importance in the forming of a judgement on the question of who was to blame for the outbreak of war. One has only to think of the extent to which the fatal paragraph 231 of the Versailles treaty which attributed sole blame to Germany, provoked and contributed to the rise of right wing forces in post war Germany to give due importance to the impact the prevention ot its publication had on the history of the twentieth century.

	As soon as the brochure was printed, an impatient anthroposophist handed it on prematurely (see document Nr. 66 on page 250f and note to it). Thus it was immediately in the hands of Germany's military leadership. Its publication was then prevented primarily by General Wilhelm von Dommes who intervened at the end of May 1919 on behalf of the Supreme Command and the German Foreign Office with the widow of Moltke and then with Rudolf Steiner as the publisher of Moltkes notes. In the course of an interview with Steiner in Stuttgart which lasted several hours von Dommes made the point that there were three factual errors in Moltke's notes, and that they could therefore not be published.Dommes declared that he was prepared testify to the erronneosness of the the three points on oath. If Steiner would have gone on and published the broschure anyway and sent it to Versailles he would have made himself publicly ridiculous – by trying to defend Germany without the backing of its own military and political leadership. Thus he had to give in.

seems iffy

	In reality those around the Kaiser were anxious to avoid exposing to the whole world the pathetic house of cards which German politics had become – in contrast to its British counterpart which rested on incomparably firmer foundations!


Is that how some of them think of it? Using the war the spread better forms of government? Wanting to free people from tyranny is a good thing, but that's not the right way to go about it...


	...Only recently von Dommes' diaries have come to light in which he sets out in detail the conversation which he had with Steiner in the spring of 1919. The relevant passages are published on page • of this book.


von Dommes was the guy who came over to "convince" Stiener not to publish Moltkes memiors. Apparently, there were 3 specific passages that he considered damaging. Dommes diary is published and in this book, but he doesn't seem like a trustworthy source anyway. The diary might be useful as part of an idictmnet of von Dommes.



------

Google search shows a mention of Seidler in Moltke's notes:

http://archive.is/AeP1b

	Helmuth von Moltkes Aufzeichnungen vom November 1914 über die .... Nie hat sie vorher etwas gehört von einer Lisbeth Seidler oder einer Heeres-Sybille

	Helmuth von Moltke's notes of November 1914 on the .... She never heard of a Lisbeth Seidler or an Army Sybille before


although it doesn't show up in the text (http://www.menschenkunde.com/pdf/RSteiner/rudolf_steiner_die_schuld_am_kriege.pdf). Maybe a fluke. But still--what did Moltke think of Seidler? impression I get is he believed some weird shit

or I spelled it wrong... appears in a footnote


passage that footnote refers to is:

	Neun Tage vor der Marne-Schlacht war es - in der Zeit der größten Erfolge des deutschen Heeres. Aus den Publikationen der Generäle Dommes und Tappen, die ja am besten wußten, wie die Dinge damals standen, geht hervor, daß Herr v. Moltke in diesen Tagen die Führung voll in der Hand hatte. Ihn abhängig wissen zu wollen von einer Heeres-Sybille ist eine Schmach, die man in verantwortungslosester Weise seinem Gedächtnis antut*).

	Nine days before the Marne battle it was-in the time of the greatest success of the German army. From the publications of the generals Dommes and Tappen, who knew best how things were at that time, it appears that Herr v. Moltke had the lead full hand in these days. Desiring to be dependent on an Army Sybille is a disgrace which is done in a most irresponsible manner to his memory.


footnote is:

	Nebenbei gesagt ist der Schreiberin dieser Zeilen, der engsten Mitarbeiterin Rudolf Steiners, der Name Lisbeth Seidler zum ersten Male entgegengetreten in jenen - mit Respekt zu vermelden - Berichten des 8 Uhr Abendblattes. Nie hat sie vorher etwas gehört von einer Lisbeth Seidler oder einer Heeres-Sybill.

	By the way, the writer of these lines, the closest collaborator of Rudolf Steiner, the name of Lisbeth Seidler for the first time opposed the reports of 8 o'clock in the evening with respect. Never before has she heard anything of a Lisbeth Seidler or an Army Sybill.


ok, these are *not* Moltke's notes. Looks like they are by Marie Steiner (pg 4):

	introduction
	(Marie Steiner)
	Helmuth von Moltke and Rudolf Steiner
	From: "The Goetheanum," 12th ed., No. 10, 5.
	March 1933.


according to here: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Marie_Steiner-von_Sivers

Marie Steiner, Rudolf Steiner's wife, helped him develop his bullshit mysticism philosophy. I guess these writings are on the relationship between her husband and Moltke.


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=de&u=https://waldorfblog.files.wordpress.com/2014/03/martins_die-nazistischen-sc3bcnden-der-dornacher_-hans-bc3bcchenbacher_-vortrag-1.pdf&prev=search
	At this point, the national socialist struggle against political opponents was already far advanced. Also old Steinergegner like Erich Ludendorff and Gregor Schwartz- Bostunitsch tries to denounce anthroposophy as undeutsch and jewish. Marie Steiner- of Sivers gave the insult as "Jewish" back to the Ludendorffs and cursed her as "Supporter of the old Yahweh principle". 19 She saw something irrevocable in the "slogans" Proof ... for his [Steiner's] standing higher than other people. "She guessed behind the right attacks on Steiner lies, "the first by the Jewish left press" into the world and inspired by demonic powers. 


some weird things going on with Marie Steiner, gets into fued with Ludendorffs, might be anti-semitic. 




from intro to her booklet:

	Einige auf Sensation ausgehende Zeitungen haben anläßlich des Todes eines spiritistischen Mediums und der Aufführung des Dramas «Die Marneschlacht» von Cremers sich selbst überboten im Auftischen von Schmähungen, Verzerrungen, Verunglimpfungen. Sie wirbeln durcheinander, derb unverfroren, aber mit umso größerer Arglist, das Trivialste und das Höchste, groteske Auswüchse einer dekadenten Salon-Kultur mit dem ernstesten Zeitenschicksal, die tiefste Tragik des Deutschtums mit albernen feuilletonistischen Knalleffekten. Was tut's, wenn nur die Blätter gut gehen, das Geschäft gemacht wird, gegen die unliebsame Partei ein wie gehofft vernichtender Schlag geführt wird, und die bedeutsamste geistige Persönlichkeit der jüngsten Vergangenheit, Rudolf Steiner, dadurch noch einmal in seiner Wirkung unschädlich gemacht werden könnte. Was kümmert's die Revolverpresse, wenn sie Zur im Unflat wühlen und das ihr nicht Passende zertreten kann, in welcher Weise sie dadurch das Ansehen der Presse als solcher schädigt, das Ansehen des Journalisten-Standes, ies Deutschtums überhaupt, das niemals das Wort prostituieren dürfte, und das in der ihm durch den Frieden von Versailles auferlegten Demütigung sich darauf besinnen sollte, wie stark es dem Geiste untreu geworden war, wie sehr es seine ureigenste Aufgabe vergessen hat, um endlich im Reiche des der äußeren Machtentfaltung dienenden Lügenspiels, Politik genannt, Schiffbruch zu erleiden. 

	A few sensational newspapers, on the occasion of the death of a spiritistic medium and the performance of the drama "The Marnschacht" by Cremers, surpassed themselves in the table of abuse, distortions, and slurs. 

"I can't believe the LYING MAINSTREAM MEDIA"

I think she's saying the media is lying about Rudolf Steiner (he died 1925)

	They are whirling through each other, unbroken, but with all the more arrogance, the most trivial and the supreme, the grotesque excesses of a decadent salon culture with the most serious tragedy, the deepest tragedy of Germanism with silly, feuilletonistic popping effects. What if the papers are going well, the business is being done, the unwelcome party is hurriedly destroyed, and Rudolf Steiner, the most important intellectual personality of the recent past, could be made harmless in his effect. What does the revolver press worry about when it is able to crumble into the unflatter and to crush what is not fit to it, in which way it damages the reputation of the press as such, the reputation of the journalist class, that of Germanism at all, which should never prostitute the word, and that in the humiliation imposed upon him by the peace of Versailles should be conscious of how untroubled it had been to the spirit, how much it has forgotten its very own task, and, finally, a shipwreck in the realm of the lie-game, to suffer.


sounds like she wanted to shoot down some negative press targeting her husband


this is the full passage with the quote about Siedler:

	Der gradlinig denkende und verantwortungsvoll fühlende Herr v Moltke stand beim Ausbruch des Krieges einer versagenden Politik gegenüber, Intrigen umspielten ihn, er stieß überall auf Widerstände an. Und doch war der Stolz Deutschlands, das Heer, das Werk seiner jahrelangen Bemühungen und liebend strengen Pflichttreue. Es wird ihm vorgeworfen, daß er sich für Weltanschauungsfragen interessierte. Eine verpönte Beschäftigung für den verantwortungsvollen Lenker von Völkergeschicken! Und er hat das Verbrechen begangen, Freundschaft und Verehrung zu empfinden für die bedeutendste Kapazität auf diesem Gebiete, Gespräche zu führen über solche dem Militärwesen fern liegende Dinge, wie Philosophie und Metaphysik. Das hätte er sogar gewagt während seines siegreichen Vormarsches im August 1914: ihn verlangte einmal nach Stärkung seiner Seele und Entspannung der Nerven im freundschaftlichen Gespräch mit einem weisen und gütigen Menschen! Neun Tage vor der Marne-Schlacht war es in der Zeit der größten Erfolge des deutschen Heeres. Aus den Publikationen der Generäle Dommes und Tappen, die ja am besten wußten, wie die Dinge damals standen, geht hervor, daß Herr v Moltke in diesen Tagen die Führung voll in der Hand hatte. Ihn abhängig wissen zu wollen von einer Heeres-Sybille ist eine Schmach, die man in verantwortungslosester Weise seinem Gedächtnis antut * ). In den Schriften Rudolf Steiners aber liegen unzählige Beweise dafür vor, daß er das mediale Wesen auf das schärfste ablehnte und immer wieder darauf hinwies, daß mediale Kundgebungen nur in das Chaos und in die Abstumpfung führen können. Am 1. September, also fünf Tage vor der Marne-Schlacht, hielt Rudolf Steiner an seinem Wohnort, in Berlin, einen Vortrag über Menschenund Völkerschicksale. Er ist erschienen in dem Zyklus «Zeitbetrachtungen» von der Pflicht der Opferwilligkeit sprach er und von der Siegeszuversicht des geistigen Lebens, von der kraftvollen Gelassenheit, durch die der Geist ein wirksames Werkzeug im menschlichen Helfen werden kann.


	Herr Moltke, who was straight-thinking and responsible, was opposed to a failing policy at the outbreak of the war; intrigues were playing around him; he encountered resistance everywhere.

she says Moltke's war policy was good but "intrigues" were screwing him up

	And yet the pride of Germany, the army, was the work of his years of endeavors and loving strict duty of duty. He is accused of being interested in world-view questions. A shameful job for the responsible driver of peoples' deeds! And he has committed the crime of feeling friendship and reverence for the most important capacity in this field to conduct talks about matters far removed from the military, such as philosophy and metaphysics. He would even have dared to do so during his victorious march in August, 1914.

she says he loved the army, and she resents the attacks on him that (I guess) he was too interested in "philosophy" and "metaphysics," and that he was talking about these things during the march to the Marne in August, 1914.

	Once he had strengthened his soul and relaxed the nerves, he demanded a friendly conversation with a wise and benevolent man! Nine days before the Battle of Marne, it was in the time of the greatest success of the German army. From the publications of the generals Dommes and Tappen, who knew best how things were at that time, it was clear that Herr v Moltke was in full control of these days.

not completely sure, but sounds like she's referring to contacts between Moltke and her husband nine days before the battle of Marne. From context, it appears she is still mocking critics in this passage, saying Moltke merely wanted a "friendly conversation" with "a wise and benevolent man." She asserts, according to Generals Dommes and Tappen, that Moltke was "in full control" (i.e. "not having a nervous breakdown," if I understand Moltke's critics correctly) during these days.

	Desiring to be dependent on an Army Sybille is a disgrace which is done in a most irresponsible manner to his memory.

From context, she appears to be saying that accussations that Moltke was under the spell of "an Army Sybille" are disgraceful, and a disgrace to Moltke's memory.

	In the writings of Rudolf Steiner, however, there are innumerable proofs of the fact that he rejected the media in the sharpest manner, and repeatedly pointed out that medial manifestations can only lead to chaos and bluntness. On September 1, five days before the Battle of Marne, Rudolf Steiner gave a lecture on human and peoples' fate at his home in Berlin. He appeared in the cycle of "contemporaries" of the duty of sacrifice, and of the triumphant confidence of the spiritual life, of the powerful composure through which the mind can become an effective tool in human help.

Not really sure what she's saying here. Comes off as trying to assure the reader Stiener was a good guy, I guess. Possibly, referring to a meeting between Stiener and Moltke.


goes on:

	Nur um Weltanschauungsfragen und menschlicheDinge hatten sich also die Gespräche bewegt, die imLaufe der Jahre hin, und wieder zwischen den zweiMännern stattgefunden hat ten, deren Arbeitsgebieteso verschieden waren, die sich aber gegenseitig achte-ten, und sich nur dann sahen, wenn der General denPhilosophen zu sich einlud, nach ihm schickte. Einemerkwürdige Schicksalsgemeinschaft verbindet siejetzt. Durch böswillige, nach einem Opfer suchendeMächte werden sie zusammengeschmiedet als Ziel-scheibe für den Haß, der ein Ventil braucht. Nach be-kanntem Rezept, damit die Aufmerksamkeit von ande-ren Dingen abgelenkt würde, geht man auch hier vor:eine geschickte und raffiniert teuflische Mache! Dochsolche Machenschaften können auf die Dauer nichtüber die Wahrheit siegen. Und die Gestalten dieserzwei Männer, wie verschieden sie auch sind, werdenumsomehr dem deutschen Volk einst ein kraftspen-dender Lebensquell sein können, als Repräsentantenseiner edelsten Eigenschaften: der Pflichttreue und dertatkräftigen Geistigkeit.

	Helmuth v. Moltke war zeitlebens dem Spiritismusabhold. Aus Achtung vor der menschlichen Freiheit hater seine Frau nicht gehindert, ihre den psychischenPhänomenen zugewandte Interessen zu verfolgen.Aber er hat immer davor gewarnt: das können allebezeugen, die ihn gekannt haben. Und in dem 1922erschienenen Werke «Erinnerungen, Briefe, Dokumen-te», herausgegeben von Eliza v. Moltke, finden sichmanche Privatbriefen entnommene Stellen, welche diesbeweisen. Frau v. Moltke teilte das Interesse für dieseDinge mit unendlich vielen Gliedern der höchsten Krei-se in allen Ländern und der regierenden Häuser. Zahl-reiche Prinzen und Prinzessinnen, Herzoge, Großfür-sten und Großfürstinnen haben sich in ausgiebigstemMaße mit Spiritismus beschäftigt; aber auch das bür-gerliche Publikum in ungeheuer großer Zahl -, selbstKommunisten wird doch auch von Lenin behauptet,daß er sein Medium und seinen chinesischen Okkulti-sten gehabt hätte. 

	The conversations which had taken place between the two men in the course of the years, whose work was different, but which were mutually respectful, were only concerned with questions of world-view and human affairs, and were only to be seen when the general was the philosopher invited him to him.

I think she's trying to assure the reader that Steiner didn't talk to Moltke about military matters.

	A memorable community of fate now connects them. They are forged together by means of malicious powers, seeking for a victim, as a target disk for the hatred which needs a valve. According to a known recipe, so that the attention of other things would be distracted, one goes also here: a clever and refined devilish machete! But such machinations can not in the long run prevail over the truth. And the forms of these two men, however different they may be, may once more be a source of life for the German nation, as representatives of its noblest qualities, of the faithfulness and of the active spirituality.

She's trashing Moltke and Steiner's critics, saying they are a "target for hatred that needs a Valve." I think she's also saying the attacks are intended as a distraction from "other things." These attacks, according to her, are the result of plots and "machinations." Stiener and Moltke, in her view, are in fact exemplary Germans.

	Helmuth v. Moltke was in the spirit of the spiritism. Out of respect for human liberty, he did not prevent his wife from pursuing her interests which were directed towards psychical phenomena.

She's saying Moltke was into "spiritism," and "out of respect for human liberty" he didn't stop his wife from "pursuing her interests" into "psychical phenomena."

	But he had always warned against this: all can testify to him who knew him.
	And in the work published in 1922, "Erinnerungen, Briefe, Documente", edited by Eliza v. Moltke, there are some places taken from private letters, which prove this.

I think she's saying Moltke also warned his wife against being too interested in "psychical phenomena," and there are some documents which show this. I guess she's trying to say Moltke wasn't as interested in "psychical phenomena" as his wife--he "didn't stop" her from pursing this "out of respect for human liberty" and also "warned against this."

	Mrs. v. Moltke shared the interest in these things with infinitely many members of the highest circles in all countries and the governing houses. Count-rich princes and princesses, dukes, grandfathers, and grand-princesses have dealt extensively with spiritualism; but also the bourgeois public in an immense number - even Communists are also asserted by Lenin that he had had his medium and his Chinese occultists.

I guess she's trying to say Mrs. von Moltke's interests weren't that unusual, and other people had them too. Dunno what's up with Lenin.


	All diesen Dingen gegenüber war und ist Aufklärungnötig – und diese brachte unserer dekadenten Zeit inwissenschaftlicher Weise Rudolf Steiner. Die Mensch-heit braucht diese Aufklärung, sonst versinkt sie ineinen Wust von Aberglauben und vermaterialisiertdurch den Spiritismus auch den Geist. Das tut dieserSpiritismus, dem ja auch Gelehrte anhängen, und denzu erkennen ihre psychische Forschung nicht gewach-sen ist. So treibt er seine Auswüchse, die sich niedurch Gewalt, sondern nur durch Aufklärung werdenbeseitigen lassen.

	Diese Aufklärung ist sehr unliebsam den Mächten,die in allerlei Geheimbünden und offiziell anerkannten,aber geheim arbeitenden Organisationen tatsächlichheute für politische Zwecke und Partei-Interessen ar-beiten. Auch hier ist Aufklärung nötig, ein Wissen vonden Dingen und ihren Zusammenhängen, nicht einSchwätzen von «überstaatlichen Mächten», mit derTendenz, alles der eigenen Wahnidee anzupassen undden Funken der Wahrheit in Lügenorgien zu ersticken.

	Goethe hätte Schillers Vergiftung zugelassen (so sagen solche Vertreter der «Wahrheit») und hätteDeutschland verraten! Warum soll man nicht auchRudolf Steiner ähnliches zuschreiben! Er hat ja hin undwieder mit Jules Sauerwein gesprochen: das ist derschlagende Beweis! 

	All these things were and still need to be enlightened - and this led Rudolf Steiner to our decadent time scientifically. Humanity needs this enlightenment, otherwise it sinks into a sense of awe-inspiration, and also materializes spirit through spiritism. This spiritism, which scholars also attach to it, does this, and to recognize its psychological research has not grown. Thus he drives his excesses, which are reduced by violence, but only by means of enlightenment.

	This enlightenment is very unwelcome to the Powers who, in all sorts of secret societies and officially recognized but secretly working organizations, are actually working for political ends and party interests. Here, too, enlightenment is necessary, a knowledge of things and their connections, not of a swagger of "supranational powers," with the tendency to adapt everything to their own delusion, and to stifle the spark of truth in lies.

	Goethe would have allowed Schiller's poisoning (so say such representatives of the "truth") and would have betrayed Germany! Why should not one also ascribe Rudolph Steiner similar! He has spoken to Jules Sauerwein again and again: that is the proof!


goes on about spritualism, secret socities, conspiracies


from this, it sounds like Moltke was interested in spiritual mumbo-jumbo, and met with Steiner during the days leading up to the battle at Marne. Possibly, Steiner also discussed military matters with Moltke and Moltke became unstable at this time (at least according to the unnamed Moltke "critics" that Mrs. Steiner is attacking).


------

this book seems sketchy on first glance, but says to have more info on the relationship between Steiner and Moltke:

https://www.amazon.com/Light-New-Millennium-Steiners-Association/dp/1855840510
	This collection of previously unpublished letters and documents deals with themes that are of tremendous significance for our time: the approaching new millennium; karma and reincarnation; life after death; the workings of evil; the destiny of Europe; and the hidden causes of the First World War. It also tells the story of the meeting of two great men: Rudolf Steiner and Helmuth von Moltke (1848-1916), Chief of the general staff of the German army during the outbreak of the First World War, who was dismissed from his post in 1914 following disagreements with the Kaiser.

	Moltke first came into contact with Steiner through his wife Eliza, who was one of Steiner's esoteric pupils. Steiner's connection to Moltke included personal meetings, letters, and clairvoyant messages after the General's death. These communications are reproduced here in full, along with a key interview with Rudolf Steiner for Le Matin and commentaries and essays by Jürgen von Grone, Jens Heisterkamp, Johannes Tautz and T. H. Meyer.


I guess Eliza was a "pupil" of Steiner's. Possibly, that would be a way for Steiner to get to Moltke (assuming this was Steiner's intention)

"Steiner's connection to Moltke included personal meetings, letters, and clairvoyant messages after the General's death."

an odd thing to say--as if we are supposed to take these seriously?

It could be that this book contains nothing of value. Another possibility is someone published legitimate material (e.g. authentic letters between Moltke and Steiner) but decided to frame it in a way so that it would be ignored.


http://www.perseus.ch/PDF-Dateien/MoltkeIntroduction.pdf
	This one volume edition for the English speaking readers originally appeared in two
seperate German language volumes in 1993. Volume one covers Moltkes life up to
his death in 1916 and includes the key documents about the outbreak of the war. It
was meant to represent the exoteric side of Moltke's life and work. Volume two
contains all the after death messages. Roughly the two parts of the present book
retain this basic structure of the German edition. Yet it was found appropriate to
shorten the contents of the first German volume considerably, as some of its
documents. e.g. a number of letters by Moltke to his wife, are of a more special
character and might find less interest in an English edition. It should nevertheless be
pointed out here that among the excluded documents in Part One a biographical
sketch on Moltke by Jens Heisterkamp as well as two detailed studies of the Marne
Battle by Jürgen von Grone are to be found in the German edition. Part two has only
be shortened very slightly. Any shortening within a document has been indicated by
apostrophes within two brackets


It's a translation of a German text with some parts removed. Why would you do that?

"letters to his wife" removed, but as has been demonstrated, some of those are very intereseting.

I guess this means if these are to be examined, you can't rely on the english translation alone

a summary from amazon:

https://www.amazon.com/Light-New-Millennium-Steiners-Association/dp/1855840510
	"Light for the New Millennium" is probably the strangest book on the history of World War I ever written. The book is published by Rudolf Steiner Press, and focuses on the peculiar relationship between Rudolf Steiner and the German general Helmuth von Moltke the Younger.

	Steiner was the founder of Anthroposophy, a spiritual or religious group which believes in reincarnation, clairvoyance and the cultural mission of the German people.

Did Moltke believe this crap? A lot of things a mystic with ill intentions could do to a "pupil." Send Moltke "messages" from his uncle, for example...

	Anthroposophists have a special reverence for the German polymath Goethe. Steiner was an Austrian by birth, but had based the Anthroposophical Society in Switzerland. He regularly visited Germany. Helmuth von Moltke was a very different kind of person. He was Chief of the German General Staff at the onset of World War I, but was sacked by the Kaiser after the German failure at Marne. He died in 1916, and has been a controversial figure ever since.

	Helmuth von Moltke's wife Eliza von Moltke was an ardent Anthroposophist and a personal pupil of Steiner, who admitted her to the so-called Esoteric Section, the inner circle of his movement.

what a surprise.

iirc Steiner was the one to stop Mrs. Moltke from publishing Moltke's memoirs. If she saw him as a "spiritual teacher" in contact with the dead, he would have a lot of options for convincing her.

	Through Eliza, Steiner also had full access to General Moltke, who was an ardent admirer of Goethe's "Faust" and a spiritual seeker. Judging by some of the letters reprinted in this volume, Moltke was open to the idea of reincarnation and had an interest in Bible criticism and liberal theology! Something tells me these were unusual preoccupations for a German general... Unsurprisingly, Moltke became interested in Steiner's ideas, and read some of his books. Indeed, it's possible that he became an Anthroposophist of sorts shortly before his death in 1916.

So Moltke was interested in Steiner's work. How much did he buy it? can't say from what I know now.

	Steiner was present at Moltke's bier, reciting a number of verses like a mantra over the general's dead body. Soon thereafter, things got *really* strange, as Steiner believed he was in contact with the deceased general's soul! From 1916 to 1922, Steiner would forward messages from "the Moltke soul" to Eliza on a semi-regular basis. These messages are also reprinted in this volume.

did any of the "messages" include "please burn all of my papers"?

	Steiner also attempted to defend Moltke's legacy on a more worldly level. In 1919, Steiner and Eliza von Moltke produced a pamphlet containing the general's negative reminiscences of Kaiser Wilhelm.

this checks out--iirc in one letter to his wife called him an idiot

	The pamphlet was published by an Anthroposophical-related group in Germany, and Steiner hoped it would somehow exonerate Germany from the accusations of war guilt during the Versailles peace negotiations. The pamphlet paints an unflattering picture of the German top brass as incompetent, vacillating and bickering (only Helmuth von Moltke stands firm).

is this what Moltke actually believed?

Can only guess what was going on in his head. He was pessimistic, so one possibility is that he very much wanted to win but he somehow became convinced that the German army would be crushed at Marne. (Still, his letters to his wife show remorse during Marne... remorse for what?)

	Steiner's point was that such a bad leadership surely couldn't be held responsible for the war. The point was lost on the German General Staff, who dispatched General Wilhelm von Dommes to persuade both Steiner and Eliza to withdraw the little book, which they did. A new version was printed three years later, however, when the political situation in Germany had become more stable. The relevant portions of the pamphlet are reprinted in "Light for the New Millennium".

	During the war, Steiner had supported the Central Powers, including his native Austria, and blamed the war on the Allies. (See Steiner's "The Karma of Untruthfulness", especially the second volume.) The idea that the Allies were responsible for the world-wide conflagration seems to have remained with Steiner even after the war, but on other points, his reflections as reprinted in "Light for the New Millennium" became more critical. Or perhaps "the Moltke soul" did, since Steiner attributed many of his ideas to the enlightened soul of his deceased friend. In the supposed after-death communications with General Moltke, the German defeat is seen as tragic but inevitable, the result of a karmic necessity. The German people and its leadership have renounced their cultural mission (Goethe, etc) in favour of raw power, empire-building and petty materialism. The German defeat at the hands of "Ahrimanic" Anglo-American civilization is a necessary chastisement and cleansing. (Ahriman is an evil spirit which plays a prominent role in Steiner's religious speculations.)

uhh ok

	The Moltke soul claims to have discovered one of his previous incarnations: as Pope Nicholas I, a 9th century pope who found himself in conflict with both the Patriarchy of Constantinople and the Empire of the Franks. Eliza von Moltke was one of the pope's cardinals in a previous incarnation, while several of the general's adversaries are reincarnated black magicians from the same time-period, serving the court at Capua in southern Italy. (That explains everything, doesn't it?) In Steiner's extremely complex cosmology, Pope Nicholas I plays a central role as the man who initiated the division between "the East", represented by the Orthodox Church, and "the West", represented by Catholicism. By separating the West from the spiritual stream of Orthodoxy (a garbled form of the ancient mysteries and Gnosticism, according to Steiner), Nicholas initiated a process that would eventually make Western Europe more secular, materialist and anti-spiritual, more "Ahrimanic" to use Anthroposophical terminology. However, this seemingly negative development was a necessary evil which created Western man's strong sense of self, individuality and rationality. These traits are necessary for the next step of cultural evolution, when individual man re-unites with Spirit on a higher level. (This strange scenario sounds like a garbled version of Hegelian dialectics!)

I guess this says something about Steiner.

	It's less clear how this should come about, but the Moltke soul (or perhaps Steiner) claims that the light will come from the East, and that the Germans and Slavs must somehow unite their spiritual forces. This is a remarkable statement, given Steiner's hostility to Russia during World War I, not to mention the German occupation of large swaths of Russian territory in 1918, when some of the after-death communications came through. There is also a call for European unity, lest Europe be destroyed by "Asia", presumably Japan. "Light for the New Millennium" even reprints a curious drawing which Moltke forwarded to Czar Nicholas II during a diplomatic visit long before the war. The drawing, a gift from the German Kaiser, shows an angel of war admonishing the European nations (represented by the goddess Britannia and similar figures) to fight against the Asiatic threat, represented by a wrathful Buddha ominously hovering over a generic European city. Do the editors of this volume share this perspective? If so, who are they afraid of today? China? The Anthroposophical editors of "Light for the New Millennium" are particularly fascinated by indications that the time is *now*, at the beginning of the 21st century. Hence, the title of the collection.

eh maybe it's pointless to read into this

who cares what these idiots think as long as we stop them in the end

	I admit that I found this book somewhat bizarre and repellent, but I think it could be of considerable interest to World War I buffs, especially those interested in the early phase of the war on the Western front, and/or the personality of Helmuth von Moltke (the real one, down here on Earth). Of course, "Light for the New Millennium" is also of interest to historians of comparative religion, since it shades light on some less well-known sides of Rudolf Steiner, who is usually portrayed as a purveyor of harmless flim flam such as bio-dynamic farming or eurythmy. For these reasons, I give this collection four stars.

------


https://sites.google.com/site/waldorfwatch/steiner-and-the-warlord
	The German strategy in the West — attacking Belgium in order to sweep down upon the northern borders of France — was devised by Count Alfred von Schlieffen. Historian S. L. A. Marshall attributes heavy responsibility to both von Schlieffen and von Moltke. “Germany had long since endorsed an unconscionable war plan ... [S]chlieffen, planning to outflank France through Belgium, and Moltke, ordering that it be done, were bold and original only in their defiance of civilized opinion.” [33] Von Moltke largely followed the Schlieffen Plan, but he made sufficient changes in the plan to become, in effect, the author of a revised strategy. Marshall argues that von Moltke’s revisions to the Schlieffen Plan created “another strategic concept altogether.” [34] If true, this greatly increases von Moltke's responsibility and, arguably, guilt. 


Moltke being "creative" and just making things up in his revisions to war plan?


	Marshall accuses von Moltke of, at a minimum, malfeasance: “[H]e was doing the worst possible thing in the beginning by giving the ultimate provocation to the greatest possible number of Germany’s enemies [by, for example, invading neutral Belgium]. In the light of history, there is no possible explanation of von Moltke’s vagaries except lazy-mindedness, awe of the establishment that he was supposed to master, timidity about putting himself in opposition to political authority [primarily the Kaiser], and the desire for high honor through vainglorious timeserving.”


or he wanted Germany to lose

according to Marshall, Moltke was doing everything wrong.

also pissing off maximum number of people possible against Germany.


------


https://books.google.com/books?id=t4gDyLfeUEQC&pg=PA263&lpg=PA263

Ludendorff blamed Moltke in part for "stabbing Germany in the back"

also blamed Hentsch

apparently, they were agents of freemasonry


book by Anika Mombauer


the origin of the first world war book by here says this:

	It certainly is worth spec-ulating that Bethmann Hollweg’s mediation proposal toVienna late in the crisis would have been delivered sooner,and more forcefully, if the Chancellor had known earlier ofBritain’s definite resolve to come to France’s aid in a Europeanwar.


echoing Hollweg's excuse in his memoirs.

also:

	...Of course, historians have also concentrated on Russia, the other great power to get embroiled in the war in 1914. Russia’s role in the July Crisis is an obvious topic of investigation in the debate on the origins of the war, given that German propaganda during and after the war claimed that the Russian mobilization had made further diplomatic attempts at a peaceful solution to the July Crisis impossible.

	...What is more, evidence from the German archives confirms that Germany had decided on its own mobilization regardless of Russia’s actions – it was only a stroke of luck that Russia’s general mobilization was announced in time to make Germany’s own military measures appear as a reaction to Russia’s.


this doesn't sound right

she mostly makes excuses for Russia, or quotes other people to do it for her


so why did she write a biography of Moltke?

------

Annika Moltke biography:

pg 287 say Moltke also a social darwinist

talks about controversy when Molkte appointed


pg 286

	Moltke has all too readily been dismissed as a pessimist. He certainly was prone to pessimistic tendencies; the realization of the narrow gamble that was Germany's strategic plan weighed heavily on his mind. However, this did not stop him from actively endorsing a bellicose policy.

What does that mean?


she also says some say Moltke was reluctant to take the job, but this is a "myth"


says he had "ruthless intrigues" to get rid of his successor, Falkenhayn.

	It is true that he was shocked by the fall exten of the disaster of the war for which he, quite rightly, felt responsible.


Is this true?


	...The evidence now available confirms without a doubt that Moltke and his colleagues wanted war and had sufficient influence over their political colleagues to achieve their aim.


This true?

Moltke says: (pg 288)

	What river of blood have already flowed, what nameless sorrow has come over the countless innocents whose houses have been burnt and pillaged! I am often overcome by dread when I think of this and I fell I should take responsibility for this horror; and yet, I could not have acted otherwise than I did.


what does he mean by that? "fatalist" or something?

Annika goes on "He was right to feel responsible," but in that letter to his wife at least it sounds like he didn't feel responsible.


here is source of that letter:


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=de&tl=en&u=https%3A%2F%2Farchive.org%2Fstream%2Ferinnerungenbrie00byumolt%2Ferinnerungenbrie00byumolt_djvu.txt
	[Aug 28 is when (I think?) Moltke had a meeting with Steiner. At least, his wife saw to point at the "nine days before the battle of Marne" they were winning]

	Luxemburg, 29. August 1914. 

	Ich sitze hier in der Schule, in der wir auch hier unsere Bureaus errichtet haben. Es ist alles noch unfertig und bei weitem nicht so bequem wie in Koblenz. Wir haben weder Gas noch elektrisch Licht, nur trübe Petroleumlampen. Desto helleres Licht erstrahlt mir aus den Meldungen, die von unseren Armeen heute eingelaufen sind. Im Osten ist ein voller Sieg erfochten, so viele Gefangene, daß die Armee nicht weiß, wie sie sie fortschaffen soll. — Im Westen meldet die 2. Armee unter Bülow einen vollen Sieg, der heute gegen fünfeinhalb französische Korps erfochten worden ist. 

	Wir wohnen alle zusammen, das heißt meine Herren und ich, in dem Hotel de Cologne, das einen deutschen Wirt hat. Es ist nicht sehr schön, aber man muß im Felde vorliebnehmen. Es kommt ja auch nicht darauf an, ob man's ein bißchen besser oder schlechter hat. 

	Ich bin froh, für mich zu sein und nicht am Hofe. Ich werde ganz krank, wenn ich dort das Gerede höre, es ist herzzerreißend, wie ahnungslos der hohe Herr über den Ernst der Lage ist. Schon kommt eine gewisse Hurrastimmung auf, die mir bis in den Tod verhaßt ist. — Nun, ich arbeite mit meinen braven Leuten ruhig weiter. Bei uns gibt es nur den Ernst der Pflicht und keiner ist sich darüber im unklaren, wie viel und Schweres noch getan werden muß. 

	Luxembourg, 29 August 1914.

	I am sitting here in the school, where we have also erected our offices here. It is still unfinished and by no means as convenient as in Koblenz. We have neither gas nor electric light, only dull petroleum lamps. The brighter light shines on me from the reports that have arrived from our armies today. In the east a full victory has been won, so many prisoners that the army does not know how to carry them off. In the West, the 2nd Army under Bulow reported a full victory, which has now been won against five and a half French corps.

	We all live together, that is, gentlemen and I, in the Hotel de Cologne, which has a German host. It is not very nice, but one must be in the field. It does not matter whether you're a bit better or worse.

	I am glad to be for myself and not at the court. I am quite sick when I hear the talk there, it is heart-rending how ignorant the high gentleman is about the gravity of the situation. There is already a certain hurricane mood, which is hated up to my death. - Well, I work quietly with my good people. With us, there is only the seriousness of duty, and no one is unaware of how much and what is yet to be done.


	...


	Luxemburg, 31. August 1914.

	Der Erfolg im Osten ist groß und wird unsere unglückliche Provinz hoffentlich von den Russen säubern. Die Verwüstungen, die sie angerichtet haben, muß eine spätere Zeit heilen, wenn wir wieder Frieden haben. — Auch im Westen wieder ein Erfolg bei der 2. Armee unter Bülow, zu der das Gardekorps gehört. Es soll schwere Verluste gehabt haben. Heute und morgen kämpfen die Armeen der Mitte, es wird ein Entscheidungskampf sein, von dessen Ausgang unendlich viel abhängt.

	Luxembourg, 31 August 1914.

	The success in the east is great, and we will hopefully cleanse our unhappy province from the Russians. The devastation which they have made must heal a later time when we have peace again. In the West again, a success with the Second Army under Bulow, to which the garde corps belongs. It is said to have had heavy losses. Today and tomorrow, the armies of the center are fighting, it will be a decisive struggle, on whose outcome infinitely much depends.


	...


	Luxemburg, 1. September 1914.

	Heute, am Schlachttage von Sedan, haben wir wieder einen großen Erfolg über die Franzosen errungen. Der Kaiser war auf meinen Wunsch heute draussen bei dem Oberkommando der 5. Armee, bei dem Kronprinzen, und bleibt die Nacht draußen. Es ist gut für ihn, daß er einmal zur Truppe kommt und daß sie ihn sieht, auch, daß er auf französischem Boden ist.


	Luxembourg, 1 September 1914.

	Today, on the slaughter day of Sedan, we have again achieved a great success over the French. The Emperor was at my command today, at the command of the 5th Army, at the crown prince, and remains the night outside. It is a good thing for him to come to the squad, and to see him, that he is on French soil.


	[also: September 1 was the day Steiner gave his "lecture" according to his wife]

	...


	Luxemburg, 2. September 1914.

	Ich bin eben aus Frankreich zurückgekommen. Ich war auf dem Fort Longwy, das gleich nach dem Einmarsch zusammengeschossen wurde. Die Wirkung unserer schweren Artillerie ist vernichtend. Das ganze Fort, das eine kleine Stadt umschloß, ist ein Trümmerhaufen. — Der Kaiser kam heute von den Truppen zurück, in Hurrastimmung. — In Österreich geht es schlecht. Die Armee kommt nicht vorwärts. Ich sehe es kommen, daß sie geworfen wird.


	Luxemburg, 2. September 1914.

	I've just come back from France. I was on the Fort Longwy, which was fired right after the invasion. The effect of our heavy artillery is devastating. The whole fort, which encircled a small town, is a heap of ruins. - The emperor came back from the troops today, in hurricane mood. - It's bad in Austria. The army does not advance. I see it coming that she is thrown.


	...


	Luxemburg, 3. September 1914. 

	Heute ist nichts Neues vorgefallen. Mit den Österreichern geht es schlecht, und wir können ihnen zur Zeit nicht helfen, müssen Gott danken, wenn wir mit unseren Gegnern fertig werden. Gott gebe, daß bald irgendein Ereignis in Rußland eintritt, das uns von den moskowitischen Massen entlastet. 


	Luxemburg, 3. September 1914. 

	Today nothing new happened. With the Austrians it is bad, and we can not help them at the moment, have to thank God when we deal with our opponents. God, that soon any event in Russia will take place, which will relieve us of the Muscovite masses.


	...


	Luxemburg, 7. September 1914. 

	Heute fällt eine große Entscheidung, unser ganzes Heer von Paris bis zum oberen Elsaß steht seit gestern im Kampf. Müßte ich heute mein Leben hingeben, um damit den Sieg zu erkämpfen, ich täte es mit tausend Freuden, wie es wieder Tausende unserer BrüderheutetunundTausendeesgetanhaben.Welche Ströme von Blut sind schon geflossen, welcher namenlose Jammer ist über die ungezählten Unschuldigen gekommen, denen Haus und Hof verbrannt und verwüstet ist. — Mich überkommt oft ein Grauen, wenn ich daran denke, und mir ist zu Mute, als müßte ich dieses Entsetzliche verantworten, und doch konnte ich nicht anders handeln, als geschehen ist.


	Luxembourg, September 7, 1914.

	Today is a great decision, our whole army from Paris to upper Alsace has been fighting since yesterday. If I had to give my life today to win the victory, I would do it with a thousand pleasures, as thousands of our brethren have already begun, and thousands have died. What streams of blood have already flowed, which nameless woe has come upon the innumerable innocents, house and court burned and devastated. I often feel a horror when I think of it, and I feel as if I ought to be responsible for this terrible thing, and yet I could not act otherwise.


	...


	Luxemburg, 8. September 1914. 

	Ich kann es schwer sagen, mit welcher namenlosen Schwere die Last der Verantwortung die letzten Tage auf mir gelastet hat und noch lastet. Denn noch immer ist das große Ringen vor der gesamten Front unseres Heeres nicht entschieden. Es handelt sich hierbei um Wahrung oder Verlust des bisher mit unendlichen Opfern Errungenen, es wäre furchtbar, wenn all dies Blut vergossen sein sollte, ohne einen durchschlagenden Erfolg. Die schreckliche Spannung dieser Tage, das Ausbleiben von Nachrichten von den weit entfernten Armeen, das Bewußtsein dessen, was auf dem Spiel steht, geht fast über menschliche Kraft. — Die furchtbare Schwierigkeit unserer Lage steht oft wie eine schwarze Wand vor mir, die undurchdringlich scheint. — Heute abend sind etwas günstigere Nachrichten von der Front eingetroffen. Gott gebe, daß wir noch einmal mit unseren zusammengeschmolzenen Truppen einen Erfolg haben. Das Gardekorps ist wieder schwer im Kampf gewesen, es soll fast bis auf die Hälfte seines Bestandes heruntergekommen sein.

	Es ist eine schwere Zeit, und namenlose Opfer hat dieser Krieg schon gefordert und wird sie weiter fordern. Die ganze Welt hat sich gegen uns verschworen, es sieht so aus, als ob es die Aufgabe aller übrigen Nationen wäre, Deutschland endgültig zu vernichten. — Die wenigen neutralen Staaten sind uns gegenüber nicht freundlich gesinnt. Deutschland hat keinen Freund in der Welt, es steht ganz alleine auf sich angewiesen.

	Von der heutigen Entscheidung hängt es ab, ob wir noch hier bleiben. — Lange jedenfalls nicht mehr. Der Kaiser muß nach Frankreich hinein, näher an die Armee heran, er muß wie seine Truppen in Feindesland sein.


	Luxemburg, 8. September 1914. 

	I can hardly say with what nameless heaviness the burden of responsibility has weighed on the last days and still weighs on me. For still the great struggle against the whole front of our army is not decided. It is a matter of preserving or losing the hitherto inflicted with infinite sacrifices; it would be terrible if all this blood should be shed, without a resounding success. The terrible tension of these days, the absence of news from far-off armies, the consciousness of what is at stake, is almost superhuman. The terrible difficulty of our situation is often like a black wall that seems impenetrable. - Tonight some more favorable news from the front arrived. May God give us another success with our merged troops. The garde corps has again been hard in the fight, it should have come down to almost half its stock.

	It is a difficult time, and nameless victims have already demanded this war and will continue to demand it. The whole world has conspired against us, it seems as if the task of all other nations is to destroy Germany permanently. The few neutral states are not friendly towards us. Germany does not have a friend in the world, it all depends on itself.

	From today's decision it depends on whether we remain here. - Not long any longer. The Emperor must go to France, closer to the army; he must be in enemy territory like his troops.


	...


	Luxemburg, 9. September 1914. 

	Es geht schlecht. Die Kämpfe im Osten von Paris werden zu unseren Ungunsten ausfallen. Die eine unserer Armeen muß zurückgehen, die andern werden folgen müssen. Der so hoffnungsvoll begonnene Anfang des Krieges wird in das Gegenteil umschlagen. — Ich muß das, was geschieht, tragen, und werde mit meinem Lande stehen oder fallen. Wir müssen ersticken in dem Kampf gegen Ost und West. — Wie anders war es, als wir vor wenigen Wochen den Feldzug so glanzvoll eröffneten — die bittere Enttäuschung kommt jetzt nach. Und wie werden wir zu zahlen haben für alles, was zerstört ist.

	Der Feldzug ist ja nicht verloren, ebensowenig wie er es bisher für die Franzosen war, aber der französische Elan, der auf dem Punkt stand, zu erlöschen, wird mächtig aufflammen, und ich fürchte, unser Volk in seinem Siegestaumel wird das Unglück kaum ertragen können. — Wie schwer dies mir wird, kann niemand besser ermessen — als Du, die Du ganz in meiner Seele lebst. 


	Luxemburg, 9. September 1914. 

	It goes bad. The battles in the east of Paris will be ours. One of our armies must go back, the others will have to follow. The beginning of the war, so hopelessly begun, will turn into the opposite. I must bear what is happening, and I will stand or fall with my country. We must stifle in the struggle against East and West. - How different was it when we opened the campaign so brilliantly a few weeks ago - the bitter disappointment now comes. And how will we have to pay for everything that is destroyed.

	The campaign is not lost, just as it has been for the French, but the French vigor, which was on the point, is going to be extinguished, and I am afraid our people will hardly be able to bear the misfortune , How difficult it becomes to me, no one can appreciate better than you, who live entirely in my soul.


	...


	TELEGRAMM S.M.DES KAISERS UND KÖNIGS. 

	Mit bestem Glückwunsche 

	Luxemburg, 14. September 1914. Wilhelm. 

	Chef des Generalstabes. 

	Die Wilnaer Armee, II., III., IV., XX. Armeekorps, drei bis vier Reserve-Divisionen, fünf Kavallerie-Divisionen, ist durch die Schlacht an den Masurischen Seen und die sich daran anschliessende Verfolgung vollständig geschlagen. Die Grodnoer ReserveArmee, XXII. A.-K., Rest des VI. A.-K, Teile des III. Sibirischen Korps, hat im besonderen Gefecht bei Lyk schwer gelitten. Der Feind hat starke Verluste von Toten und Verwundeten. Die Zahl der Gefangenen steigert sich. Die Kriegsbeute ist außerordentlich. Bei der Frontbreite der Armee von über hundert Kilometern, den ungeheuren Marschleistungen von zum Teil hundertfünfzig Kilometern in vier Tagen, bei den sich auf dieser ganzen Front und Tiefe abspielenden Kämpfen, kann ich den vollen Umfang noch nicht melden. Einige unserer Verbände sind scharf ins Gefecht gekommen. Die Verluste sind aber doch nur gering. Die Armee war siegreich auf der ganzen Linie gegen einen hartnäckig kämpfenden, aber schließlich fliehenden Feind. Die Armee ist stolz darauf, daß ein Kaiserlicher Prinz in ihren Reihen gekämpft und geblutet hat. 

	gez. Hindenburg. 
	(Eigenhändig vom Kaiser geschrieben und Moltke zugeschickt am 14. September 1914.) 


	TELEGRAMM S.M.DES KAISER AND KING.

	With best congratulations

	Luxembourg, September 14, 1914. Wilhelm.

	Chief of the General Staff.

	The Vilnius Army, II, III, IV, XX. Arm corps, three to four reserve divisions, five cavalry divisions, was completely defeated by the Battle of the Masurian Lakes and the ensuing persecution. The Grodno reserve armee, XXII. A.-K., remainder of the VI. A.-K, parts of the III. Siberian Corps, has suffered severely in the fight with Lyk. The enemy has a heavy loss of the dead and the wounded. The number of prisoners is increasing. The war booty is extraordinary. I can not yet report the full extent of the front of the army of more than a hundred kilometers, the immense marching of some hundred and fifty kilometers in four days, in the fighting on this whole front and depth. Some of our associations have come to the fore. The losses, however, are small. The army was victorious on the whole line against a stubbornly fighting but eventually fleeing enemy. The army is proud of the fact that an Imperial Prince has fought and bled in its ranks.

	signed Hindenburg.
	(Written by the Emperor himself and sent to Moltke on September 14, 1914.)


	...


	Mözieres, 27. September 1914. 

	Ich fahre heute mittag wieder von hier ab nach Brüssel, um dort die Sache in Schwung zu bringen. Unsere Lage in Frankreich ist noch immer unverändert. Wir brauchen einen Erfolg an irgendeiner Stelle, er kommt und kommt nicht.


	Mözieres, September 27, 1914.

	I'm leaving for Brussels today to get the thing going. Our situation in France is still unchanged. We need success at some point, he comes and does not come.




https://www.theguardian.com/world/2008/nov/09/western-front-battles-timeline
	1914
	Sept 6-12: First Battle of the Marne

	This battle halted the German advance, prompting trench warfare. The French incurred 250,000 losses, the Germans suffered similar. The British recorded 12,733 casualties.



-----

Annika says Moltke wasn't reluctant in her book.

Contradicting herself here?

http://journals.sagepub.com/doi/pdf/10.1177/096834459900600403


was he reluctant? if so, why would he ask the Kaiser to give him full control of the military?


------


one possibility: Molkte blackmailed into throwing the battle at Marne?


writes to his wife that he felt responsible, but didn't have a choice.

some say he was a reluctant to be a military commander, a charge which Annika challenges


maybe could have threatened him into doing what he did in some way?

one guess: threaten his wife? Hollweg's wife died shortly before the war.

but could have been anything, who knows.

Anikka also tries to shoot down idea that his appointment was controversial, and apparently there was some political intrigue there.

Possibly, Okhrana felt he was pliable and wanted him in that position. Would be a simple way to go about controlling leaders in these countries, rather than finding people who were committed to their cause ahead of time, find people with vulnerabilities and exploit them--a standard tactic for them.

If he felt pressured, responsible, angry at Russia, could explain why he was so pessimistic and sounded depressed.


also died shortly after abdicating--any foul-play there?



------

Anikka book:

pg 284

she gives an explanation for Moltke's motive for sending troops from Western front to Eastern front before Marne.

Ludendorff said the extra divisions weren't needed.

	The troops were moved east, although Ludendorff, who together with Paul von Hindenburg had replaced Waldeersee and Prittwitz, had informed the OHL prior to the dispatch of the two crops that they would arrive too late to make any difference. Perhaps the OHL simply did not believe that Ludendorff would be able to turn around the situation which to them had seemed so desperate. Before the reinforcements arrived, Hindenburg and Ludendorff had managed to avert the threatening German defeat, eventually turning it into a victory at the Battle of Tannenberg (27-30 August). The two corps were, however, sorely missed in the decisive battle in the West. Not surprisingly, Moltke's critics have found in his decision to send troops East, rather than keeping them on the right wing in the West, further reason for doubting his strategic competence.


an odd way of writing about it.


	...As Tappen summed up after the event:

		It is an act of tragic fte that Generaloerst v. Moltke of all people, [a man] who considered every measure particularly seriously and gravely and who in any case did not tend toward optimism, should judge the situation on the western theatre of war too favourabl on account of the massages received.

	Tappen failed to mention that he, too, had been inclined toward unwarranted optimism, at least according to Plessen's memories after the war.

	...News of successes were almost always exaggerated, particularly by the Kaiser, whereas Moltke at least learnt from this mistake and in future displayed much more caution. For example, on 30 August Muller recorded the Kaiser's typical ranting, as well as Moltke's squirming reaction to it: 'The Kaiser was practically wading in blood -- as so often recently -- during the train journey [from Koblenz to Luxembourg]. Moltke, who sat beside him, was suffering torture.'


https://books.google.com/books?id=LgeKAwAAQBAJ&pg=PT235&lpg=PT235

What's up with Plessen and his diary?


------


https://io9.gizmodo.com/11-intriguing-ways-world-war-i-could-have-turned-out-di-1652195903
	3. The Schlieffen Plan Results in German Victory

	This is one of the big "what ifs" of history: What if Helmuth von Moltke and his general staff had succeeded in reaching Paris in September 1914? Indeed, such an assertion is not altogether unreasonable. Some historians contend that the Schlieffen plan would have worked if Moltke had followed Schlieffen's original plan. Had the right flank not been depleted, Germany's 1st Army would not have been forced away from the sea, the British Expeditionary Force would have been overwhelmed, and the French armies would have been trapped between Paris and the French eastern frontier.

	With France fallen and the British routed, it's difficult to say what would have happened next, but it's safe to assume Germany would have given Russia hell out in the East. Unlike the situation 27 years later, Germany would have likely defeated Russia given the sorry state of its military. Together with Austria-Hungary, the two nations would have ruled over a massive European empire. What's more, a quick victory by the Central powers would have presented a terrible blow to democracy, while reaffirming autocratic political values. Indeed, the First World War was more ideological than many people realize. 


says Moltke's decision to move troops from right flank on west to eastern from caused them to lose at Marne


	..Peace could have happened at virtually any time during the war. In fact, it would have been prudent for Germany to push for peace terms after the First Battle of the Marne in 1914 — a truly decisive battle that ultimately set the stage for Germany's defeat. Molke himself knew Germany was finished even at this early stage, telling the Kaiser, "Your Majesty, we have lost the war."


another weird thing about this--after the Schlieffen plan fails, why not call for peace? it was all horrible trench warfare after that for more than 3 years.


	...But that's not to say some didn't try to seek peace. After the death of Franz Josef, the new emperor of Austria-Hungary, Charles I, secretly approached France to negotiate peace, but nothing came of it. Germany's Ludendorff, when he learned of it, was so angry he actually considered declaring war on his ally. 



has something to do with Ludendorff?


------


what was Moltke doing up to decision to divert forces to eastern front?


https://ww1live.wordpress.com/2014/08/14/east-prussia/
	14/8/1914 Meanwhile in East Prussia…

	...The German troops in East Prussia are commanded by Maximilian von Prittwitz. He has been left with just 15% of Germany’s forces while the bulk has gone west against France. Prittwitz faces much larger Russian forces. His role is to delay any Russian invasion until Germany has defeated France and can send its main army east. But now he receives difficult instructions from Moltke. The commander in chief tells him that he is to respond aggressively to any Russian advance.



https://ww1live.wordpress.com/2014/08/21/east-prussia-fatal-decisions/
	21/8/1914 East Prussia: fatal decisions

	Although his forces were defeated at Gumbinnen, Mackensen wants to renew the offensive against the Russians, hoping to capitalise on his successes on their flanks. But he is over-ruled by Prittwitz. Mackensen’s commander orders him to disengage from the Russians and retreat west. All territory to the east of the Vistula is to be abandoned.

	Russia’s General Rennenkampf, meanwhile, orders his forces to halt. He believes they have won a great victory and now can rest and prepare themselves for future advances.

	To the west, however, the other Russian army under Samsonov accelerates its march north. Samsonov sees the Germans as beaten and hopes to catch them on the run west.


https://ww1live.wordpress.com/2014/08/22/east-prussia-strike-back/
	22/8/1914 East Prussia: the Germans prepare to strike back

	Helmuth von Moltke, Germany’s commander in chief, is shocked by the news from East Prussia. Prittwitz’s order for German forces to withdraw to the Vistula is the last straw. Moltke orders two army corps sent from the Western Front to reinforce the German forces in East Prussia. And he decides to sack Prittwitz. He recalls Paul von Hindenburg from retirement to take command, with Erich Ludendorff to serve as his chief of staff.

	But in East Prussia, the situation is perhaps not as bad as it might appear. Prittwitz has revoked his order for German troops to retreat to the Vistula. His chief of operations, Colonel Max Hoffmann, has realised that Samsonov’s army is advancing so quickly that it is vulnerable to a German counter-attack, while the other Russian army has halted. Hoffmann persuades Prittwitz to transfer the bulk of his forces to attack Samsonov. The troops are in train just as Prittwitz is relieved of command.


https://ww1live.wordpress.com/2014/08/30/tannenberg-2/
	30/8/1914 [East Prussia] The Germans destroy Samsonov’s Army

	The Germans complete their destruction of Samsonov’s army. They have driven in the Russian flanks and pounded the enemy with artillery. When the Russians try to retreat, they find their way blocked by a German army corps under General von François. The Russians lose 90,000 men killed and 90,000 captured in just five days of fighting. The Germans also capture hundreds of field guns.

	Only 60,000 of Samsonov’s 230,000 strong army escape. Samsonov himself is not among them; unable to face the shame of this terrible defeat, he has shot himself.

	This triumph makes Hindenburg and Ludendorff heroes in Germany. Hoffmann will not receive the same recognition, though the staff officer will always claim that it was his plan that secured the victory.

	The battle is named Tannenberg, after a nearby village where the mediaeval Teutonic Knights were defeated by Slavic forces.



according to Annika book (247), the two corps sent from east to western front wouldn't have arrived before they made any difference. Hindenberg and Ludendorff had already won battle of Tanenberg before they got there. Originally, Moltke wanted to send 6 corps but ended up sending only two.

Retreat of Prittwitz said to be part of the reason for Moltke's decision to send the troops.



here's what he wrote to his wife Aug 29:



https://archive.org/details/erinnerungenbrie00byumolt
	Luxemburg, 29. August 1914. 

	Ich sitze hier in der Schule, in der wir auch hier unsere Bureaus errichtet haben. Es ist alles noch unfertig und bei weitem nicht so bequem wie in Koblenz. Wir haben weder Gas noch elektrisch Licht, nur trübe Petroleumlampen. Desto helleres Licht erstrahlt mir aus den Meldungen, die von unseren Armeen heute eingelaufen sind. Im Osten ist ein voller Sieg erfochten, so viele Gefangene, daß die Armee nicht weiß, wie sie sie fortschaffen soll. — Im Westen meldet die 2. Armee unter Bülow einen vollen Sieg, der heute gegen fünfeinhalb französische Korps erfochten worden ist. 

	Wir wohnen alle zusammen, das heißt meine Herren und ich, in dem Hotel de Cologne, das einen deutschen Wirt hat. Es ist nicht sehr schön, aber man muß im Felde vorliebnehmen. Es kommt ja auch nicht darauf an, ob man's ein bißchen besser oder schlechter hat. 

	Ich bin froh, für mich zu sein und nicht am Hofe. Ich werde ganz krank, wenn ich dort das Gerede höre, es ist herzzerreißend, wie ahnungslos der hohe Herr über den Ernst der Lage ist. Schon kommt eine gewisse Hurrastimmung auf, die mir bis in den Tod verhaßt ist. — Nun, ich arbeite mit meinen braven Leuten ruhig weiter. Bei uns gibt es nur den Ernst der Pflicht und keiner ist sich darüber im unklaren, wie viel und Schweres noch getan werden muß. 


	...

	Luxembourg, 29 August 1914.

	I am sitting here in the school, where we have also erected our offices here. It is still unfinished and by no means as convenient as in Koblenz. We have neither gas nor electric light, only dull petroleum lamps. The brighter light shines on me from the reports that have arrived from our armies today. In the east a full victory has been won, so many prisoners that the army does not know how to carry them off. In the West, the 2nd Army under Bulow reported a full victory, which has now been won against five and a half French corps.

	We all live together, that is, gentlemen and I, in the Hotel de Cologne, which has a German host. It is not very nice, but one must be in the field. It does not matter whether you're a bit better or worse.

	I am glad to be for myself and not at the court. I am quite sick when I hear the talk there, it is heart-rending how ignorant the high gentleman is about the gravity of the situation. There is already a certain hurricane mood, which is hated up to my death. - Well, I work quietly with my good people. With us, there is only the seriousness of duty, and no one is unaware of how much and what is yet to be done.


what does he mean by "hurricane mood" and complaining about how its "heart-rendering how ignorant the high gentleman is about the gravity of the situation." Is this after the Kaiser chewed him out? According to Annika book, this was recorded in Muller's diary on Aug 30, the day later.

could explain in part why he got sacked after Marne. He diverts troops, Kaiser yells at him, Moltke unrepentant and thinks Kaiser "ignorant," then Marne is a disaster.

Also interesting that this incident, and subsequent battle of Tannenberg, helped propel Ludendorff and Hindenburg into popularity--significantly, without Moltke's reinforcements. Seems like this was the start of Moltke being on his way out and Ludendorff and Hindenburg on their way in.


------


What happened at Marne?


https://archive.org/stream/erinnerungenbrie00byumolt/erinnerungenbrie00byumolt_djvu.txt
	Luxemburg, 2. September 1914.

	I've just come back from France. I was on the Fort Longwy, which was fired right after the invasion. The effect of our heavy artillery is devastating. The whole fort, which encircled a small town, is a heap of ruins. - The emperor came back from the troops today, in hurricane mood. - It's bad in Austria. The army does not advance. I see it coming that she is thrown.


	Luxemburg, 3. September 1914. 

	Today nothing new happened. With the Austrians it is bad, and we can not help them at the moment, have to thank God when we deal with our opponents. God, that soon any event in Russia will take place, which will relieve us of the Muscovite masses.



https://ww1live.wordpress.com/2014/09/03/kluck-bulow-gap/
	3/9/1914 [Western Front] The French spot an opportunity

	The German armies in France are continuing to charge across France. But they are outrunning their lines of supply and communication. Moltke has stayed back in Luxembourg and is unable to coordinate the actions of his armies. His subordinate commanders have to make their own decisions as to which way to march. They are choosing to pursue the retreating French and British to the south east rather than swing around Paris as originally envisaged in the invasion plan.

	But as the German armies lurch along, a gap opens up between the 1st Army of Kluck and the 2nd Army of Bülow. French aircraft spot the increasing isolation of Kluck’s forces. Now Joffre starts contemplating a counter-attack that could surround and destroy the 1st German army.



so Moltke stops commanding his armies and the commanders decide on their own to pursue retreating allied forces, creating an opening for the French.



https://ww1live.wordpress.com/2014/09/05/bef-marne/
	5/9/1914 [Western Front] Sir John French agrees to help the French

	Joffre is preparing to counter-attack the Germans, hoping to surround and destroy Kluck’s 1st Army. General Gallieni of the Paris garrison has sent his troops forward to join those preparing to strike the Germans.

	Joffre is ruthlessly sacking generals he feels are not up to the coming struggle. Lanrezac has been relieved of command of the 5th Army, replaced by his more aggressive subordinate Franchet d’Espèrey. But there is one general Joffre cannot sack: Sir John French, commander of the British Expeditionary Force. Joffre needs the British to join the counter-attack but they are not subject to his orders. So he travels to French’s headquarters, outlines his plan, and begs him to commit his soldiers to the desperate battle. “Monsieur le Maréchal, c’est la France qui vous supplie“, he says. “Marshal, France is begging you”. French tries to reply in French, but his attempts at the language are incomprehensible. He turns to a more linguistically competent staff officer. “Damn it, I can’t explain. Tell him that all our men can do our fellows will do”.


Joffre plans to surround Kluck's over-extended army, sacks some generals and recruits to British in plan



https://ww1live.wordpress.com/2014/09/06/kluck-turns-right/
	6/9/1914 [Western Front] Kluck turns right

	German armies are continuing to advance through France but now the French are ready to strike back. Joffre is hoping to hold the line of the Marne river. And he hopes to counter-attack and inflict a crushing defeat on the invaders.

	Joffre has moved troops from the east to create a new formation, the 6th Army under Michel-Joseph Maunoury. This now menaces the right flank of Alexander von Kluck’s advancing German 1st Army. Kluck turns his force westward to face Maunoury, but in doing so he widens the gap between his army and Bülow’s to the east. Now the French are preparing to attack into this gap. 


Kluck makes a bunch of bad maneuvers that opens up German lines


https://archive.org/stream/erinnerungenbrie00byumolt/erinnerungenbrie00byumolt_djvu.txt
	Luxembourg, September 7, 1914.

	Today is a great decision, our whole army from Paris to upper Alsace has been fighting since yesterday. If I had to give my life today to win the victory, I would do it with a thousand pleasures, as thousands of our brethren have already begun, and thousands have died. What streams of blood have already flowed, which nameless woe has come upon the innumerable innocents, house and court burned and devastated. I often feel a horror when I think of it, and I feel as if I ought to be responsible for this terrible thing, and yet I could not act otherwise.


https://ww1live.wordpress.com/2014/09/07/masurian-lakes/
	7/9/1914 [East Prussia] The Germans turn on Rennenkampf

	The Germans under Hindenburg and Ludendorff have destroyed one of the two Russian armies that had invaded East Prussia. Now they turn on the other, the Russian 1st Army under Rennenkampf. The Russians are in the vicinity of the Masurian Lakes complex and it is from them that this battle will take its name.

	Moltke has sent two corps from the west to reinforce East Prussia, but Rennenkampf’s army still has a great numerical advantage. Nevertheless, the Germans push forward and launch a devastating attack on the Russians, initially concentrating against their southern flank.


Meanwhile, Ludendorff doing well against Rennenkamapf's forces on east, despite numerical disadvantage.



https://archive.org/stream/erinnerungenbrie00byumolt/erinnerungenbrie00byumolt_djvu.txt
	Luxemburg, 8. September 1914. 

	I can hardly say with what nameless heaviness the burden of responsibility has weighed on the last days and still weighs on me. For still the great struggle against the whole front of our army is not decided. It is a matter of preserving or losing the hitherto inflicted with infinite sacrifices; it would be terrible if all this blood should be shed, without a resounding success. The terrible tension of these days, the absence of news from far-off armies, the consciousness of what is at stake, is almost superhuman. The terrible difficulty of our situation is often like a black wall that seems impenetrable. - Tonight some more favorable news from the front arrived. May God give us another success with our merged troops. The garde corps has again been hard in the fight, it should have come down to almost half its stock.

	It is a difficult time, and nameless victims have already demanded this war and will continue to demand it. The whole world has conspired against us, it seems as if the task of all other nations is to destroy Germany permanently. The few neutral states are not friendly towards us. Germany does not have a friend in the world, it all depends on itself.

	From today's decision it depends on whether we remain here. - Not long any longer. The Emperor must go to France, closer to the army; he must be in enemy territory like his troops.



https://ww1live.wordpress.com/2014/09/08/marne-allies-attack/
	8/9/1914 [Battle of the Marne] The Allies launch their counter-attack

	All along the line of the Marne, French and German troops are engaged in desperate fighting. On the western end of the line, Kluck’s 1st German Army is pressing hard against the French forces that had been menacing his right flank. Kluck is pleased with how things are going, for the French are being pushed back and he reckons that when they break Paris will fall.

	But Kluck is in terrible danger. He has become separated from the 2nd Army of Bülow. Now the British Expeditionary Force and the French 5th Army of Franchet d’Espèrey is pushing into the gap. If the attack fails, France has lost the war. But if it succeeds, Kluck’s army will be surrounded and Bülow’s army too will be in danger of envelopment. 


allies push to surround Kluck's army as the Germans close on Paris



https://archive.org/stream/erinnerungenbrie00byumolt/erinnerungenbrie00byumolt_djvu.txt
	Luxemburg, 9. September 1914. 

	It goes bad. The battles in the east of Paris will be ours. One of our armies must go back, the others will have to follow. The beginning of the war, so hopelessly begun, will turn into the opposite. I must bear what is happening, and I will stand or fall with my country. We must stifle in the struggle against East and West. - How different was it when we opened the campaign so brilliantly a few weeks ago - the bitter disappointment now comes. And how will we have to pay for everything that is destroyed.

	The campaign is not lost, just as it has been for the French, but the French vigor, which was on the point, is going to be extinguished, and I am afraid our people will hardly be able to bear the misfortune , How difficult it becomes to me, no one can appreciate better than you, who live entirely in my soul.


https://ww1live.wordpress.com/2014/09/09/marne-germans-retreat/
	9/9/1914 [Battle of the Marne] The Germans retreat, averting disaster but losing the war

	Kluck continues to push his German forces to the west, unaware of the British and French forces threatening to descend on his rear. But now Colonel Richard Hentsch, an emissary from Moltke (still back in Luxembourg), arrives at his headquarters. Moltke has sent Hentsch to check up on situation at the front, but it has taken him five days to get to Kluck’s headquarters.

	Hentsch quickly realises the danger in which Kluck’s army finds itself. On Moltke’s authority, he orders Kluck to retreat to the river Aisne. The other German armies follow suit

	The German retreat averts immediate disaster, but a quick victory over France is now impossible. “We have lost the war,” Moltke reputedly exclaims when he hears the news. On the French side, Joffre is disappointed that he has not been able to destroy any of the German armies, but he knows that this battle has been a great (though bloody) victory, one that has saved France from ignominious defeat.

	In the battle as a whole each side suffers around a quarter of a million casualties.


Moltke tells Kluck's army to retreat along with other armies, avoiding them getting surrounded, but it takes him a long time to do this. The end result is that the German advance has stopped and they won't be able to take Paris in time.

Moltke sent Hentsch to "check up" on the situation at the front--how did he not know beforehand? like through telegraph?

seems there is more to this: how was cluck "unaware" of the danger but Hentsch "quickly realized" it? why was Moltke out of touch with his armies for so long?


https://ww1live.wordpress.com/2014/09/12/1291914-western-front-the-germans-hold-the-line-along-the-aisne/
	12/9/1914 [Western Front] The Germans hold the line along the Aisne

	The Germans have retreated and set up a new defensive line by the Aisne river. Now the Allies try to press their advantage and push hard against the German positions. But they are unable to make significant progress. The Germans have dug trenches and are easily able to hold off the French and British attacks.


so they retreated from Marne and dug-in at Aisne


https://ww1live.wordpress.com/2014/09/13/russians-flee-east-prussia/

Meanwhile, Ludendorff gaining fame for successes in Eastern front


https://ww1live.wordpress.com/2014/09/14/falkenhayn-replaces-moltke/
	14/9/1914 Moltke is pushed aside; Falkanhayn takes command

	Helmuth von Moltke, German chief of staff, has always been something of a pessimist, but the failure at the Marne throws him into despair. He had gambled everything on a quick victory against France but his strategy has failed. Not merely is France still undefeated, Britain has come into the war on the side of the enemy, thanks to Moltke sending German troops through Belgium. Germany’s long-run situation is grim. Moltke suffers a breakdown and psychic collapse.

	Moltke is clearly no longer up to the job of commanding the German army. He is replaced by another officer, Erich von Falkenhayn, the Prussian war minister. The news is kept from the public, with Moltke obliged to loiter at army headquarters in Luxembourg to give the impression he is still running the show, but Falkenhayn is now in command.

	Unlike Moltke, Falkenhayn is not demoralised by the failure at the Marne. He is determined to do his utmost to secure a German victory in France before the end of the year.


Moltke said to be demoralized, has a breakdown and "psychic collapse" after failure at Marne. Replaced by Falkenhayn, although this is kept hidden from the public. Moltke stays at Luxemborg and pretends he's still doing things.


------


Annika's book pg 251:
	
	That the Battle of Marne was lost was largely blamed on Moltke. Critics pointed to the changes he had made to Shclieffen's strategic plans, and to the fact that his nerve had failed him once war had brokenn out. He was held responsible for ordering the retreat on the Marne. He had adulterated the certain recipe for victory and had never whole-heartedly endorsed Shclieffen's tactics. He had aimed for flexibility over where to meet and engage the French army, regardless of weather such a victory would be acheived on the right wing, in the middle or on the left wing. Unlike Schlieffen, who had wanted to force the French into battle where it suited him, Moltke was willing to alter his deployment in accordance with that of the French.


idk seems more like a quick shock-and-awe push to take France in 6 weeks wouldn't involve retreating and digging trenches...

If Moltke terrified of Russian menace this doesn't make sense. Wouldn't he want the war over quickly in France like the plan said in order to stop them in time? Or was his excuse that he figured Kluck's army was doomed and so the push was doomed by then anyway?

I guess the problem is Moltke pre-judged the situation in Marne and decided on a retreat when the whole plan was a push that was kindof desperate from the start anyway.

Another problem is that he moved troops from the Western front to East and failed to command his forces, allowing Kluck's army to get into a dangerous position in the first place.

Another problem is that Moltke's decision to violate Belgian neutrality was said to be a reason for England to enter the war (is this true?). Maybe a similar deal to Ludendorff's decision for unrestricted submarine warfare and Zimmerman's telegram were a reason for the U.S. to enter the war. It seems there is a pattern where the same people who started the war in Gemrany sabotaged the war for them.

Also, a question: how bad was the retreat? not a general, but figure there are good retreats and bad retreats. Like a good retreat is maybe you retreat before engaging and lure opposing forces into a trap or something. A bad retreat would be like your forces are surrounded by artillery and snipers and you order them to all run through mud or something like that.


Another question: when did Moltke decide to retreat?



------


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alexander_von_Kluck
	After fighting the British at Mons and Le Cateau, the First Army pursued Lanrezac's French Fifth Army during the great retreat. However, thirty miles from Paris and anticipating an encounter with the French Fifth Army (commanded by Lanrezac), the cautious Bulow halted his Second Army's advance and ordered Kluck's direct support.


What was the reason for this? caution an halting an advance seems like the wrong attitude for a "desperate" push that was supposed to wrap-up in six weeks.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Karl_von_B%C3%BClow
	As the 2nd Army and General Alexander von Kluck's 1st Army neared Paris from 31 August to 2 September, Bülow, concerned about the growing gap between the two armies, ordered Kluck to turn the 1st Army on his right towards him. This decision, however, resulted in Kluck's advancing south and east of Paris, instead of south and west as specified in the Schlieffen Plan. Bülow crossed the Marne on 4 September, but was ordered to retreat to the Aisne after the successful counterattack by combined French and British forces against Kluck's 1st Army at the First Battle of the Marne from 5–10 September. Bülow was believed by the German public to be responsible for the German failure to capture Paris.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alexander_von_Kluck
	Kluck had recently been placed under Bulow's command when the latter was appointed to command the German right wing. Kluck protested this order to Bulow and Moltke, as he preferred to move past Lanrezac's left flank, but was overruled and ordered to support Bulow's attack on Lanrezac.


so Moltke was ordering his armies, wasn't he? other sources say he stopped commanding his armies for awhile. I guess at this point at least he was giving them at least some orders.


	By this time, the aggressive Kluck had advanced his First Army well south of von Bulow's position to 13 miles north of Paris. On August 30, Kluck decided to wheel his columns to the east of Paris, discarding entirely the Schlieffen Plan. Although frustrated by Bülow's caution, on 31 August Kluck turned his army southeast to support the Second Army. In so doing, Kluck created a 30-mile gap in the German line extending toward Bülow's stalled Second Army. Critically, the move exposed Kluck's right flank in the direction of Paris where (unknown to Kluck) General Michel-Joseph Maunoury's new Sixth Army was deployed. The French learned of Kluck's change in course on September 3 thanks to reports from Allied aircraft, and this was independently confirmed by radio intercepts.[6] The following events were critical to the future course of the war.
	
	On 5 September, Maunoury attacked Kluck's right (west) flank, marking the opening of the First Battle of the Marne. Kluck parried the blow by borrowing two corps in the space between the First and Second army. A surprise attack on 8 September by Franchet D'Esperey's (who had replaced Lanrezac) Fifth Army against Bülow's Second widened the gap which the British Expeditionary Force marched to exploit.

	Von Kluck telegraphed von Moltke on the night of 8 September that the decisive victory would be won the following day.[7]

Moltke didn't seem so optimistic

	Instead, on 9 September a representative of the German Headquarters, Hentsch, considered the situation of Bülow's Army as very dangerous and ordered a retreat of all the armies, even though by that time von Kluck had overcome most of his own problems.


Is this true? did Moltke order a retreat even after the commanders had sorted it out?

Article says that before this, Paris was worried they were going to lose, and were preparing for a siege of Paris.

Also of note: this article says Hentsch decided it was Bulow's army that was in a dangerous position--other articles (the ww1 blog) gives the impression it was Kluck's.


------


so what happened at Marne?


https://books.google.com/books?id=_jOw5DHxwVsC&printsec=frontcover#v=onepage&q&f=false
	In fact, I would argue that Marne was the most decisive land battle since Waterloo (1815).

Annika book:
	The Battle of the Marne in September 1914 is generally seen as the beginning of the end for Germany's chances of victory in the First World War. With hindsight it has often been argued that the war was lost when the battle of the Marne was lost.

	...While regarding the battle as a grave set-back, contemporary commentators did not yet think that overall victory had become and impossibility. Only as part of the post-war Schlieffen myth did the defeat on the Marne acquire such exaggerated importance. Oberst Nicolai explained to the Reichsarchiv in 1925 that it would be wrong to state that the OHL had believed 'that the result of the Battle of the Marne amounted to a decisive turning-point in the war or even the end of any hope of victory. In my opinion, this point of view is only the result of later developments.'


Sounds like she tentatively agrees Marne was a decisive loss for Germany, but downplays that others in Germany saw it that way. This is an important point, because Germany made the decision to continue the war after Marne, a decision which seems hard to defend.



------


from Herwig book on origins of WW1:

	Nicholas sustained the hope that through direct communications with his German cousin, Wilhelm II, the emperors together could eliminate the disagreements into which their respective governments had seemingly locked the empires. And even at that crucial moment, Sazonov, Sukhomlinov, Ianushkevich, and the military and diplomatic staffs behind them understood that even general mobilization by no means implied war with both Vienna and Berlin.


but weren't Tatishev, the Kaiser, and others saying otherwise?


Herwig:
	The lethargy of Russia's shift to a wartime footing - twelve to sixteen weeks for completion, in the best staff estimates - in their view offered the state extensive room for maneuver and negotiation before declaring war. Danilov later wrote that, in principle, a declaration of general mobilization affected only the empire's ability to defend itself and to place its forces in readiness, an observation born out by five decades of General Staff study and field exercises. Russia's survival would depend on the rapidity with which it could bring its army to readiness to defend itself.


from Taylor book:

	Nicholas wrote in his diary for July 29th:

		“During the day we played tennis. The weather was magnificent. But the day was singularly unpeaceful. I was constantly being called to the telephone...Apart from that I was in urgent telephonic communication with Wilhelm. In the evening I read, and received Tatishev [a Russian General attached to the Kaiser’s personal staff as a kind of special military attaché] whom I am sending tomorrow to Berlin.”


https://wwi.lib.byu.edu/index.php/The_Willy-Nicky_Telegrams
	Kaiser to Tsar, July 29, 6:30 P.M.
	Berlin, 29. July 1914

	I received your telegram and share your wish that peace should be maintained. But as I told you in my first telegram, I cannot consider Austria's action against Servia an "ignoble" war. Austria knows by experience that Servian promises ono paper are wholly unreliable. I understand its action must be judged as trending to get full guarantee that the Servian promises shall become real facts. This my reasoning is borne out by the statement of the Austrian cabinet that Austria does not want to make any territorial conquests at the expense of Servia. I therefore suggest that it would be quite possible for Russia to remain a spectator of the austro-servian conflict without involving Europe in the most horrible war she ever witnessed. I think a direct understanding between your Government and Vienna possible and desirable, and as I already telegraphed to you, my Government is continuing its exercises to promote it. Of course military measures on the part of Russia would be looked upon by Austria as a calamity we both wish to avoid and jeopardize my position as mediator which I readily accepted on your appeal to my friendship and my help.

	Willy

	Tsar to Kaiser, July 29, 8:20 P.M.
	Peter's Court Palace, 29 July 1914

	Thanks for your telegram conciliatory and friendly. Whereas official message presented today by your ambassador to my minister was conveyed in a very different tone. Beg you to explain this divergency! It would be right to give over the Austro-servian problem to the Hague conference. Trust in your wisdom and friendship.

	Your loving Nicky


from Herwig's book WW1:

	Powerful as the military imperative for mobilization might have ap-
peared, it did not convince Nicholas on 30 July, when, in a series of meet-
ings with Sazonov and others, the tsar labored long over the decision.
Nicholas refused to take any of the urgent telephone calls from the Gen-
eral Staff that morning as he ruminated over a telegram from his cousin:
The kaiser declared that the decision for European war rested solely on
Nicholas's shoulders! Wilhelm II assured him that he would not be able
hold back events if Nicholas's government took unilateral military steps.
It is scarcely imaginable that the gravity of this warning could have rested
more heavily on any other European statesman that July day.



https://wwi.lib.byu.edu/index.php/The_Willy-Nicky_Telegrams
	Kaiser to Tsar, July 30, 1:20 A.M. 

	Best thanks for telegram. It is quite out of the question that my ambassadors language could have been in contradiction with the tenor of my telegram. Count Pourtalès was instructed to draw the attention of your government to the danger & grave consequences involved by a mobilisation; I said the same in my telegram to you. Austria has only mobilised against Servia & only a part of her army. If, as it is now the case, according to the communication by you & your Government, Russia mobilises against Austria, my rôle as mediator you kindly intrusted me with, & which I accepted at you[r] express prayer, will be endangered if not ruined. The whole weight of the decision lies solely on you[r] shoulders now, who have to bear the responsibility for Peace or War. 


Herwig:
	That afternoon, Nicholas's ministers urged him to act. Sazonov noted
that Berlin had demanded "from us a capitulation to the Central Powers,
for which Russia would never forgive the Sovereign, and which would
cover the good name of the Russian people with shame." Krivoshein ar-
gued that Russia was not the weakened state of 1908, but could again
assert itself with confidence as a great power. Krivoshein's strong conser-
vative position, balancing considerations of strategic danger and domestic
stability, gave him de facto leadership of the council, eclipsing Goremykin,
whose deferential views of council authority would lead to continued
inaction.

	Sazonov knew of Berlin's diplomatic threats to Paris of the previous
day and communicated this news to Nicholas.


confusing--isn't that what Kaiser was referring to when he said "It is quite out of the question that my ambassadors language could have been in contradiction with the tenor of my telegram."? So this would be something the Tsar would already know about, unless something like this happened again.


Herwig:
	When confronted with this, his German cousin's apparent betrayal and deception, Nicholas II agreed to order general mobilization.


https://wwi.lib.byu.edu/index.php/The_Willy-Nicky_Telegrams
	Tsar to Kaiser, July 31
	This and the previous telegram crossed.

	Petersburg, Palace, 31 July 1914
	Sa Majesté l'Empereur, Neues Palais

	I thank you heartily for your mediation which begins to give one hope that all may yet end peacefully. It is technically impossible to stop our military preparations which were obligatory owing to Austria's mobilisation. We are far from wishing war. As long as the negociations with Austria on Servia's account are taking place my troops shall not make any provocative action. I give you my solemn word for this. I put all my trust in Gods mercy and hope in your successful mediation in Vienna for the welfare of our countries and for the peace of Europe.

	Your affectionate
	Nicky

	Tsar to Kaiser, August 1

	Peter's Court, Palace, 1 August 1914
	Sa Majesté l'Empereur
	Berlin

	I received your telegram. Understand you are obliged to mobilise but wish to have the same guarantee from you as I gave you, that these measures do not mean war and that we shall continue negociating for the benefit of our countries and universal peace deal to all our hearts. Our long proved friendship must succeed, with God's help, in avoiding bloodshed. Anexiously, full of confidence await your answer.

	Nicky

	Kaiser to Tsar, August 1

	Berlin, 1. August 1914

	Thanks for your telegram. I yesterday pointed out to your government the way by which alone war may be avoided. Although I requested an answer for noon today, no telegram from my ambassador conveying an answer from your Government has reached me as yet. I therefore have been obliged to mobilise my army.

	Immediate affirmative clear and unmistakable answer from your government is the only way to avoid endless misery. Until I have received this answer alas, I am unable to discuss the subject of your telegram. As a matter of fact I must request you to immediatly [sic] order your troops on no account to commit the slightest act of trespassing over our frontiers.

	Willy


Herwig makes it sound like the Tsar was convinced of his cousins deception, but his telegrams suggest otherwise.

Taylor book says Sazanov convinced the Tsar that a German mobilization was imminent



https://archive.org/stream/fallofthedynasti012755mbp/fallofthedynasti012755mbp_djvu.txt
	It was Sazonov who effected this fatal result. Accompanied by a staff 
officer, he came to the Peterhof Palace, some 17 miles out of the capital, to 
try to convince the Czar that general mobilization could no longer be de- 
layed. For more than an hour, in deferential but urgent tones, he marshaled 
his arguments in favor of mobilization. He had two particularly strong 
ones: a somewhat vague report that Germany, too, had begun to mobilize, 
and the arrogant tone of the Kaiser's ktest telegram declaring that he could 
not mediate in Vienna if Russia went ahead with the partial mobilization 
against Austria. 

	Nicholas, however, appeared adamant Sitting behind big bronze- 
trimmed mahogany desk, littered with maps, in his office on the ground 
floor of the palace, overlooking the Gulf of Finland, he hardly seemed to 
hear what his Foreign Minister was saying. His bearded face, though pale 
and lined with fatigue, remained expressionless, and his dreamy eyes stayed 
fixed on the remote blue sea-horizon. 

	"Think of the responsibility you are asking me to take if I follow your 
advice!" he finally exclaimed. "Think what it means to send thousands 
and thousands of men to their death." 

	Unluckily, Sazonov's companion, General Tatishev, chose that moment 
to speak up. 

	"Yes, it is a terrible decision to take," he said. 

	"I am the one who decides," Nicholas snapped. 

	From then on he seemed more attentive to Sazonov's arguments. He 
was particularly impressed by the Foreign Minister's view an erroneous 
one we now know that Germany was bent on war and would go ahead 
whether Russia mobilized or not At last, after what seemed a terrible inner 
struggle, the Czar gave in. 

	"All right, Serge Dimitrievitch," he said, "telephone the Chief of the Gen- 
eral Staff that I give the order for general mobilization." 

	Sazonov was inside the telephone cabin on the ground floor of the Pe- 
terhof as soon as etiquette permitted. "And now, General," he said, after 
passing on the glad news, "disconnect your telephone." 

	The advice proved unnecessary. The Czar hastened to wire his cousin 
Willy, pledging that his troops would commit no provocative actions, and 
urging continued negotiations in the interest of the "universal peace dear 
to our hearts," but he issued no further counterorders. On the morning of 
July 31 "a grey day, in keeping with my mood," as Nicholas wrote in his 
diary the red mobilization posters went up on the walls of public buildings 
throughout the Russian Empire.


Herwig:
	Sazonov immediately called Ianushkevich with the imperial order - and told him to smash his telephone, to forestall any imperial second thoughts. The order went into effect on 31 July, and Germany declared war the following day.



Overall, Herwig takes the position of Sazanov that a German attack was imminent, and that Russia had to mobilize to "defend itself."

But it doesn't seem clear at all that Germany was prepared to attack Russia. The Tsar was getting mixed messages from his advisors, the Kaiser, and the German ambassador, and maybe other sources.

Even if the Tsar was adamant on defending Serbia, they had other options besides general mobilization or even partial mobilization against Austria-Hungary, such as committing troops and supplies to Serbia and limiting them there.

Herwig starts with the assumption that Germany was going to attack Russia, and that Russia had to mobilize to be on "war-time footing." But this thinking and the Russian mobilization is a key action in the chain of events that lead to the war in the first place.


Actually, all this isn't by Herwig, but "David Alan Rich," a contributor to the book that Herwig edited and also contributed to.


Another book edited by him has a section by Annika Mombauer:

https://worldwidehistoryonline.files.wordpress.com/2017/04/war-planning-1914.pdf


an article by Herwig:

https://www.google.com/url?sa=t&rct=j&q=&esrc=s&source=web&cd=24&ved=0ahUKEwi8lpGUxOXWAhVEyyYKHQPcAL04FBAWCC0wAw&url=http%3A%2F%2Fjmss.org%2Fjmss%2Findex.php%2Fjmss%2Farticle%2Fdownload%2F420%2F426&usg=AOvVaw07yBFOtjx-hFSzC5Y19-XC
	...A first point with regard to the “alliance system” argument: none of the decisions
for war was mandated by treaty obligations. 4 Germany was obliged by treaty to aid
Austria-Hungary only if one or more of the entente powers engaged in unprovoked
aggression. The Dual Monarchy’s move against Serbia, accordingly, did not in any way
obligate Germany. Italy’s leaders recognized that move against Serbia as a provocation
and, citing the terms of the Triple Alliance, declared their country’s neutrality. Only the
Franco-Russian alliance was unambiguous: both powers agreed to mobilize their forces
in case one or more of the Triple Alliance powers mobilized.


this sounds critical of the French-Russian alliance, which makes Herig sound like he's not a Russian propagandist


	...A second point: nationalism did indeed gain in importance in the nineteenth
century, as did the influence of the popular press, but we have no serious evidence on
their influence on decision makers in 1914. In fact, most papers were manipulated, both
in terms of information and of finances, by their governments and hardly “influenced”
national policy. 5 A third point: it is generally accepted that the “men of 1914” were
smitten with the notion that Charles Darwin’s theories of “natural selection” could be
transferred to the development of human society. Additionally, a great many banking,
business, labor, and political leaders firmly believed that unchecked “militarism” of
necessity had to result in war. But did these “background factors” lead to the decisions
of August 1914? And what were the mechanisms linking these ideologies and the
decisions?


Herwig is making a case in this paper that ultimately the decisions of the people with "war powers" must be analyzed to understand the cause of the war. Seems like here he is calling out arguments he's seen before that don't make complete sense.

Like it isn't enough to say "social Darwinism" caused the war. You would have to make a case for how it influenced decision-making for people with war powers (e.g., "social darinism convinced elitists that war is good and so they all joined a death cult hell-bent on war") (it could happen!)


	...A fifth point: the “imperialism” argument requires further analysis. 6 To be sure, most countries had advocacy groups—Britain’s Empire League, France’s Union coloniale française, Germany’s Kolonialverein, and the Italian Nationalist Association come to mind—and, obviously, the decision makers of most of the powers were driven to some degree by imperialist concerns. That interest often proved an astonishing mistake since the colonies, on the whole, were not profitable. The returns, typically, were limited and the costs of policing, administration and defense often enormous. The value of Imperial Germany’s commerce with its colonies between 1894 and 1913 remained less than what was spent on them. Russia’s investments in Manchuria, despite all efforts to “secure a captive market” there, were limited to two factories— “distilleries that produced liquor mainly for the Russian army of occupation.”


Herwig has problems with the "imperialism" argument.


	...A seventh point: the accident or “slide” thesis sees the Great War as the unintended consequence of decisions aiming for some other outcomes. The most famous statement of this argument came from David Lloyd George, when in December 1920 he claimed that “no one at the head of affairs quite meant war” in July 1914. “It was something into which [the statesmen] glided, or rather staggered and stumbled.” 9 Later, in his postwar memoirs, Britain’s wartime prime minister reiterated this argument of inadvertence: “How was it that the world was so unexpectedly plunged into this terrible conflict? Who was responsible?” His reply became the classic statement of innocence for July 1914: “The nations slithered over the brink into the boiling cauldron of war without any trace of apprehension or dismay.” The theme is then summarized under the heading: “Nobody Wanted War.” 10 In 1976 Henry Kissinger repeated Lloyd George’s “slide” argument: “Nation after nation slid into a war whose causes they did not understand but from which they could not extricate themselves.” 11 In his book, Diplomacy, Richard Nixon’s “Metternich” changed the emphasis slightly, and now put the blame for war on the existence in 1914 of both a political and a military “doomsday machine.”

	I argue strongly that the notions of “inevitability” or of unintended “slide” stand sharply opposed to the evidence available. Furthermore, the argument relativizes, making King George V as culpable as Wilhelm II, Sir Edward Grey as culpable as Count Leopold von Berchtold. And it is a digression. It thereby avoids the essence of decision making: namely, that human beings made the choices. Historian Hew Strachan provides a useful summary: “What remains striking about those hot July weeks is the role, not of collective forces nor of long-range factors, but of the individual.”


Herwig doesn't buy fatalism.

Dude has some good points


MTV on how you might "slide into war," by analogy via condom advertisements: https://adsoftheworld.com/media/print/mtv_sexidents_toilet


Herwig:
	...In the end, Hamilton and I argued another “cause”: that the decision makers of the major powers sought to save, maintain, or enhance the power and prestige of the nation. We referred to this as the strategic argument. Since we published our anthology, we have been chastised by our dear friend, political scientist Ned Lebow, who suggests that in what he calls our “realist international relations” approach, we overlooked the powerful influence of honor, closely linked to “the continuing power of the aristocracy everywhere in continental Europe.” Honor, Lebow argues by referring his work to the Greek classics, “foregrounds the spirit.” 14 There is merit in a modest argument concerning the role of honor in the “hierarchies” of 1914. But once more, we agree with historian Strachan: “By July 1914 each power, conscious in a self-absorbed way of its own potential weaknesses, felt it was on its mettle that its status as a great power would be forfeit if it failed to act.” 15 If we can reach consensus that in each of these settings, a small coterie of no more than a dozen elite leaders made the decision for war, then we can move on to who the decision makers were.


Herwig's argument is basically that each side thought it had to throw down in a war to look tough


	...The 1914 decision first for mobilization and then for war was made by a small inner circle around the Kaiser: Chancellor Theobald von Bethmann Hollweg, War Minister Erich von Falkenhayn, and Chief of the General Staff Helmuth von Moltke, the Younger. Secretary of Foreign Affairs Gottlieb von Jagow and Secretary of the Navy Office Alfred von Tirpitz were temporarily absent from the capital early in July.


Herwig says Holweg, Falkenhayn and Moltke were the ones who decided for war and Mobilization.


	...Unsurprisingly, Nicholas II reached his fateful decision for general mobilization (war) on the advice of a similarly small cadre of advisors: Foreign Minister S. D. Sazonov, Chief of the General Staff N. N. Ianushkevich, Minister of War V. A. Sukhomlinov, and (somewhat of a surprise) Agricultural Minister Alexander Krivoshein.


Sazzano, Ianushkevich, Sukhomlinov and Krivoshein convinced Tsar for war.


	...The secondary and tertiary themes of this conference can be dealt with in straightforward fashion. The “men of 1914” went to war after carefully weighing available options, and then making what German Chancellor von Bethmann Hollweg famously called a “leap into the dark” 33 in the firm belief that war was their only option to remain a great power. Fear was dominant in every decision-making council. Austria- Hungary acted out of a deep suspicion that if the regicide at Sarajevo was not countered with strong military action, it, like the Ottoman Empire, would rush into irreversible decline. Germany feared that time was running against it, with Russia’s “Great Program” of rearmament maturing by roughly 1917. To stand still meant to decline. Its “encirclement” by the entente could only be broken by a powerful but short war, first in the West and then in the East. Russia feared that if it failed to back the “little Slav brother” in Belgrade, its prestige would plummet and it would cease to be a great power. France, with a stagnant birth rate, an old industry falling behind its rivals in relative terms, and mortally afraid of facing another war with Germany alone, feared simply not meeting its alliance commitment to Russia. Italy, Japan and the Ottoman Empire played a waiting game, seeking the right suitor. Britain eventually chose war for fear that a German victory (read, ports in the Channel and along the Bay of Biscay) was not in its national interest. We know today with the 20/20 vision of historical hindsight that the policies decided on in 1914 were the worst possible, that almost any negotiated resolution of the July Crisis would have been preferable to the war that eventuated. But in 1914, the possibilities offered by war were too enticing to be ignored, the costs hardly fathomable.


Does Herwig consider that the decision for war didn't even make sense with the facts available then?


from the "on the causes" section to his "the origins of world war I book:"

	A more complicated inadvertence argument, one going beyond the easy analogy, is that of the "calculated risk." The decision makers planned a limited war, the argument goes, one in which astute deterrence policies would discourage any wider involvement. But then, it is claimed, the prudent calculations somehow - inadvertently - proved mistaken, and a general war resulted. An element of equivalence also appears in this connection, usually as applied to Austria-Hungary, Germany, and Russia. But, as seen in the previous chapters, many key decision makers knew the risk, knew that wider involvement was probable, yet proceeded to take the next steps. Put differently, fully aware of the likely consequences, they initiated policies they knew were likely to bring on the catastrophe.


It looks like he does consider that--also later points out that decision-makers never said anything about the cost of war to their nations.


	...Eight days later, Count Alexander Hoyos, Berchtold's chef de cabinet and the man entrusted with securing Germany's "blank check" to back such a contingency, put it perhaps most bluntly: "It is immaterial to us whether the world war comes out of this." 10 General Conrad von Hotzendorf confided his innermost feeling of the coming European struggle to his mistress, Virginie "Gina" von Reininghaus: "It will be a hopeless struggle, but nevertheless it must be because such an ancient monarchy and such an ancient army cannot perish ingloriously."


	...Austro-Hungarian ambassador to Berlin, Count Laszlo Szogyeny-Marich, that Vienna could count on "Germany's full support," even if "serious European complications" - a diplomatic euphemism for war - resulted. 15 In fact, Wilhelm II counseled the Austrians not to "delay the action" against Serbia, and he informed Hoyos that Germany fully expected war with Russia and for years had made all preparations with this in mind. Bethmann Hollweg likewise pressed Vienna to move aggressively against Belgrade and described this as the "best and most radical solution" to the empire's Balkan troubles. 16 Helmuth von Moltke, the chief of the German General Staff, had stated as early as 1911 that he believed a general European war to be inevitable, and during the July Crisis constantly pressed the case for war. "To wait any longer," the general had lec- tured Conrad von Hotzendorf in May 1914, "meant a diminishing of our chances."


	...The four considered the question of possible Russian intervention in an Austro-Serbian war and accepted the risk, even though this might lead to a general war. If one adds Bethmann HoUweg and Zimmermann to this group, then the decision for war was taken by six men. That decision was not, as the historian Fritz Fischer spectacularly claimed four decades ago, a "bid for world power" but, rather, a nervous, indeed panicked, "leap into the dark" (Bethmann HoUweg) to secure the Reich's position of semihegemony on the Continent.


hmmm

some good stuff in his writings


from his article:

https://www.google.com/url?sa=t&rct=j&q=&esrc=s&source=web&cd=24&ved=0ahUKEwi8lpGUxOXWAhVEyyYKHQPcAL04FBAWCC0wAw&url=http%3A%2F%2Fjmss.org%2Fjmss%2Findex.php%2Fjmss%2Farticle%2Fdownload%2F420%2F426&usg=AOvVaw07yBFOtjx-hFSzC5Y19-XC
	It must be pointed out yet again, that the argument that the war was caused by “military timetables,” so frequently enunciated by historians, 34 is specious. It puts the cart before the horse. Of course, mobilization was critical. Any General Staff that relaxed its mobilization schedule would find itself at a disadvantage. As the French chief of staff, General Joseph Joffre, warned the Cabinet on 31 July 1914, every twenty- four-hour delay in mobilization translated into the loss of fifteen to twenty kilometers of territory. 35 In Vienna, Chief of the General Staff Conrad von Hötzendorf for years had pushed the military option, only to be rebuffed year after year for his “war, war, war” mentality. 36 In Berlin, Generals von Falkenhayn and von Moltke likewise advised both Kaiser Wilhelm II and Chancellor von Bethmann Hollweg on speedy mobilization during the July Crisis. In St. Petersburg, War Minister Sukhomlinov and Chief of the General Staff Ianushkevich also pressed their case for mobilization (and war)—but, again, the final decision was made by the politicians, Tsar Nicholas II and his Council of Ministers. Put differently, the generals’ entreaties remained without result, until the politicians had decided on war. This simple, and yet well documented, fact seems all too often to elude writers on the Great War. Evidence, it seems, should not interfere with prejudice.


Herwig sounds exasperated by certain arguments about the cause of the war that keep coming up


	...Sidney Fay’s shopping list of “big” causes for the war has not survived closer scrutiny. We have all the documents for the July Crisis (save Serbia) that we need to make the claim that in none of the capitals of any of the major power were the issues of alliances, imperialism, militarism, nationalism, or “inadvertence” critically raised. Nor were financial matters—either the eventual cost of mobilization and war, or the shift from a peacetime to a war economy—brought into any of the discussions. The arguments by what everywhere was a small coterie of less than a dozen elite decision makers were almost uniformly in line with the “strategic argument” that Hamilton and I have suggested. There was no “doomsday machine” that hurled either politicians or general and admirals inexorably and irrevocably into war. To be sure, the leaders of especially the great powers acted with a set of beliefs, with a set of assumptions, both spoken and unspoken, in reaching their decisions. They couched their discussions in terms of vital strategic interests, great-power status, honor, prestige, and on occasion alliance commitments. But, as King Vittorio Emanuele III brutally put it in 1908, “The only real strength lies in bayonets and cannon.


Herwig says none of the core decision-makers (as identified by him?) ever spoke of the cost of war.

Seems like there are clear exceptions to this--Kaiser and Tsar both expressed that war would be horrible. Moltke eventually lamented the "rivers of blood," "horror," and "destruction" caused by war, although this was after it already started.

Others tried to stop the war, like Lichnowsky and maybe Georges Louis.

I guess he's saying that these decision-makers made cases that war was in their interests while neglecting the financial costs of the war and failing to criticize some of their assumptions regarding "alliances, imperialism, militarism, nationalism."

goes on to provide counter-examples to the "defense-contractors and bankers did it" argument.


	...In conclusion, it is fair to say that leaders in every capital in 1914 in making their “leap into the dark” blithely ignored virtually all of Carl von Clausewitz’s “irrational” factors: interaction, escalation, friction, chance, and the proverbial “fog of uncertainty.” A young Winston Churchill had experienced this “fog” during the Boer War (1899- 1902) as the British Empire became “a slave of unforeseeable and uncontrollable events.” A decade later, as one of the “hawks” in Prime Minister Asquith’s Cabinet, he ignored his earlier mental note to himself: “Always remember, however sure you are that you can easily win, that there would not be a war if the other man did not think he also had a chance.”



...


from the conclusion to Herwig's "origins of WWI":

	The Russian reaction to events in Vienna and Berlin was key. If Russia had said "no" to any war in Europe, what remained would have been the Austro-Serbian venture, effectively a third Balkan war. But Foreign Minister S. D. Sazonov, as early as 11 July, had demanded that Russia "fulfill her historic mission" and defend Serbia, a threatened "Slavonic nation." To do otherwise, he argued, would transform Russia into a "decadent State" and a "second-place" power. 18 Agriculture Minister A. V. Krivoshein, effectively the leader of the cabinet, claimed that "opin- ion," both public and parliamentary, demanded war. 19 War Minister V. A. Sukhomlinov and Chief of the General Staff N. N. Ianushkevich like- wise demanded a "bold" policy. For Russian leaders, the governing con- sideration was as simple as it was dangerous: To have stood by while Austria-Hungary defeated Serbia would have meant another humiliation, another demonstration of Russian impotence. No ally, and certainly not the French, would have been impressed by such indifference. Potential future allies would have been alienated. Thus, Russia chose to confront Austria-Hungary, the protagonist-perpetrator of the July Crisis.

	...The sequence just spelled out makes it appear, as Luigi Albertini suggested nearly half a century ago, that Russian decision makers bore a major responsibility for enlarging the war, for its transformation from a Balkan to a European venture. But that conclusion would be mistaken, as it ignores the outlooks and choices of Germany's leaders. The men in Berlin, as indicated above, had decided for war, "now or never," in any case.


sounds like he's not a Russian propagandist.


He doesn't make up excuses for Russia like David Allan Rich or Annika Mombauer, nor does he blame everything on Russia like McMeequin.


------

http://www.armchairgeneral.com/forums/showthread.php?t=133320


some guy attacking Herwig


should read this by him: http://www.jstor.org/stable/2538811


------


http://ww1.canada.com/battlefront/the-indecisive-battle-of-the-marne
	Despite the volumes written about the Marne, Canadian historian Holger Herwig wrote a groundbreaking book on the battle five years ago titled, The Marne, 1914. Delving for the first time into formerly inaccessible East German archives, he wrote mainly from the standpoint of the attacker – but it was no apologia.

	To Herwig, the German general staff was mesmerized by the idea of envelopment, hoping to annihilate the French as Hannibal slaughtered the Romans at Cannae. Yet, despite a flexible command structure, the tactics employed by German corps and army commanders could not achieve it. Had it been done right, it could, over the five weeks, have reduced the French and prepared them for defeat.

	Joseph Joffre, chief of the French general staff, had also been obsessed with offensives. Now he proved a genius of orderly retreat, opportunistic repositioning, plugging holes, thickening stretched lines, bringing up reserves – all while eyeing the terrain and the state of the Germans for the moment to counterattack. As the Germans advanced, the French left flank was repeatedly exposed, but the German’s never “turned” it. They missed multiple chances to surround large French formations. Pursuing this phantom led the German right wing to follow the French retreat east of Paris.



------


so, what happened at Marnne? Herwig apparently wants to "set the record straight" on the "stab in the back myth," but regardless of his aims, if he tells the truth his works are very useful.


from battle of Marne book:

	This book is different. For the first time, the Battle of the Marne is analyzed from the perspective of those who initiated it: the seven German armies that invaded Belgium and France. There was no “German army” before August 1914. Thus, the story is told on the basis of what was a massive research effort in the archives of the various German federal contingents: Baden XIV Army Corps fighting in Alsace, Bavarian Sixth Army and Württemberg XIII Corps deployed in Lorraine, Saxon Third Army struggling in the Ardennes, and Prussian First, Second, and Fifth armies advancing in an arc from Antwerp to Verdun. The collapse of the German Democratic Republic in 1989–90 proved to be a boon for researchers: It gave me access to the records of Saxon Third Army at Dresden, and to roughly three thousand Prussian army files long thought destroyed by Allied air raids in 1945, but returned to Potsdam by the Soviet Union in 1988 and now housed at Freiburg. These allow a fresh and revealing look at the Marne.


Are his sources legit? the "Prussian army files" were thought destroyed, but the Soviet Union found them.


	...On the German side, Chief of the General Staff Helmuth von Moltke, First Army’s Alexander von Kluck, Second Army’s Karl von Bülow, and Lieutenant Colonel Richard Hentsch saw the withdrawal from the Marne as a temporary course correction, after which the drive on Paris would be renewed by refreshed and replenished armies. Only Wilhelm II, always prone to sudden mood swings, recognized the Marne as a defeat, as “the great turning point” in his life.


apparently, Moltke, Kluck, Bulow and Hentsch saw the retreat as something temporary in order to regroup. It is strange that Herwig characterizes Wilhelm as "prone to sudden mood swings" but not Moltke


	...Others were the products of ambitious writers and mythmakers: General Édouard de Castelnau’s alleged disobeying of Joffre’s orders to abandon Nancy early in September (when the reverse was the case); General Ferdinand Foch’s putative communiqué that while his position at the Saint-Gond Marshes was “impossible … I attack;” Joffre’s reported command to his staff on the eve of the battle, accentuated by pounding his fist on the operations table, “Gentlemen, we shall fight it out on the Marne;” and General Maurice Sarrail’s outrageous claim that he had refused Joffre’s “order to abandon Verdun” and in the process assumed the title “Savior of Verdun.”


I'll take his word... but how does he know these are "myths?" Ever since reading Sally Marks I cringe whenever I see someone railing about WW1/WW2 "myths."


	...Other myths were much more harmful, and again attest to the centrality of the Marne in the history of what was later called the Great War. Certainly, that of Richard Hentsch, a mere lieutenant colonel on the German General Staff, snatching victory from the hands of Generals von Kluck and von Bülow at the moment of certain triumph by ordering them to retreat behind the Marne was among the most damaging. It obscured for decades the truth behind the German retreat: a flawed command structure, an inadequate logistical system, an antiquated communications arm, and inept field commanders. In the verdict of the Germany official history of the war, Der Weltkrieg 1914 bis 1918, General von Bülow of Second Army had been hesitant and insecure; General von Kluck of First Army, overly aggressive and unwilling to adhere to commands; and Chief of Staff von Moltke, not up to the strains of command. “In the hour of decision over the future of the German people,” the official historians concluded, “its leader on the field of battle completely broke down psychologically and physically.”


Here he lays out his bias. Apparently, he intends to argue against the "Germany official history of the war" conclusion that Hentsch, Kluck, Bulow and Moltke acted strangley and lost a war they could have won.

	
	Perhaps most damaging, after the war numerous former commanders brought to the public the myth that the German armies had not been defeated in the field but rather denied victory by a “sinister conspiracy” on the part of Freemasons and Jews. Erich Ludendorff, the “victor” of the Battles of Tannenberg and the Masurian Lakes in 1914 and Germany’s “silent dictator” from 1916 to 1918, championed this school. In postwar writings, such as The Marne Drama, he assured a defeated nation that the “secret forces of Freemasonry,” the machinations of world Jewry, and the baleful influence of Rudolf Steiner’s “occult” theosophy on General von Moltke’s wife, Eliza, had combined forces against Germany.18 Ludendorff’s absurd claims, of course, helped to launch the infamous “stab-in-the-back” postwar legend. This book judges the performance of the German armies and their commanders at the Marne on the basis of official operational records rather than on mischievous mythmaking.


I guess this is why Herwig intends to argue this. Seems like he wants to settle the "stab in the back myth," which contributed greatly to the rise of Nazism. On the other hand, while Herwig does come-off as honest, he also comes off as a bit too close-minded.

Herwig sounded genuinely indignant at efforts by Nazi-era historians to distort history, and maybe he's made it his mission to counter this and reveal the truth. 

Setting out to counter a specific idea or narrative you think is propaganda is a recipe for getting caught up in bias though, something I have to be careful of and maybe others too...


...


has some info on Moltke's thoughts:

	If all went according to plan, Third, Fourth, and Fifth armies could crush Joffre’s forces between Verdun and Reims. “There, in Moltke’s estimation,” Chief of the Military Cabinet Moriz von Lyncker noted in his diary, lies “the decision” in the war.24 In a letter to his wife, Moltke noted the immediacy of the moment and the excitement of the possibility. “The center armies will engage today and tomorrow; it will be the decisive battle [of the campaign], on whose outcome incredibly much depends.”25 Throughout the morning of 1 September, he demanded “immediate, ruthless prosecution of the attack” southeast by Third and Fourth armies, for “today’s success depends on this.”

	But Moltke was to be denied his Cannae as the French retreated more rapidly than his forces could advance. Shortly after 1:30 PM, Hausen reported that the enemy was rapidly withdrawing in great disorder to the Vesle River and that Third Army was “energetically” renewing its advance, “direction south.” The small fortress of Givet had finally fallen to the Saxons. Duke Albrecht of Württemberg soon followed with similar news from Fourth Army headquarters, noting that “according to prisoner interrogations, dissolution is setting in among French troops.” By 4 PM, even the erstwhile threatened Fifth Army informed the OHL that it had been victorious all along the line and that the adversary was “fleeing” the battlefield.

	Moltke was ecstatic. He had once more defeated the French. And on such a special day! That night, he wrote his wife: “Today, on the day of the Battle of Sedan [1870], we have once again achieved a great success against the French.” The German official history of the war tartly noted: “And yet, basically nothing more had been achieved than that the enemy had once again escaped the hoped-for decisive blow by timely withdrawal.”

does it mean anything that he cares about the "slaughterday of Sedan?" idk but its worth trying to pick out how superstitious he is.

So at first Moltke is ecstatic about victories, but later iirc he gets some "bad news," chickens out and retreats.

If I may guess (maybe I shouldn't but I can't help it): Seidler told him to watch for some kind of omen/made a prediction of some unusual event that would be an omen, and agents associated with him on the field made it come true. Like some "beware the ides of march" kinda shit.

like this: http://nfs.sparknotes.com/juliuscaesar/page_10.html

wait maybe I got the wrong shakespear play

this: https://www.enotes.com/homework-help/explain-how-witches-prophecy-were-full-filled-120421

so if they wanted to fool a superstitious person, they would have had inspiration to draw from at least.

It's a schtick for them, right? Like put out forgeries, make predictions like protocols and the tanaka memorial then make them come true.

Another guess: they had already penetrated the German military with agents, but they wanted someone to take the fall for losing the war, someone expendable, and they chose Moltke.


	Despite the repeated proclamations of “decisive victories,” the never-ending reports of “fleeing” French armies, and the hosannas that accompanied them at the OHL, there were doubters. One of these was Prussian war minister Erich von Falkenhayn. As early as 30 August, while visiting Sixth Army in Lorraine, he had expressed “doubts about the magnitude of successes to date.” He then toured the fronts of the German center armies to gain firsthand knowledge of the course of the war. The “real war” stood in stark contrast with the news bulletins from the front. Early in September, after having inspected the right-wing armies, Falkenhayn grew even more apprehensive. What was being reported “is not a battle won; that is [a] planned withdrawal.” There was no physical evidence of victory. “Show me the trophies or the prisoners of war,” he viciously demanded of Moltke.


Moltke clearly thought there was great success (as shown in his letters), but Falkenhayn thought otherwise. He "viciously" brought up to Moltke that there weren't many prisoners of war. So (this sounds familiar) Moltke might have thought the gains were immaterial, or that the allies were merely withdrawing and regrouping for a push.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Helmuth_von_Moltke_the_Younger
	Although earlier in the campaign, German generals and the press had been proclaiming the campaign as good as won, on 4 September, Moltke was found despondent that the lack of prisoners meant that the Germans had not yet really won a decisive victory.[6]:186–7 Moltke may well have been overly preoccupied with the unsuccessful German offensive in Lorraine, and he issued no orders to the First, Second and Third Armies between 2 and 5 September whilst the Battle of the Marne was in progress.[6]:192


from his letters to his wife:

	Luxembourg, 29 August 1914.

	I am sitting here in the school, where we have also erected our offices here. It is still unfinished and by no means as convenient as in Koblenz. We have neither gas nor electric light, only dull petroleum lamps. The brighter light shines on me from the reports that have arrived from our armies today. In the east a full victory has been won, so many prisoners that the army does not know how to carry them off. In the West, the 2nd Army under Bulow reported a full victory, which has now been won against five and a half French corps.


so apparently at first he thought they had a lot of prisoners of war. Later (after Falkenhayn confronted him?) he become despondent at a lack of prisoners.

	
	While the chief of the General Staff rebuked the war minister for meddling in operational matters, privately he shared Falkenhayn’s concerns. Although his armies had advanced to within ninety kilometers of Paris, Moltke confided his innermost fears to the banker Karl Helfferich. Somehow, the victories did not ring true. “We have had successes, but we have not yet won.”30 Victory, as Carl von Clausewitz had taught, “means the destruction of the opponent’s strength to resist.” And the French continued to “resist.” As a young officer with 7th Grenadier Regiment, Moltke had experienced “decisive victory” and had seen “shattered armies” during the Franco-Prussian War of 1870–71 at Weißenburg, Wörth, and Sedan. In August 1914, there were too few captured guns, too few prisoners of war, he sadly noted. All signs seemed to indicate that the French were conducting an orderly retreat. “The hardest task is still ahead of us!” he warned Helfferich.


does seem like a mood swing--Aug 29 saying "full victory" and so many prisoners "we can't carry them off," later worried about "too few prisoners of war" and an "orderly retreat" by the allies. Possibly, around this time Moltke could start distrusting reports of the progress of battle (and become paranoid?).

	But when Lieutenant Colonel Wilhelm von Dommes, chief of the General Staff’s Political Section, suggested that “senior” members of the staff be dispatched to the fronts to gain personal insight into the overall situation, Moltke rejected this sensible idea. Neither his Supreme War Lord, Wilhelm II, nor his army commanders, he pathetically replied, “deserve such [a sign of] mistrust.”

why would he do that? he was getting conflicting reports, but didn't want to send anyone to verify.

	NOT FORGOTTEN IN THE hectic drive “to the Marne” was the fact that the cherished Cannae might yet be achieved: on the German south wing, or Südflügel, in Lorraine. As early as 21 August, Moltke had sent Crown Prince Rupprecht and his chief of staff, Konrad Krafft von Dellmensingen, a General Directive for the further campaigns of Sixth and Seventh armies: “Pursue in the direction of Épinal.” Krafft, who was doing his best to mount a full pursuit of the retreating French armies after the Battle of the Saar westward, was “thunderstruck” by this new order.32 It made no sense to abandon that pursuit toward Nancy, to halt and reorganize the troops, and then to march them off in an almost straight southerly direction across the face of the French strongholds at Nancy and Lunéville. But Moltke was not impressed by this line of reasoning. Two days later, he informed Rupprecht and Krafft that if the French “continued to fall back,” they were to charge after them “to the last breath of man a[nd] horse,” to cross the Moselle between Toul and Épinal, and then to head for Neufchâteau, on the Meuse.

apparently he gave a bad order Aug 21.

	...The Battle of the Trouée de Charmes ended in a bloody draw on 28 August.39 Thereafter, the front in Lorraine stabilized for almost a week. While Joffre used the relative calm to transfer more units—Georges Levillain’s 6th CD and Louis Comby’s 37th ID—to buttress his left wing around Paris,

did it lead to this? The push and stalemate on left wing allowed allies to transfer more troops to Paris

	Moltke and Tappen devised a new plan for the Bavarian army. It was now to abandon the breakthrough in the direction of Neufchâteau and instead to reduce la position de Nancy, a heavily fortified belt of fortresses, woods, and heights that surrounded the capital of 120,000 inhabitants of the Meurthe-et-Moselle.

	The change in plans had been occasioned in part by Tappen’s “displeasure” that Sixth Army had not already driven through the Charmes Gap.40 Moltke also poured out his venom over the putative “inactivity” of the Bavarians. “You visited Sixth Army,” he shot at General Karl von Wenninger on 30 August. “When will it finally attack?” Bavaria’s military plenipotentiary had indeed just returned from a tour of the front and had been deeply shaken by what he had seen: “burned-down villages, overturned wagons, dead horses, fresh graves.” The countryside was a wasteland of “still smoking, at times still burning ruins where there once were villages, animal corpses, wounded horses with deadly-sad eyes aimlessly wandering, the air filled with burning sweet smells” of the flesh of men and horses. Wenninger reminded Moltke that Rupprecht’s soldiers had suffered greatly during nineteen days of consecutive combat against an enemy “double our strength.” It elicited no sympathy. “That is also the case with other armies a[nd] still they attack!” Moltke snapped back.

this is different from what he said to his wife. He lamented the "rivers of blood" a few days after this.

	Growing more agitated by the minute, he accused the Bavarians of having used improper tactics. “Sixth Army’s losses all too often were unnecessary; the corps simply ran into art[illery] fire—that must come to an end!”


goes on about them brainstorming of what to do with sixth army, Moltke doesn't tell Wnninger he sounds out Max Bauer to check up on them and he has some ideas.

	
	...Tappen led off. “Everywhere the enemy is retreating. … The entire western wing is advancing with greatest marching effort.”He envied the men of First and Second armies. “Those people are conducting a promenade around France!” There would be “no holding along the Marne,” he assured Krafft. The French would be herded off in a southeasterly direction and “driven against the Swiss border.”46 There was no need even to contemplate shuttling forces to northern France, Tappen concluded, as the right wing sweeping toward Paris would bring its crushing might to bear in a few days, perhaps even the very next day!


Tappen overly optimistic, says no need to reinforce right/north wing (the one that Moltke had taken troops from for Eastern front earlier.)


	...Automobiles and cabs could be seen rushing people and their most precious belongings to the southern and western railway stations. There, they jostled for space with incoming French wounded and German prisoners of war. By noon, the Montparnasse Station was packed with ten thousand Parisians seeking to board trains for Rennes, Saint-Malo, and Brest. At the Invalides Station, usually reserved for the military, enough people had booked for Brittany to fill the trains for a week.


they can hear artilery, bombs dropped on Paris, everyone was worried Paris would be taken

	...Since Meaux lay thirty kilometers east of Paris on the Marne River, Joffre’s concept closely paralleled Galliéni’s. Rivers of ink would later be spilled as to which man first arrived at the operational concept that would unleash the Battle of the Marne. In the end, the decision was Joffre’s to make.

another historical debate? not sure of significance 

	...At Galliéni’s urging, Joffre moved the date for the attack up to 6 September—something that he would later regret.

why?

	...The next morning, 5 September, Joffre apprised War Minister Millerand of the seriousness of the hour. The “strategic situation,” he began, was “excellent.” He could not “hope for better conditions” for the offensive. He was determined “to engage all our forces without stint and without reservation to achieve victory.”

so Joffe was planning an offensive for Sep 6., I think to trap Kluck

	
	Joffre’s final thoughts, as always, were with the British. Would they, as Franchet d’Espèrey had assured him, actually “march”? Or would French and Murray yet again find a reason to continue the BEF’s retreat? Joffre moved on two fronts. First, he appealed to the government for a second time to use diplomatic channels to get London to stiffen Sir John’s resolve. Next, he raced off to British headquarters at the Château Vaux-le-Pénil, nearly two hundred kilometers away at Melun, to meet with French. It was a dangerous journey through country infested with enemy cavalry patrols. Arriving at Melun around 2 PM, Joffre made one last appeal for cooperation. It was high drama. He informed Sir John that the French army, down to the “last company,” stood ready to attack the invader to save France. “It is in her name that I come to you to ask for British aid, and I urge it with all the power that is in me.” Growing more agitated with every sentence, Joffre reminded the field marshal that now was the time to move; that the next twenty-four hours would be decisive; that the time for retreating was over; that no man was to yield even a foot of French soil; and that those who could (or would) not advance “were to die where they stood.” He then moved from appeal to taunt. “I cannot believe that the British Army, in this supreme crisis, will refuse to do its part—history would judge its absence severely.” Finally, banging his fist on the table in the little Louis XV salon, Joffre moved from taunt to challenge: “Monsieur, le Maréchal, the honour of England is at stake!”


something to look for: was Joffre more optimistic about the allies chances than a sobre assessment of Germany's armies would lead one to believe? I had figured Foch for an agent of the Okhrana, and maybe there were others. Any agents in the allied military would know if a screw-up on the German side was planned.


	...History records that Joffre, upon reaching his new headquarters at Châtillon-sur-Seine, hailed his staff with the words “Gentlemen, we will fight on the Marne.” That is pure legend.


if a legend, made up by who?


	...The German attack on Reims laid bare in microcosm Chief of the General Staff Helmuth von Moltke’s failure to coordinate his armies. On the afternoon of 3 September, Hausen ordered Hans von Kirchbach’s Saxon XII Reserve Corps to execute a bold strike (Handstreich) on Reims. Kirchbach decided on a nighttime attack by Alexander von Larisch’s 23d RID. It totally surprised the city’s garrison: 45th Reserve Brigade seized Fort Witry and 46th Brigade, Forts Nogent l’Abbesse and La Pompelle, without firing a shot. A cavalry patrol penetrated into the heart of Reims. At midnight, Kirchbach informed Hausen, “Reims in the hands of XII Reserve Corps.”

	Then, the totally unexpected: At 6:30 AM* the next day, Kirchbach’s units came under heavy artillery fire—from Karl von Plettenberg’s 2d Guard Division (GD) of Bülow’s Second Army! Once again, communications had broken down. In the ensuing chaos, in which the Guard over forty-five minutes fired some 170 shells into the city, forty civilians were killed and the Notre-Dame de Reims Cathedral, in which French kings since Clovis had been crowned, was slightly damaged. Hausen at once informed Second Army: “Reims occupied by us. Cease fire.”31 Bülow stopped the shelling—and then imposed an “indemnity” of fifty million francs on Reims, to be doubled if his terms were not accepted within forty-eight hours. Hausen was incensed. In his unpublished memoirs, he tried to imagine the “brouhaha” that would have resulted had their roles been reversed and Saxon artillery fired on the Prussian Guard. He found it “painful” that Bülow had not offered “a word of apology,” not even an “explanation.”32 Interestingly, the minute German troops crossed into France, the reported incidents of francs-tireurs fire and German “reprisals”33 abated. Still, Allied propaganda seized on the shelling of Reims to depict the enemy as “Huns” and “Vandals.”


Bulow decides to attack armies allied with him without explanation

	
	...Bülow looked forward to finally enveloping Fifth Army’s left flank. He became angry on 3 September when he learned that Ferdinand von Quast’s IX Corps of First Army had, in fact, crossed the Marne on his right wing directly in front of Karl von Einem’s VII Corps. He grew downright livid when Kluck, pointedly “disobeying” Moltke’s General Directive of 2 September, late that night announced his intention to continue on a southeasterly course toward Montmirail.34 This would force Second Army to halt its advance so as not to collide with Kluck’s First Army. And it would be at least 7 September before First Army’s advance units could withdraw from the line Montmirail-Esternay. Kluck, Bülow moaned, had become “a thorn in his side.”


Bulow grows upset that armies in his command are not listening to him. He thought Kluck was "disobeying" Moltke's directive (what did Kluck think?)


	The crisis on the Marne at last spurred Luxembourg into action. Late in the evening of 4 September, Moltke and his chief of staff, Lieutenant Colonel Gerhard Tappen, drafted a new General Directive for their field armies. To make certain that it reached the intended recipients, they had it delivered by automobile the next morning as well.


Moltke aware that armies less than orderly, and he sends a new directive and sends it over by car too. Sounds like he was concerned that communications weren't reliable.


	The new orders began with a few general observations. The OHL conceded that Joffre had taken numerous formations out of his right wing at Toul-Belfort and shifted them to his left wing around Paris; that he had simultaneously removed units from in front of German Third, Fourth, and Fifth armies with similar intent; and that he most likely was standing up new formations on his left wing. The original design to “push the entire French army against the Swiss frontier,” Moltke laconically wrote, “was no longer possible.”


the problems and French reinforcements prompt a change in plans from Moltke. From his letters to his wife:

	Luxemburg, 3. September 1914. 

	Today nothing new happened. With the Austrians it is bad, and we can not help them at the moment, have to thank God when we deal with our opponents. God, that soon any event in Russia will take place, which will relieve us of the Muscovite masses.

I guess he was in a more pessimistic mood around this time.


from Hergig's book:

	...The German right wing was now threatened as it hung in the air at Meaux. Worse still, there were agent reports of major French troop concentrations at Lille, of British landings at Ostend and Antwerp, and of eighty thousand Russians having been brought from Archangel to Britain for future deployment in France.

	Of course, it was disinformation, all of it. But to Moltke, these “shadow” forces seemed all too real. He had committed all his active and reserve forces at the start of the war, and they now stood deep in France and East Prussia. The entire Kaiser Wilhelm Canal linking the North Sea to the Baltic Sea, the northwest German coast, and the border with Denmark were open to British invasion since he had moved IX Reserve Corps out of Schleswig-Holstein and attached it to Kluck’s First Army. His prewar fears of a “three-front war” might yet be realized.


Moltke was worried that there were more hidden forces preparing for an invasion, and he somehow ended up believed disinformation that they were lurking and preparing to invade. These fears apparently factored in to his new directive.

This is worth looking into more--is this true, and if it is how did he end up believing bad intelligence?


	The new General Directive ordered Sixth and Seventh armies to tie down as many French forces as possible in Lorraine; Fourth and Fifth armies to continue to “drive” enemy forces facing them in the Argonne Forest “off in a southeasterly direction;” and First and Second armies to hold their positions east of Paris, to “parry offensively any enemy operations emanating from the region around Paris,” and “to lend each other mutual support.” Most opaquely, Third Army was to advance on Troyes—Vendeuvre-sur-Barse and, “as circumstances dictated,” either support First and Second armies “across the Seine in a westerly direction,” or turn south-southeast to buttress the German left wing in Lorraine.35 There is no evidence to suggest that Moltke or Tappen seriously contemplated moving up to the front to direct the final phase of the campaign, or even to dispatch a senior officer from the General Staff for that purpose. One may remember that during the Battle of Guise/Saint-Quentin, Joffre had spent the entire morning at Fifth Army headquarters at Marle overseeing the main French attack.

	In fact, Moltke’s General Directive, when compared with Joffre’s General Instruction No. 5 or No. 6, seems more like a theoretical staff exercise than a formal operations plan. It consisted of general observations on the campaign in the west and of vague suggestions for First and Second armies to hold their present positions and simply ward off enemy attacks; for Seventh and Sixth armies to “hold” on the left wing; and for Fifth, Fourth, and Third armies in the center of the line to operate in concentric sweeps south and southwest. It was an admission that the Schlieffen-Moltke operational concept of the Schwenkungsflügel (pivot wing) enveloping the entire left wing and center of the French army had been abandoned. There were no provisions for coordinating the actions of First and Second armies on the Marne, only obvious and nonspecific suggestions for Kluck and Bülow to “lend each other mutual support.” Nor were there provisions to close the gap between Second and Third armies southeast of Reims. Hausen’s instruction to deploy Third Army as he saw fit to support one of two German flanks some three hundred kilometers apart defied logic.


his new directive is vague, some parts "defy logic." There is nothing to suggest Moltke considered sending someone to direct the final phase of battle. He just sends out this muddled directive. The directive was a clear departure from the Schleiffen plan.


	Finally, the mere hint of rumors concerning British and Russian troop disembarkations in France stampeded Moltke into creating a new Seventh Army in Belgium under General Josias von Heeringen, hastily brought up from commanding the old Seventh Army in Lorraine. Once formed, it was to become the extreme right wing of the German line.


I think this is saying he hastily re-organized troops? or did he send in reserves?


	Within hours, the lack of command and control from Luxembourg became manifestly evident. At the very moment that Moltke and Tap-pen were drafting their General Directive calling on Third Army to drive on Troyes-Vendeuvre, Hausen at 5 PM on 4 September informed the OHL that he had ordered a day of rest for his forces. He repeated the message an hour later. “Troops desperately need a day of rest.” He did not budge from his decision when the two flanking armies, Second and Fourth, informed him that they were resuming the offensive early the next morning. He stood firm even after he belatedly received Moltke’s instruction to advance on Troyes-Vendeuvre at eight o’clock that night. 


Hausen decides to stay behind and rest while other armies advance.


	Just before midnight, he informed the OHL for a third time in less than seven hours that Third Army would rest on 5 September.36 Moltke raised no objections.


why didn't Moltke do anything about it?


	Hausen took pains, both at the time and in his memoirs, to justify his decision.37 The men had reached the limits of their “psychological elasticity” as well as their “physical capability.” Between 18 and 23 August, they had marched 190 kilometers to the Meuse, and thereafter 140 kilometers to the Aisne—much of it under a broiling sun and the last thirteen days during constant combat. Ammunition, food, and uniforms desperately needed to be hauled up to the front. The horses were short on oats and needed to be reshod. Hausen chose not to inform Moltke that there was also a personal reason: He had come down with what was diagnosed as a severe case of “bloody dysentery.”


in his memoirs, Hausen makes up excuses for staying behind.


	The German official history of the war later took Hausen to task.38 By his action, he had exposed the flanks of his two neighboring armies—most precipitously, his halt had created a thirty-kilometer gap between his Third Army and Bülow’s Second Army—and he had disrupted the planned seamless German advance on 5 September. But it failed to mention that with his action, Hausen had lost a splendid opportunity to exploit a twenty-five-kilometer gap that had developed between Foch’s Ninth Army and Langle de Cary’s Fourth Army. Especially Foch’s Army Detachment had taken a terrible pounding from Hausen’s two corps over the last two days: There had been heavy losses among infantry officers, the men were in a state of “serious fatigue” after “exhausting marches” and “the severity of the fighting,” and many of the reserve formations were in what Foch termed “an extremely pitiable state.” The entire region of Sommesous–Sompuis–Vitry-le-François was devoid of major French formations. From his headquarters at Sillery, Foch had informed Joffre that the Army Detachment, about to be reconstituted as Ninth Army, could at best survive two or three days of further attacks by German Third Army. It now gained twenty-four valuable hours in which to prepare its defensive line at the Saint-Gond Marshes and the heights south of Sézanne.


Herwig says the "German official history" didn't criticize Hausen enough!

	
	It is difficult to disagree with the critique of Hausen. Every other German army had marched relentlessly under a searing sun during the last month. Every other army had suffered heavy casualties. Every other army needed rest and resupply. Some had in fact marched much greater distances than Third Army: First Army 500 kilometers and Second Army 440. Some, such as Second Army, had fought numerous more brutal engagements. It is hard to escape the verdict that Hausen simply was not made of the right stuff. For a second time since his failure to strike the flank of French Fifth Army south of Dinant, he failed to press a golden opportunity to break through the French line.


it is suspicious


	Above all, Moltke’s General Directive was a rude shock for First Army, which received the relayed radiogram at 6 AM on 5 September.


comms delayed (by a day?)

	
	It entailed a painful retreat from advanced positions seized after long marches and heavy fighting between the Marne and Oise. Without direct radio communications either to the OHL or to Bülow’s Second Army on his left flank, Kluck had advanced almost in a vacuum. He was thus without insight into the overall situation of the campaign in the west and about to collide with the left wing of Bülow’s Second Army around Montmirail. He sent out no cavalry or aerial reconnaissance to the west, where French Sixth Army had been stood up, and was intent only on pursuing the British and French columns fleeing southward before him.


so the order for Kluck to retreat comes late as he's pursuing an fleeing british and french armies. He had no radio communications with OHL or Bulow (why?) and didn't scout (why?)


	In the late afternoon, Kluck at Rebais had a visitor from Luxembourg: Lieutenant Colonel Richard Hentsch, chief of the OHL’s Intelligence Section. It was Hentsch’s first visit to the front, designed to establish better lines of communication among the field armies.


OHL aware of "communications problems," send Hentsch.

Hentsch sends some bad news back to Cheif of Staff Hermann von Kuhl on many of the armies (how long did this take him? did he just drive around France? I'm not sure what he did/was supposed to do.)

	...Most likely, Joffre had used this stagnation of the fronts on the left and in the center of the German line to shuttle troops to the area around Paris, on Kluck’s right.40 First Army could expect an attack from the west any day.

	Kuhl at once realized that he was “confronted with an entirely new situation.” Without the “breakthrough on the upper Moselle,” the giant Cannae being planned for the French army could not take place. The enemy “was by no means being held [down] everywhere” by Moltke’s other armies; in fact, “large displacements of troops were in progress.” The danger on First Army’s right flank had come out of nowhere. It was real. It had to be addressed at once. “The suggestion, which we had made that morning, of first throwing the French back across the Seine, was finished.”41 Reluctantly, Kuhl agreed with Hentsch that First Army’s four corps had to be withdrawn behind the Marne over the next two days “calmly and in orderly fashion” to a line Meaux–La Ferté-sous-Jouarre–La Ferté-Gaucher. This would then enable Second Army to swing around on its left and face Paris, its right wing on the Marne and its left wing on the Seine.


Hentsch figures Kluck's army is in danger of a serious attack on his right flank. Kuhl agrees and decides things are worse than they thought and that the first army would have to retreat.


	Having reached full agreement with First Army, Hentsch the next day traveled to Second Army headquarters at Champaubert. He repeated his (and Moltke’s) bleak assessment of the German campaign in the west,


so Moltke believed Hentsch's bleak reports


	and bemoaned the lack of four army corps “with which we could win the campaign.”42 One can only wonder whether he regretted the General Staff’s earlier dispatch of Guard Reserve Corps and XI Army Corps to the Eastern Front, as well as of II Corps to besiege Antwerp, and of VII Reserve Corps to invest Maubeuge.


maybe Moltke at this point started regretting sending those corps off to the East. Kuhl sounded like he did, and I'm sure Moltke was aware of that.


	It was now the thirty-fifth day of mobilization. Schlieffen had prescribed victory on the thirty-ninth or fortieth day.


so Moltke knows there is a timetable, and this is the moment of victory or defeat. He says so in his letters. So why does he decide to retreat?


	...THE BRUTAL HEAT FINALLY broke on 5 September. The first engagement in what came to be called the Battle of the Marne took place forty kilometers northeast of Paris.


says it actually started 5 September


	...Maunoury had been wounded in the Franco-Prussian War (1870–71) and had served for a while as military governor of Paris. He was now all that stood between Kluck and the capital. He planned to march his ten infantry divisions to a position northeast of Meaux, and from there to strike Kluck’s right flank the next day along the north bank of the Marne. Louis Gillet’s reserve cavalry brigade had scouted Maunoury’s route of advance toward Meaux and found no German forces.45 It thus came as a total surprise when around noon a hail of 77mm artillery shells from the heights of Monthyon, northwest of Meaux, burst into the thick marching columns of 14th Infantry Division.

	The unsuspected adversary was Hans von Gronau. Detached to guard First Army’s right flank, IV Reserve Corps stood to the north of, and at right angles to, Kluck’s main force around Barcy and Chambry.

	...Still, the vigilant Garnier kept up his patrols and detected French cavalry, some scouts, and a strong column of infantry marching toward Montgé-en-Goële, halfway between Paris and Meaux. Were these merely French advance guards? Or units of the Paris Garrison out on patrol? Or had Joffre somehow managed to cobble together a new army north of the capital?

	Without aerial reconnaissance and with the western horizon blocked by a series of wooded hillocks between Saint-Soupplets and Penchard, the safe option was to stay put and await developments. But the wily Gronau threw out the textbook and made a quick decision that most likely would have resulted in failure at most staff colleges. “Lieutenant-Colonel, there is no other way out,” he informed his chief of staff, Friedrich von der Heyde, “we must attack!”


Frenc Manoury marches to attack Kluck's right-flank. von Gronau, guarding 1st armies right flank, decides to attack him, even though they didn't have good recon and weren't sure how large the force was. This was an unusual decision by Gronau. They fight a bloody battle.


	...Gronau’s swift action proved critical to the course of the Battle of the Marne. It denied Joffre the all-important element of surprise.51 Instead of Maunoury striking Kluck’s right flank unawares, it was now French Sixth Army that had been taken by surprise. Moreover, the action had taken place a full eighteen hours before Joffre originally had planned to mount his great offensive between Verdun and Paris, thus throwing his overarching concept into question. Gronau and his band of valiant reservists, in the words of the German official history, had “with one bold stroke” finally brought clarity: “The German army’s right flank was, in fact, seriously threatened.”52 And “with a rare appreciation of the strategic realities,”53 Gronau understood that he was vastly outnumbered (about six to one) and withdrew IV Reserve Corps to relative safety ten kilometers behind the small Thérouanne stream.


Gronau denied Joffe "element of surprise," so apparently did the right thing even though he didn't have enough information. This incident confirmed Hentsch's report that the 1st armies right flank was indeed threatened (was Hentsch somehow all the intel they had? I don't get it.)


	...Shortly before midnight on 5 September, the telephone rang at First Army headquarters at Rebais. It was Gronau with news of the encounter with Maunoury’s Sixth Army. Chief of Staff von Kuhl, who at 7 PM had only received spotty news from Aircraft B65 that a minor engagement had occurred near Meaux,54


aircraft reported a "minor engagement," but Gronau reported a larger encounter.


	at once grasped the gravity of the situation. There were but two choices—regroup and retreat to defensive positions to protect the German outer right flank, or blunt the French attack with a counteroffensive. Kuhl chose the latter. Kluck agreed: “Wheel 1. Army to the right at once, quickly form up on the right, attack across the Ourcq.”55 Just after midnight, Kluck and Kuhl ordered Alexander von Linsingen’s II Corps to quick-march from south of the Marne to west of the Ourcq in the direction of Lizy-sur-Ourq and Germigny-l’Évêque, there to buttress Gronau’s position behind the Thérouanne.


so they decide the right flank of the 1st army is threatened and order a counter-attack to "blunt the French attack."


	...It was a daring decision with potentially deadly ramifications. For, in the process, a fifty-kilometer-wide gap developed in First Army’s line between Varreddes and Sancy-lès-Provins, at the southern limit of the German advance. Appreciating the danger, Kuhl rushed Manfred von Richthofen’s I Cavalry Corps and Georg von der Marwitz’s II Cavalry Corps into the breach. These rear guards were to defend first the trench of the Grand Morin River, then, if that fell, the trench of the Petit Morin, and finally the trench of the Marne. Gronau established a line of defense between Vincy-Manoeuvre and Varreddes.


this was a problem though since it created a gap in the 1st army's line. They knew this but decided to fix it by rushing cavalry into the gap.


	Knowing that major reinforcements were on the way, he sought out a comfortable ditch and took a nap.

	AT DAWN ON 6 September, 980,000 French and 100,000 British soldiers with 3,000 guns assaulted the German line of 750,000 men and 3,300 guns between Verdun and Paris. Joffre, who had been able to reinforce his armies with a hundred thousand reservists, issued the troops a stirring appeal. “The salvation of the country” was in their hands. There could be “no looking back.” The sacred ground of France was to be held “at whatever cost;” “be killed on the spot rather than retreat.”


so while the German forces are split up, Joffe orders a major attack.


	...At first, both Kluck and Bülow took the forces attacking Gronau’s corps to be nothing more than French rear guards covering Joffre’s withdrawal on Paris

	...The Germans were disabused of the notion of encountering only French rear guards during the night of 6 September. Men from Duke Albrecht of Württemberg’s 30th IB, Fourth Army, had found Joffre’s stirring appeal to his troops near Frignicourt, south of Vitry-le-François.62 Albrecht’s headquarters, which had a telephone link to Luxembourg, immediately passed the document on to Moltke. Sometime around 8 PM, the chief of the General Staff sent it out to the other army commands. He did not counter it with a stirring appeal of his own. He was content simply to hand it over to the press with a quixotic message that the war needed to end with a peace that would “for all foreseeable future” see Germany “undisturbed by any foe.”


attack on sep 6. The attack comes as a surprise to them anyway? apparently they underestimated the the forces attacking the right flank of the 1st army. Moltke doesn't sound very encouraging with his message to the press.


	There was now no doubt that the Allies’ retreat had ended and that they had gone on the attack. Specifically, Gronau’s battle with vastly superior French forces the day before pointed to an attempt to envelop the German right wing.

	Chief of Operations Tappen, just promoted to the rank of colonel, was delighted. The “Day of Decision” was finally at hand. He burst into a meeting of his operations and intelligence officers: “Well, we finally get hold of them. Now it will be a fierce fight. Our brave troops will know how to do their job.” No more retreats, no more avoiding battle by the enemy. It was now just a matter of applying “brute force.”


Tappen is optimistic and thinks they just have to fight them.


	Kluck and Kuhl faced another major decision. Should they break off the battle and fall back from their advanced position in the acute angle of the Marne and the Ourcq? Should they, together with Bülow’s Second Army, withdraw to defensive positions between the Marne and the Ourcq and there parry Joffre’s flanking maneuver? Or should they continue the battle and seek a quick, decisive victory over Maunoury’s Sixth Army? Yet again, both opted to blunt the French thrust with a counteroffensive.


Kluck and Kuhl decide on a counter-offensive


	Realizing that First Army’s three (under strength) corps on the Ourcq were too weak to mount a counterattack against 150,000 French soldiers, they turned to Bülow. Shortly after 8 AM on 7 September, they telegraphed Second Army headquarters at Champaubert: “II, IV and IV Reserve Corps heavily engaged west of the lower Ourcq. Where III and IX Army Corps? What is your situation?” No reply. They repeated the message, adding “Urgently request answer.” It crossed paths with a radiogram from Second Army wishing to know, “What is your situation?” Finally, a third request from Kuhl, “Engagement III and IX Corps at the Ourcq urgently required.”65 No reply.


but Bulow isn't responding


	The German army’s prewar neglect of communications and control was glaringly apparent.66 During the Battle of the Marne, Luxembourg had direct telephone connections via Fourth Army with Fifth, Sixth, and Seventh armies on the relatively stagnant German left and center. But it could communicate with the fluid First and Second “strike” armies only by way of a single wireless set, which was prone to interruptions by weather and to jamming by French field stations and the Eiffel Tower.


jammed with the help of the Eiffel Tower! Who says the Eiffel Tower should be turned into scrap metal? It helped save Paris!

still, the communication issues and Bulow not responding seems off. Maybe there's more to this? It seems amazing they could lose communications with an entire army.


	Messages often arrived so mutilated at Bülow’s and Kluck’s headquarters that they had to be re-sent three or four times. Field telegraph stations managed to get only twenty-nine of fifty-nine reports from First Army’s fliers to Kluck and Kuhl between 1 and 5 September. There were no electronic ties between First and Second armies, or between them and their army corps and cavalry corps. ...No one thought of using airplanes to pass important orders along the line. The distance between Bülow’s headquarters at Montmort and Kluck’s at Vandrest (and later Mareuil), after all, was a mere fifty-five kilometers, or half an hour by air. The two commanders were thus effectively cut off from discussing the rapidly developing situation with each other—and with Moltke, who was 435 kilometers by automobile* away from Second Army headquarters and 445 from First Army headquarters.


they did a bad job with ensuring communications between them.


	Interestingly, Tappen rejected all suggestions that the OHL, or at least a small operations staff, move up to the front behind the German right wing on the grounds of “technical difficulties as well as stodginess.”68 One can only speculate whether Moltke, for his part, remembered that in 1866 his uncle had supervised the movements of his armies during the Battle of Königgrätz from the Roskosberg, above the Bistritz River, and that he had likewise led from the front in 1870 during the Battle of Sedan from a ridge high above the Meuse River near Frénois.


Tappen rejects requests that OHL moves to the front to direct things. Moltke doesn't do this either for some reason.


	...Maunoury vigorously resumed the offensive at 7 AM on 7 September.69 In the middle of the front, Gronau’s fatigued IV Reserve Corps, stiffened by the arrival of Sixt von Arnim’s 15th Brigade, threw Léon Lombard’s 63d RID into panic with a hurricane bombardment followed by massed infantry charges. Only a heroic counterattack by Colonel Robert Nivelle’s 5th Artillery Regiment of 45th ID—firing shells from its 75s into the massed German infantry at the rate of twenty rounds per minute—prevented a complete collapse.* French Fifth Group of Reserve Divisions likewise was driven back, and its commander, de Lamaze, seriously considered falling back on Paris.


on Sep 7 Gronau does a good job holding back the French and they almost consider falling back. Meanwhile, apparently Bulow is still doing nothing.

	...At 10 AM on 7 September, First Army headquarters received word that an aviator had spotted two columns of British soldiers slowly moving north out of the Forest of Crécy toward the joint of German First and Second armies.70 Kluck and Kuhl could wait no longer. Still without a reply from Bülow to their request for reinforcements, they seized the initiative and ordered Ewald von Lochow’s III Corps and Quast’s IX Corps, both temporarily assigned to Bülow, to leave Second Army’s right wing in broad daylight and quick-march to the Ourcq.71 For Kuhl had decided to master what now threatened to be assaults on both his wings by way of an all-out offensive on the right, designed to crush Maunoury’s Sixth Army before the BEF could engage German First or Second army.


Kluck and Kuhl spot more forces closing in and decide to take initiative to order some of Bulow's forces to engage them.


	Incredibly, neither Kluck nor Kuhl was aware that General von Bülow shortly after midnight on 7 September had already pulled back his right wing, fearing that his soldiers were too exhausted to ward off another French frontal attack. Bülow withdrew III and IX corps of First Army as well as his own X Reserve Corps fifteen to twenty kilometers behind the shelter, such as it was, of the Petit Morin River—some eight hours before First Army’s duumvirate ordered them to march to the Ourcq. Bülow radioed Moltke of his action at 2 AM. He declined to inform Kluck via dispatch rider. 


Bulow had already decided to withdraw on his own! he says his soldiers were too tired. Somehow he is able to radio this to Moltke, but declines to inform Kluck. All the while, Kluck and Kuhl were somehow unaware that this had happened.

I can't imagine what his excuse for this could be.

	
	By his action, Bülow created a gap of some thirty kilometers between the right wing of Second Army and the left wing of First Army. Kluck and Kuhl, by recalling III and IX corps, widened that gap to about fifty kilometers. Failure to communicate once again bedeviled the German army commanders on the right pivot wing.


Is this a normal thing to happen? This doesn't seem normal.


	Having pulled back his right wing, Bülow next ordered an attack by his left wing. Realizing that Second Army was down to the strength of only three full corps, he once again enlisted the help of two Saxon infantry divisions from Hausen’s Third Army.72 General von Einem, commanding VII Corps on Second Army’s right, thought the plan madness: At the very moment that the enemy might discover and then exploit the German gap astride the Petit Morin, “Bülow shifts the center of gravity to his left wing!” What use would victory there be, he mused, “if we are enveloped on the right and separated from First Army?”


Burlow decides to attack with his left flank and make things worse.


	In fact, the German position on the Marne and the Ourcq defies rational analysis.


ok, so it isn't normal


	Without firm direction from the OHL, both commanders had developed their own operational concepts. Bülow insisted that First Army’s primary function, as laid down in Moltke’s General Directive of 5 September, was to protect his right flank against a possible French sortie out of le camp retranché de Paris. Thus, it was paramount that Kluck break off the battle with Maunoury and shift his army left to join up with Second Army’s right wing. As well, it was critical that Hausen’s Third Army defeat Foch’s Ninth Army on Bülow’s left flank before Fanchet d’Espèrey’s Fifth Army could exploit Second Army’s exposed right flank. Kluck, on the other hand, insisted that the only way to break the French offensive was to destroy Maunoury’s Sixth Army before the British, whose fighting capabilities he by and large denigrated, could take their place on the left flank of French Fifth Army south of the Grand Morin River.


Both Bulow and Kluck, without communicating with each other, develop completely different ideas for the strategy at Marne. Presumably, Moltke's confusing "directive" didn't do much to help. Even still, Bulow and Kluck don't come off as especially eager for victory...


	Bülow made no effort to coordinate the operations of the two “strike” armies or to bring Moltke fully into the calculus.74


Bulow doesn't bother to ask Moltke to advise


	Just after 7 PM on 7 September, Richthofen’s cavalry corps reported that British advance guards had crossed the Grand Morin at La Ferté-Gaucher. They were about to enter the gap in the German line.


Basically, Moltke gives nonsense/confusing intstructions and Bulow and Kluck interpret it in a way that amounts to spreading their cheecks for British penetration


	For the Germans, 7 September was the critical day in the Battle of the Marne. Kluck and Kuhl, as noted previously, had hastily taken II and IV corps out of the line on the Marne and rushed them north to aid Gronau’s corps on the Ourcq. Bülow had then withdrawn III and IX corps as well as X Reserve Corps behind the Petit Morin—only to have had Kluck and Kuhl eight hours later order III and IX corps to leave Bülow’s right wing and to march north in order to help defeat Maunoury’s French Sixth Army. None of these orders was shared, much less discussed beforehand. In the process, as is well known, Bülow, Kluck, and Kuhl had created a fifty-kilometer-wide gap between First and Second armies—one into which the BEF was slowly stumbling as it headed north between Changis, on the Marne, and Rebais, south of the Petit Morin. The eighth of September would thus see two distinct battles: Kluck versus Maunoury on the Ourcq, and Bülow versus Franchet d’Espèrey on the two Morins.


the orders leading up to the 50 km gap weren't shared or discussed beforehand. 


	Kluck’s bold, aggressive decision remains highly controversial. He had already “disobeyed” Moltke’s General Directive to remain “echeloned” to the right and behind Second Army. Now he literally snatched two corps from Bülow’s right wing and rushed them to the Ourcq. To Kluck, time was the critical factor. ...Kluck answered those rhetorical musings by ordering “every man and every horse” west of the Ourcq to deliver the final and fatal blow to Maunoury’s Sixth Army. It was a last-minute, all-out gamble. The campaign in the west hung on it.


Kluck had "disobeyed" Moltke's directive and was borrowing troops from Bulow before to go off-script


	At Luxembourg, General von Moltke yet again was on the verge of panic. “Today a great decision will come about,” he wrote his wife, Eliza, on 7 September, “since yesterday our entire army is fighting from Paris to Upper Alsace. Should I have to give my life today to bring about victory, I would do it gladly a thousand times.” He lamented the “streams of blood” that had already been shed and the “countless” homes and lives that had been destroyed. “I often shudder when I think of this and I feel as though I need to accept responsibility for this dreadfulness. …”75 These were not the words of a great captain.


maybe the situation was salvagable, but Moltke was instead fretting about it. While all this was going on, not once did he act to take command of his disorganized army.


this picture is good: http://images.mentalfloss.com/sites/default/files/styles/insert_main_wide_image/public/marne_sept_7.jpg

position as of Sep 7 1914

	...Although minor in itself, the brilliant French tactical action at Marchais-en-Brie constituted what historian Sewell Tyng has labeled one of those “there the battle was won” defining moments of the large Battle of the Marne.81 For the French assault had tremendous operational and even strategic ramifications. With German X Reserve Corps completely flanked from the west, Montmirail was indefensible. Moreover, Eben’s IX Reserve Corps was outflanked on both sides.


this battle was said to have been important, with bad ramifications for the Germans


	Of much greater concern to Bülow and his chief of staff, Otto von Lauenstein, was that Second Army’s right wing, recently denuded of two corps bound for the Ourcq, was further jeopardized. They ordered VII Corps and X Reserve Corps to fall back ten kilometers east to the line Margny–Le Thoult. It was a major mistake. The two corps on Second Army’s right flank now stood from north to south, facing west, and were thus utterly unable to shift right and close the gap with Kluck’s First Army. In fact, that gap as a result had widened by fifteen kilometers.82 Bülow’s right wing “was no longer threatened, it was turned.” The “path to the Marne” lay open for the left-wing corps of French Fifth Army—and the BEF.


why did they do that? their troops keep getting bad orders. Couldn't they have retreated more towards Kluck's army?

Herwig spends some time on Haig of the allies advancing slower than they thought they would


	Exasperated, Galliéni at Paris dispatched Lartigue’s 8th ID south of Meaux to establish contact between the BEF and Franchet d’Espèrey’s Fifth Army.88 It was a murderous advance. The Germans held the seventy-to one-hundred-meter-high ridges above Meaux, their machine guns well concealed on the wooded crests of the Marne, and poured lethal fire into the French ranks crossing the valley floor below them.

	On the diplomatic front, Joffre moved quickly to intervene when it seemed to him that Galliéni was driving the British too hard and thereby arousing “the touchiness of Field Marshal French.”


Gallieni is frustrated by this, Joffe says he was driving the British too hard

So, they advanced into the gap, but slowly.


	At 10:10 AM on 8 September, German Aircraft B75 reported that the BEF was advancing “more rapidly” from La Ferté-Gaucher and Rebais in the general direction of Saint-Cyr-sur-Morin. Horace Smith-Dorrien’s II Corps was in the center of the line, flanked by Haig’s I Corps on its right and “Putty” Pulteney’s III Corps on its left.90 It was another sunny day. By noon, the BEF had reached the Petit Morin, a shallow stream barely six meters wide. The Royal Flying Corps reported only small enemy columns ahead. Marwitz’s cavalry corps fought a brief but gallant rear action—and headed north. Then a “violent thunderstorm” with “torrents of rain”91 slowed the BEF’s further advance. An impatient Joffre at 8 PM dashed off a communiqué to Sir John French confirming the gap between the two enemy armies and deeming it “essential” that the BEF exploit this by marching northeast before the Germans reinforced their cavalry with infantry and artillery.


Joffe says its important to exploit the gap before the Germans reinforce. A thunderstorm slows them down. Dunno how great meterology was then but you'd think they could have predicted that


	...In three days and while outnumbering the enemy at least ten to one, “Johnnie” French’s army had advanced just forty kilometers. The BEF’s importance lay in its role as an “army in being,” to borrow a naval term.


Johnnie French's army does a bad job of advancing

Galieni becomes worried and ass how to evacuate the civilian population, he is more pessimistic. Joffre gets angry at him.


	...The Allied advance into the fifty-kilometer-wide space between First and Second armies drove Moltke ever deeper into despair. He issued no orders to either Bülow or Kluck on 6 or 7 September. Instead, he withdrew into a world of self-pity and grief.


why? he's faced with a problem he did nothing to stop and instead of fixing it he does nothing? The advance was slower than it should have been and he does nothing but mope.

	
	The “burden of responsibility of the last several days,” he wrote his wife, was impossible even to name. “For the great battle of our army along its entire front has not yet been decided.” The “horrible tension” of the last few days, the “absence of news from the far distant armies,” and “knowing all that was at stake” was “almost beyond human power” to comprehend. “The terrible difficulty of our situation stands like an almost impenetrable black wall in front of me.”


was he still not getting updates on his armies? clearly he was getting something, enough to be despondent.


	The only bright spot on the horizon was that on 6 September Hans von Zwehl had forced Fortress Maubeuge to surrender: 412 officers and 32,280 ranks were taken prisoner and 450 guns added to the German arsenal.96 Zwehl’s three brigades of VII Corps were now freed up, perhaps to plug the gap between the Marne and the Ourcq. Wilhelm II, returning from a tour of the front near Châlons-sur-Marne, was delighted by the news but alarmed by Moltke’s pessimism. “Attack, as long as we can—not a single step backwards under any circumstances. … We will defend ourselves to the last breath of man and horse.”


So this is the critical moment of a carefully timed push. They are in the middle of major battles with the allies. There is a gap in their line that the allies are slowly filling, but the Germans just leanred that they had a victory and forces are freed up to plug the gap. Wilhelm is happy from the news and wants Moltke to attack. And what does Moltke do?


Hewig wants to leave us in suspense...

	
	Joffre ordered Foch to defend the Saint-Gond Marshes and thereby cover Fifth Army’s right flank at all cost with Pierre Dubois’s IX Corps (three divisions) and Joseph Eydoux’s XI Corps (four divisions). Joffre’s major concern was the gap between Foch’s Ninth Army and Langle de Cary’s Fourth Army.


http://images.mentalfloss.com/sites/default/files/styles/insert_main_wide_image/public/marne_sept_7.jpg

	
	...Bülow’s X Corps had pounded Dubois’s IX Corps at Saint-Prix and his Guard Corps had violently assaulted IX Corps at Bannes on 6 and 7 September; he now urged Third Army to exploit the gap. It would require a major effort by an army down to 2,105 officers and 81,199 ranks.100

	Yet again, Hausen prevaricated. It was the dilemma of Dinant all over again. On his right, Plettenberg’s 2d Guard Division had stalled at Normée. Bülow again called for relief. “Strongest possible support 3 Army urgently desired. The day’s decision depends [on this].” On Hausen’s left, Heinrich von Schenck’s XVIII Corps of Fourth Army likewise had been stopped in its tracks around Vitry-le-François, and Duke Albrecht called for assistance.102 Whom to obey? A royal prince? Prussia’s senior army commander? Or Moltke, who had ordered Third Army to march on Troyes-Vendeuvre? As at Dinant, Hausen decided to please all suitors: He divided his army. He ordered Maximilian von Laffert’s XIX Corps to support Schenck’s VIII Corps at Glannes; he approved Karl d’Elsa’s prior decision to rush 32d ID as well as the artillery of 23d ID to aid the Guard Corps at Clamanges-Lenharré; and he instructed his remaining forces (mainly 23d ID and 24th RID released by the fall of Fortress Givet) to continue on to Troyes-Vendeuvre. He declined to use Fourth Army’s direct telephone to Luxembourg to seek Moltke’s input.

	Hausen justified his actions in his unpublished memoirs. Orders were orders. He could not disobey a direct command from Bülow, or from Duke Albrecht, or from Moltke, even if it meant splitting his army into three separate entities.


Hausen once again does something nonsensical while other armies need assistance. Apparently, Hausen is not a human being, but an automaton who must follow all orders as literally as possible, no matter how disastrous the result. Faced with conflicting orders, he decides to split his army and declines to call Moltke for advise.


	For a third time since Fumay and Sommesous–Sompuis–Vitry-le-François, Hausen lost a splendid opportunity to drive an attack through the French line. The day of rest he had generously given his troops on 5 September now came home to roost: He was too far behind Second and Fourth armies on his flanks to rush to the immediate aid of either, and he was too far from the fighting front to penetrate Foch’s weak spot. By dividing his forces, he forwent any attempt to envelop French Ninth Army. By having halted on 5 September, he had given away the chance to break through the fifteen-kilometer-wide gap between Foch’s Ninth Army and Langle de Cary’s Fourth Army.104 One can only imagine what Hans von Gronau would have done under the circumstances.


He doesn't ask for new orders, and instead interprets conflicting orders in a way that causes him to miss major opportunities. Although he had no problem earlier disobeying direct orders earlier when his army needed to "rest," even though other armies had marched for longer than his.


	...Bülow promised 2nd GD (later also 1st GD) for Kirchbach’s right wing. Hausen now commanded six and one-half army corps.


Hausen hatches a plan to charge French artillery with bayonettes, and somehow he now has command of six and 1/2 army corps. Burlow gives him some.

Why did they do this? did they not think he was incompetent from his actions before?


	The men advanced against Joseph Pambet’s 22d ID and parts of Maurice Joppé’s 60th RID between Sompuis and Vitryle-François with bayonets fixed, rifles unloaded, and breechblocks secured in their bread pouches. At 3 AM Arnold von Winckler’s 2d GD followed against René Radiguet’s 21st ID, despite Winckler’s initial grave concern that Hausen’s gamble could cost him his division. Larisch’s 23d RID followed at 3:30 AM. A pale moon shone as the men silently moved through “glorious vineyards” and marshes and over chalky plains. As soon as they collided with the enemy, bugles and drums called out the attaque brutale.

	The 2d Guard waded across the Somme at Normée, and then charged the French lines with “shouts of Hurrah, bugles blaring and drums beating.”


didn't they say earlier they were worried gun-shots might wake them up? I don't get it

but it turns out it worked

Foch's amry got messed up, his "entire right wing seemed to have collapsed"


	...Foch deemed its situation “critical.” But, as historian Hew Strachan has put it, he “doggedly refused to admit it.”113 The front held, battered but unbroken as it withdrew.


	...Interestingly, Foch’s putative comment, “Hard pressed on my right, my center is falling back, impossible to move, situation excellent. I attack,” is yet another legend of the Battle of the Marne. But as President Poincaré noted in a reply to Foch’s address to the French Academy in February 1920, while some authorities treated the text as “authentic, I have not the courage to disillusion them.” After all, “if you never actually wrote this optimistic message it was anyhow in your thoughts.”


Foch regroups, and there might have been some "myth-making" about Foch's resolve (other sources say he didn't really know what he was doing...)


	...As dawn broke, Saxon 103d RIR entered Sommesous “at a magnificent run and with shouts of Hurrah.”117 Then reality hit. The men were hungry, as they had left their knapsacks behind to lighten the load. A hot sun began to beat down on them, and there was little water on the chalky Catalaunic plain to sustain an army. Foch ordered Dubois’s IX Corps and Eydoux’s XI Corps furiously to counterattack, even as they retreated.118 The Germans had no artillery with which to subdue the flanking fire. During the nighttime crossing of the Somme, units had lost their way and tumbled chaotically together. The regiment lost 104 dead or missing and 224 wounded at Sommesous. By nightfall, it had not reached any of its goals for the day.

	Hausen that night judged the attack to have gone “generally satisfactorily.” Indeed, he had scored what seemed a stunning victory in one of the classic bayonet charges of the entire war.119 Group Kirchbach’s three divisions had pushed Foch’s right wing back ten to thirteen kilometers along a twenty-kilometer front, and his center away from the southern exits of the Marais de Saint-Gond. Such a feat would not be repeated until the great German spring offensives of 1918. But privately, Hausen noted that the advance had been “a difficult and slow forward movement from one stand of woods to another, from farm to farm, from one hillock to another.”120 It was the sort of “siege-style” warfare that Deputy Chief of Staff Martin Köpke had warned Alfred von Schlieffen about in 1895.


it turns out the charge didn't do that much

the soldiers became exhausted and the French start attacking them


	...While Third Army released no casualty figures for that night’s assault, overall losses were roughly 20 percent. The 2d GD recorded 179 officers and 5,748 men killed or wounded. Each regiment of 1st GD lost about a thousand; many companies were down to just fifty men.123 For the period from 1 to 10 September, d’Elsa’s XII Corps reported 3,621 killed and 3,950 wounded; Laffert’s XIX Corps, 2,197 killed and 2,982 wounded; and Kirchbach’s XII Reserve Corps, 766 killed and 1,502 wounded.124 The most recent research gives only broad figures: 4,500 casualties for Group Kirchbach and 6,500 for Group d’Elsa.


That sounds bad. It sounds like the charge was pretty bad for the Germans.


	General von Hausen’s supporters have depicted him as a “gifted army commander” who sought to bring about a small Cannae at the eleventh hour, and they have seen in his night attack an example of operational art to be emulated by the rest of the German army.126 Yet even at the tactical level, its wisdom remains questionable in light of the fact that it was carried out across a river at night, without reconnaissance of enemy positions, without prior shelling, without artillery support during the advance, and with unloaded rifles. At the operational level, it was even less spectacular. The staggered start had resulted in an uneven advance


Hausen screws up once again


	By 10 AM, Planitz’s 32d ID lagged four kilometers behind Plettenberg’s Guard Corps, marching on Connantray-Vaurefroy. Hour after hour, Plettenberg waited for Planitz to close ranks—in vain. When 2d GD took Fère-Champenoise at 4:30 PM, Saxon 32d ID was nowhere to be seen. Plettenberg was forced to halt his advance at Corroy for fear of exposing his left flank.127 In fact, for reasons that neither Planitz, nor Kirchbach, nor Hausen explained after the war,* for eight hours Planitz had “regrouped” 32d Division, echeloned in depth! It was the second major mistake in two days, following closely on the heels of Hausen’s earlier splitting of his army. And like that earlier decision, it denied the Saxons the chance to exploit the gap between French Third and Fourth armies still guarded by only d’Espée’s 9th Cavalry Division.


Planitz decides to stay behind for the push


	Nor had the advance of Larisch’s 23d ID been a model of operational effectiveness.129 After jumping off late at 6 AM, it had advanced on Sommesous. At 1:30 PM, Kirchbach ordered it to point southeastward toward Montépreux. Larisch did not execute this order until 2:45 PM, and then marched through woods northeast of Montépreux. Kirchbach re-sent his order. Larisch advanced at 4:45 PM, but again toward the northeast. When he finally arrived at his designated rendezvous with Planitz, 32d ID was nowhere in sight. As a result, the Saxons missed an opportunity to break through the gap between Pambet’s 22d ID and 23d RID and turn Foch’s right flank. Hausen and Third Army, to stay with Winston Churchill’s term, thus missed their third “climacteric.”


Hausen's divisions are going off into the woods and doing their own thing


	ON THE OURCQ, two events straight from the pages of a Hollywood movie script took place during the night of 7–8 September. First, the French retreat to Nanteuil-le-Haudouin created a fascinating “what if?” scenario. Sordet’s cavalry corps, battered and beaten, had joined Déprez’s 61st RID in abandoning Sixth Army’s left wing. Maunoury was furious. He ordered the cavalry corps back into line by way of a forced night march—and then relieved Sordet of command.


why does this not happen on the German side


	The latter had failed to carry out Maunoury’s explicit order to mount a raid into Kluck’s rear around La Ferté-Milon. Gustave de Cornulier-Lucinière’s 5th CD, with sixteen hundred sabers, ten guns, and 357 troops riding bicycles, was then sent on that mission, the only one of its kind in the war. For two daring days, 5th Cavalry rode around the Forest of Viller-Cotterêts behind German lines. At 6 PM on 8 September, under “a dark red, cloudy sky,” it attacked a German airfield near Troësnes. At that very moment, a cavalcade of cars arrived with First Army’s staff. Kluck, Kuhl, and their aides “seized rifles, carbines and revolvers,” flung themselves on the ground, and formed a broad firing line. The situation was cleared by the arrival of Arnold von Bauer’s 17th ID, which “violently” dispatched the French riders, reducing 5th CD to half its original strength. General de Cornulier-Lucinière’s “brave riders,” in Kluck’s words, had “missed a good prize!”


shooting him would probably have done the Germans a favor

also says the "Taxis of the Marne" didn't work that well

goes on to say Kluck is taking some heat, but decides to attack. He is getting reports of armies closing on him.


	..Just in time. Around noon, Bülow sent Kluck a dire message: “Airmen report advance of four long enemy columns toward the Marne. … Second Army initiates retreat, right flank on Damery [in fact, Dormans].”

	Still, Kluck, furor Teutonicus personified, pressed on with the attack. “Every man,” he admonished one of Quast’s staff officers, “must be convinced that the enveloping attack” on French Sixth Army “must bring the decision.” He urged Quast to drive for the line Lévignen-Betz without delay. If the right wing reached Dammartin-sur-Tigeaux by nightfall, “all will have been won.”143


Bulow says his right flank is retreating form an army advancing toward Marne, but Kluck decides to attack anyway (iirc Bulow is supposed to be in command of Kluck, although this doesn't say he issued any orders)


	Once again, Quast ran up against Déprez’s 61st RID, and once again he put it to flight. An aviator reported that Lepel’s brigade had engaged Maunoury’s left flank at Baron, northwest of Nanteuil-le-Haudouin. At that very moment, a visitor from the OHL arrived at First Army headquarters: Lieutenant Colonel Richard Hentsch, on what undoubtedly is the most famous staff tour in military history.


is this a second tour by Hentsch?


	“IF THE PESSIMISTIC OBERSTLEUTNANT HENTSCH HAD CRASHED INTO a tree … somewhere on his journey of 8 September, or if he had been shot by a French straggler, we would have had a ceasefire two weeks later and thereafter would have received a peace in which we could have asked for everything.”1 These pithy words, published in 1965 by Jenö von Egan-Krieger, who as Karl von Bülow’s deputy adjutant had witnessed the Battle of the Marne at Second Army headquarters, in many ways encapsulate the most persistent myth of the Marne.


many blame Hentsch (I think it was for giving Moltke intel that led to the decision to retreat), but Herwig says this is a "peristent myth"


	To wit, had Lieutenant Colonel Richard Hentsch of the General Staff not arrived at Bülow’s headquarters at Montmort-Lucy late that afternoon and by way of his pessimistic assessment of the situation helped persuade Bülow to initiate Second Army’s (and thereafter First Army’s) retreat behind the Marne River over the next two days, victory over France would have been secured. After all, lead elements of Alexander von Kluck’s First Army were just thirty kilometers from Paris. Bülow’s Second Army likewise seemed to be pressing on the capital. Max von Hausen’s Third Army was poised to break through Ferdinand Foch’s Ninth Army at the Saint-Gond Marshes. The French government had fled to Bordeaux. Thus, for an entire school of German military officers and writers, the “miracle of the Marne” consisted of Hentsch’s fateful order to retreat.


After the war, "an entire school" of German military officers wrote that Germany's forces could have taken France if they hadn't decided to retreat.


	This line of argumentation is to be found not only in the vast memoir literature, but also in the fourth volume of the German official history, Der Weltkrieg 1914 bis 1918. Usually factual and understated in its judgments, the official history loses its objectivity with Hentsch’s mission—to which it dedicates about fifty pages.


the "German official history" is usually factual and understated in its judgements, but "loses its objectivity" when it talks about Hentsch's mission (why?)


	Its depiction of the events of 8 and 9 September is one uninterrupted saga of victorious advances: in the Argonne and Ardennes forests, at the Marais de Saint-Gond, and along the Ourcq River. Every German unit is on the threshold of a breakthrough; every French on the point of defeat. Exit Hentsch from the story, and victory is assured.


It depecits the German army as winning everywhere before Hensch, but it was more complicated than that.


	Beyond Germany, U.S. Army chief of staff Peyton C. March after the war expressed amazement that Germany’s senior army commanders had readily obeyed orders from “a perfectly unknown lieutenant colonel … far exceeding his authority,” and suggested that the Allies erect a monument in their “Hall of Fame” to honor Hentsch.


It might be weird that they followed this guy's orders


many who knew Hentsch say he was talented but pessimistic


	For all the rivers of ink spilled about the so-called Hentsch mission,8 there exists a single contemporary document: his report to the General Staff on 15 September 1914.* This is extremely important in light of the fact that Chief of the General Staff Helmuth von Moltke never put his instructions to Hentsch on paper;


that's bad... can it be said for sure Moltke ordered Hentsch to retreat? what exactly did he say to him, anyway?


	that neither Moltke nor Hentsch made notes of their final discussion “under four eyes” before the lieutenant colonel left Luxembourg; that the only two officers who accompanied Hentsch in his staff car (Captains Georg König and Hans Koeppen) participated in just some of Hentsch’s discussions with the various army commanders and their staffs; and that the other eyewitness accounts by General Staff officers Wilhelm von Dommes and Gerhard Tappen9 were submitted to the Reichsarchiv a decade after the Marne as it produced the critical fourth volume, The Marne Campaign—The Battle, of its official history.


so there aren't many official documents, just a few accounts.


	Indeed, the Hentsch mission remained shrouded in the “fog of uncertainty” even for the Reichsarchiv historians in the 1920s, when they discovered that the General Staff’s files on it “contained as good as nothing.”10I have reconstructed Hentsch’s staff tour on the basis of 1914 diary excerpts that were submitted to the Reichsarchiv by leading staff officers and front commanders in the early 1920s, and which became available only after the collapse of the German Democratic Republic in 1990.


can these be trusted? I guess it's the only thing we have


	...THE MOOD AT THE OHL on the morning of 8 September can only be described as bordering on panic.13 Moltke had received no word from First or Second armies the past two days. Both were reported to be within striking distance of Paris, yet one (First) had cut sharply across the front of the other (Second) at the Marne. French chief of the General Staff Joseph Joffre had launched a massive counterattack along the entire front from Paris to Verdun. A new French Sixth Army seemed to be trying to envelop First Army’s right flank on the Ourcq. The British Expeditionary Force (BEF) ever so slowly was marching into the fifty-kilometer-wide gap between First and Second armies. Moltke, fearing that First Army had already been attacked in the rear and was in danger of being ground up between French Sixth Army and the BEF, desperately needed clarity.


Moltke "bordering on panic" Sep 8. He hasn't heard from 1st or 2nd armies (Kluck and Bulow) for two days (they keep declining to contact him) and apparently Moltke can't just ask them to report (why is this?). Anyway, Moltke is worried and wants to know what's going on. So he decides to send Henstch, who gave a pessimistic report earlier, since Hentsch had already made a trip like this before.


	During the intense discussions among the four officers—Moltke, Tappen, Hentsch, and Dommes—in Tappen’s office, Moltke most likely gave Hentsch powers to initiate a general withdrawal of the right wing to the line Sainte-Menehould–Reims–Fismes–Soissons if First Army’s predicament made such a move “necessary.” Hentsch took this to constitute “full power of authority” (Vollmacht) to act in Moltke’s name.14 This certainly is what he shared with Captain König during their drive to the front. At a final meeting alone with Moltke sometime around 9 AM* on 8 September, Hentsch—according to Wilhelm II and half a dozen General Staff officers at the OHL—received no word to dissuade him of this interpretation.


Whatever Moltke tells him, apparently Hentsch decides he has full power to initiate a retreat. But only "*if* the first army's predicment" made this necessary.

Would we ever know for sure? maybe that's a subjective thing... either way, for whatever reason the allies were filling the gap slowly.


	At 10 AM Hentsch, along with Captains König and Koeppen, left Luxembourg to visit Fifth, Fourth, Third, Second, and First armies.16 He decided on his own to undertake a grand tour of the entire front from the Argonne Forest to the Ourcq River rather than to proceed directly to Second and First armies.


Hentsch immediately decides to do his own thing and visit all armies instead of just 1st and 2nd. Captain Konig and Koeppen go with him.


	He was mentally “confident” and physically “fresh,” and showed no signs of the gallbladder ailment. But, as he confided to Captain König, he regretted that Moltke had declined to issue him orders in writing and that the chief of the General Staff had not gone to the front in person, or at least sent a more senior officer, such as Deputy Chief of Staff Hermann von Stein or Colonel Tappen. He feared that he would be made the “scapegoat” for whatever action he took.


hmmm

more to this?


	The small motorcade arrived at Fifth Army headquarters in Varennes-en-Argonne at 1 PM on 8 September. Hentsch was pleased to learn that Crown Prince Wilhelm planned to storm Forts Troyon and Les Paroches the next day.


so he was "pleased" Kaiser planned on storming the French, but somehow decided to retreat anyway. But basically Herwig is saying he's doing a tour all the way down the German lines and reporting on them. He reports everything good with 5th and 4th armies.


	...Hentsch left Courtisols at 4:30 PM for Châlons-sur-Marne. Hausen was at the front, but Chief of Staff Ernst von Hoeppner optimistically reported that Third Army, despite the precarious position of its right wing due to having received its eighth and ninth SOS calls in two days from Second Army, was making “victorious but slow progress.”20 In fact, the audacious bayonet attack of Hausen’s Third Army had been stopped by French Ninth Army. Still, for Hentsch, no urgency. Shortly before leaving Châlons at 5:45 PM, Hentsch radioed Moltke: “3. Army’s situation and conception [of operations] entirely favorable.”


he doesn't notice or doesn't report problems with bayonette charge from third army


	Next, he was off to Second Army headquarters at Montmort-Lucy, where he arrived at 6:45 PM. Bülow returned from his command post at Fromentières half an hour later. The ensuing meeting was greatly to shape the Battle of the Marne.

	On arriving at the Château de Montmort, Hentsch’s cautious optimism waned. The shafts of the wagons of Second Army’s headquarters staff all pointed north, an indication of a planned withdrawal.*


was Burlow already planning to retreat?


	He held a brief, first meeting with Chief of Staff Otto von Lauenstein. At first, Lauenstein tried to reassure Hentsch that all was well. That very afternoon Bülow had rushed to the front at Champaubert upon receiving word that Louis Franchet d’Espèrey’s Fifth Army had broken through the seam between Otto von Emmich’s X Army Corps and Guenther von Kirchbach’s X Reserve Corps—only to return “laughing and in high spirits” because the report had proved to be false.22 But then Lauenstein became more serious. The day’s offensive by the left wing of Second Army had met with some success, but the right wing between Montmirail and Chézy had barely been able to maintain its positions and was in danger of being enveloped by French Fifth Army. Hentsch in the name of the OHL expressed the view that First Army would not be able to ward off French Sixth Army’s offensive emanating from Paris, and that “enemy formations” were exploiting the fifty-kilometer-wide corridor between First and Second armies.


Hensch reports what is apparently OHL's view, that the 1st army is doomed


	Bülow then invited Hentsch, Lauenstein, and First General Staff Officer Arthur Matthes, as well as Captains König and Koeppen, into his study in the Renaissance castle. No protocol was kept. According to Hentsch’s report of 15 September and Lieutenant Colonel Matthes’s post meeting notes, Bülow began with a description of Second Army’s situation.24 It was “extremely serious and even dangerous.” After a month of unceasing campaigning, Second Army’s combat effectiveness had been reduced to the point where it was “in no condition” to deliver the “final and decisive blow” that was now being asked of it.


Bulow is very pessemistic and says his army won't be able to make the final push


	Bülow, still without any reports from First Army headquarters at Mareuil, then turned his anger on Kluck. In nonobservance of Moltke’s General Instruction of 5 September, First Army had turned southeast and crossed the Marne ahead of Second Army. Kluck now threatened to withdraw III and IX corps from Second Army’s right flank, thereby widening the distance between the two armies by fifteen kilometers. The two cavalry corps and Jäger units that had been thrown into the breach would soon be overrun. Unless Kluck at once broke off the battle with Michel-Joseph Maunoury’s Sixth Army at the Ourcq and closed up with Second Army, “hostile columns, brigades or divisions” could break through the gap. There were no reserves to fall back on. “First Army simply and solely is responsible for the current crisis.”



Bulow is angry at Kluck for widening gap, although Bulow himself also acted to increase the gap. Bulow hans't had any reports from first army headquarters. He is very pessimistic on british and french soldiers coming through the gap and blames it all on Kluck.


	At this point in the discussion, either Bülow or Matthes uttered what soon became a fateful word, “Schlacke.”25 Captain König reiterated this fact in formal replies to the historians of the Reichsarchiv in March 1925 and January 1926, and on both occasions testified that the word cinders had been applied to Second Army. The term would be central to all subsequent discussions, both at Montmort and Mareuilsur-Ourcq. It undoubtedly stemmed from the fact that Second Army had been constantly on the march for a month, that it had fought at least three major engagements with French Fifth Army, that its right wing was being exploited by the enemy, that it already had to pull three corps behind the Petit Morin, that the men were at the end of their physical capabilities, and that Second Army’s overall strength was little more than three corps.


someone in the meeting says the second army is "cinders", and this comes up later in hearings. They have decided the strength of the 2nd army is in bad shape.


	Hentsch spoke next. In what Captains König and Koeppen described as “calm, measured terms,” Hentsch described the state of Kluck’s First Army east of Paris as “serious” and in danger of envelopment. It could not be counted on to prevent the enemy from crossing the Marne. It simply had to pull back from the Ourcq and he, Hentsch, “had the full power of authority to order this if necessary in the name of the Oberste-Heeresleitung.” The boldness of the statement took Bülow by surprise. 


Hentsch has decided the first army is doomed, although he hasn't met them yet. This seems odd. Moltke was concerned about a lack of reports from the 1st and 2nd armies, and wanted to send someone to check up on them to see what they should do. So, the backdrop is that Moltke is in the dark or uncertain about what's going on with the 1st army (although he has at least some idea). Similarly, Bulow hasn't been communicating so well with Kluck either, and so it seems he wouldn't be in a good position to opine on the status of the 1st army. Kluck seems to think the first army is doing well. And Hentsch hasn't even got to them yet, he's here talking to Bulow. So how has he already reached a conclusion about the first army? His orders were to initiate a general withdrawal *if* the first army's position was irrecoverable. But what did he actually do to assess this?


	While conceding the potential “danger” east of Paris, he remonstrated that a breakthrough “had not yet become reality.” Again, he argued that the best solution was to order Kluck to close and protect Second Army’s right wing. Hentsch demurred. First Army was no longer able to perform such a complicated maneuver in the midst of battle. Bülow countered that it was not yet too late. But time was fast running out for Kluck. If the Allies broke through at the Marne, Bülow lectured Hentsch, they would have two enticing options: “either to turn against the left flank and rear of First Army or against the right flank of Second Army; both could lead to a catastrophe.” Hentsch agreed. He again reminded Bülow that he had “full power of authority” to order Kluck to withdraw from the Ourcq.


Hentsch, reportedly, argues that the first army isn't capable of closing the gap to Bulow's right-flank in the middle of battle. Bulow argues it would be really bad if the allies cross the Marne at the gap (either 1st or 2nd armies would then get flanked) and Hentsch agrees.


	An orderly called Lauenstein to the telephone. Louis de Maud’huy’s XVIII Corps had broken through Karl von Einem’s VII Corps at Marchais-en-Brie and was threatening Montmirail. Bülow now became alarmed. Second Army’s front was in danger of being breached. He immediately ordered his right wing (Kluck’s III and IX corps as well as his own X Reserve Corps) to fall back fifteen to twenty kilometers behind Margny and Le Thoult-Trosnay to escape envelopment, at least for the moment. It should be noted that he did this before Kluck actually took back his III and IX corps and quick-marched them to the Ourcq. The plight of the German position was becoming ever more apparent. Bülow mused aloud that should the French “compel a retreat by force of arms” through a “hostile country in which practically every inhabitant might be armed,” this could easily have “incalculable consequences.”26 Therewith, as Captain König clearly remembered, the word retreat had been uttered for the first time.


Bulow is ordering his troops to retreat while Kluck is ordering them to quick march back


	All present at the meeting agreed that First Army’s situation was “desperate;” none had faith that Kluck’s right wing could envelop Maunoury’s left. Furthermore, all agreed that the last possible moment to order a general retreat would come as soon as major Allied forces crossed the Marne. For reasons that he never explained, Hentsch decided to spend the night at Montmort rather than to push on to First Army headquarters.


wtf

weren't there reinforcements freed up for the gap this whole time? From Sept 6: "Zwehl’s three brigades of VII Corps were now freed up, perhaps to plug the gap between the Marne and the Ourcq." What happened to those guys?

Even still, it seems like there were other things they could have done besides retreat... if 4th and 5th armeis doing so well, why can't they spare reinforcements to fill the gap too? It doesn't make sense how this one guy can decide on a retreat instead of their strategists actually strategizing and commanding their forces to solve the problem. This can't be how military operations work, can it?


	Unsurprisingly, the mood at dinner that night was “depressing.” At 9:30 PM, just before going to bed, Hentsch sent off a cryptic note to Luxembourg: “Situation at 2. Army serious, but not desperate.”28 What was Moltke to make of that?


with Moltke's state of mind then, probably not well. From a letter to his wife (earlier that day?):


	Luxemburg, 8. September 1914. 

	I can hardly say with what nameless heaviness the burden of responsibility has weighed on the last days and still weighs on me. For still the great struggle against the whole front of our army is not decided. It is a matter of preserving or losing the hitherto inflicted with infinite sacrifices; it would be terrible if all this blood should be shed, without a resounding success. The terrible tension of these days, the absence of news from far-off armies, the consciousness of what is at stake, is almost superhuman. The terrible difficulty of our situation is often like a black wall that seems impenetrable. - Tonight some more favorable news from the front arrived. May God give us another success with our merged troops. The garde corps has again been hard in the fight, it should have come down to almost half its stock.

	It is a difficult time, and nameless victims have already demanded this war and will continue to demand it. The whole world has conspired against us, it seems as if the task of all other nations is to destroy Germany permanently. The few neutral states are not friendly towards us. Germany does not have a friend in the world, it all depends on itself.

	From today's decision it depends on whether we remain here. - Not long any longer. The Emperor must go to France, closer to the army; he must be in enemy territory like his troops.


It's like he couldn't bear to decide what to do with the army, so he sent Hentsch to decide for him.


	From 5 to 6 AM on 9 September, Hentsch, Lauenstein, and Matthes held a final meeting in the château’s gardens. Bülow, undoubtedly exhausted from the previous night’s momentous discussions, preferred sleep to another meeting with Hentsch, whom he described as the “horrible pessimist” from the OHL.


Bulow says Hentsch a "horrible pessimist"


	The talks merely fleshed out what had already been agreed upon: Second Army could hold its present position only if First Army disengaged at the Ourcq and withdrew eastward along the north bank of the Marne to link up with Bülow’s right wing; if Kluck refused, Lauenstein was prepared to issue orders for Second Army to fall back behind the Marne. Hentsch concurred.


so they decide the only solution is for Kluck to withdraw and link of with Bulow, and if he refuses then the 2nd army has to retreat.


	At 6 AM, he departed Montmort for the eighty-kilometer drive to First Army headquarters at Mareuil.


so after spending the night and agreeing on a plan with Bulow he goes to 1st army headquarters


	Moltke that day gave vent to his growing pessimism in a letter to his wife. “It goes badly. The battles east of Paris will not end in our favor. … And we certainly will be made to pay for all that has been destroyed.”


Did Hentsch even report on 1st army to Moltke before he wrote this?


	Bülow, having risen and been briefed by Lauenstein and Matthes on their talks with Hentsch, reviewed the morning’s reconnaissance report from Lieutenant Berthold of Flying Squadron 23. It confirmed his worst fears: “Advance by 5 hostile columns in a northerly direction in the region of Montmirail—La Ferté.”31 They were obviously advancing from the Petit Morin toward the Marne into the gap between First and Second armies. For Bülow, the last moment to order a general retreat had arrived. “Second Army initiates retreat,” he tersely informed Hausen and Kluck on his left and right, respectively, at 9:02 AM, “right flank on Damery [sic].”32 When shortly thereafter a message arrived from Mareuil stating that First Army was withdrawing its left flank (Alexander von Linsingen’s II Corps) toward Coulombs, Bülow (incorrectly) assumed that this was because Hentsch had ordered Kluck also to begin the withdrawal.33 Bad communications yet again bedeviled the Germans.


Bulow orders a full retreat of the 2nd army with a whiff of the French and false assumptions


	How does one account for the bizarre meeting at Montmort? On the surface, it seems ludicrous that a mere lieutenant colonel was able to move Prussia’s most senior field commander into ordering his army to retreat without having suffered a major defeat. Even more ludicrous is that Bülow made absolutely no effort to contact either Moltke at Luxembourg or Kluck at Mareuil—by telegraph, rider, automobile, or airplane. Incredibly, four trains of Bülow’s Telephone Section 2 sat idle at Dormans studying handbooks on how to install and repair lines and equipment; they took no steps whatsoever to establish telephone communications with Kluck, less than sixty kilometers away as the crow flies.


Bulow does all this without contacting Kluck or Moltke. He made a plan with Herscht to retreat if Kluck doesn't reinforce his flank and assumes the plan is going ahead.


	Surely, Bülow and Lauenstein could, and should, have overruled a lieutenant colonel and taken responsibility for coordinating their intended action with the OHL and First Army.

	The truth of the matter is that the order to retreat was issued not by Hentsch or by Moltke, but by Bülow, with whom responsibility for setting in motion the German retreat from the Marne must rest.


and there were signs he was planning a retreat even before Hentsch arrived. "The shafts of the wagons of Second Army’s headquarters staff all pointed north, an indication of a planned withdrawal."


	To be sure, Bülow was between a rock and a hard place by the evening of 8 September. Franchet d’Espèrey’s Fifth Army was hammering Second Army’s exposed right wing, over which it enjoyed a four-to-one numerical superiority. The BEF at last was advancing into the gap between the two German pivot armies and harassing Kluck’s lines of communication. Could Bülow simply stand on the Marne for another day or two and hope and pray that Hausen’s Third Army would yet defeat Ferdinand Foch’s Ninth Army in the Saint-Gond Marshes; or that Kluck’s right wing would sweep around the left flank of Maunoury’s Sixth Army northeast of Paris? If either or both Hausen and Kluck were victorious, the campaign could be salvaged at the eleventh hour. If not, the sheer weight of numbers that favored Franchet d’Espèrey would crush Second Army’s right wing—while the three corps of the BEF and the French cavalry corps would assault Kluck’s rear on the Ourcq.


Could they have found a way out of it? That would have been a problem for the general staff to solve after looking at all the battlefield intel they could get. Apparently they decided to "solve" the problem by punting it to Hentsch, and Burlow made the ultimate decision without even the most basic intel like what the first army was doing...


	Some scholars have viewed Bülow’s decision on the fourth day of the battle to avert a pending “catastrophe” by way of a timely retreat as “a sound one.”35 At the time, Lauenstein crowed to Deputy Chief of Staff von Stein that “Germany will one day thank General von Bülow that he issued the order to retreat.”36 Few German military writers, either at the time or subsequently, have agreed with either view. They are right.


ya seriously


	Quite apart from the sudden and impulsive nature of the decision and Bülow’s refusal to seek input from Moltke or Kluck, it did not correspond to the situation on the ground. There had been no major breakthrough. Kluck was rallying his army corps to crush French Sixth Army on the Ourcq. Rudolf von Lepel’s infantry brigade, marching southwest from Brussels, was about to strike Maunoury’s left flank. Second Army had merely to close up its front and stand firm at the Marne. Time was not yet of the essence. Bülow, who had viewed Kluck and First Army as a “thorn in his side” ever since their turn toward the south after the Battle of Guise/Saint-Quentin, allowed emotions to dictate operations.


Bulow is very suspicious


	There remains the larger question concerning the fitness to command of Bülow and Lauenstein. The German official history and most eyewitnesses declined after the war to address the question, content merely to regurgitate “recollections” of what was said that 8 September.


why is this?


	...At age sixty-eight, he was four years beyond what constituted mandatory retirement in the French army. During the night after he made his momentous decision to retreat, Bülow suffered three “crying fits” at Saint-Quentin, his new headquarters. The next day, he extended a dour greeting to Pastor Paul Le Seur: “If you think that you are seeing the commander of Second Army, then you are mistaken! That, I once was.”39 Wilhelm II promoted Bülow to the rank of field marshal in January 1915 and three months later bestowed on him the order Pour le Mérite. That same year, Bülow suffered a stroke that paralyzed his left side; he died at Berlin on 31 August 1921.


something off with Bulow physically, mentally? not sure about this, reminds me of reports on Lin Bau's behavior by his "physician"


	...Captain Koeppen, who was at the critical meeting in Montmort, later informed the Reichsarchiv that on 8 September, Lauenstein had made a “sick, almost apathetic impression” on him.40 Bülow’s chief of staff seemed to suffer from heart palpitations during the meeting and managed to get through it only “with strong means, especially alcohol.” Lieutenant Colonel Matthes, in fact, had taken Lauenstein’s place in decision making. Incredibly, Wilhelm II awarded Lauenstein the Iron Cross, First Class, for his role in the Battle of the Marne.


what is going on with this


	...HENTSCH ARRIVED AT MAREUIL-SUR-OURCQ at 11:30 AM on 9 September after a five-hour detour via Reims, Fismes, and Fère-en-Tardenois. If the sight of wagon shafts turned away from the front had already alarmed him at Montmort, what he witnessed en route to Mareuil unnerved the staff officer.41 At Fère-en-Tardenois, he encountered ammunition and supply trains, horse-drawn artillery, weary infantrymen, and columns of wounded cavalrymen fleeing from the front helter-skelter for fear of being cut off by advancing French forces. At Neuilly–Saint-Front, he could not get through, as the town was “plugged up” by countless people running in terror of what they thought to be bombs falling. Finally making his way through Neuilly “by the repeated use of force,” Hentsch headed south. At Brumetz, he had to turn around when informed (incorrectly) that British cavalry was already in the area. Then panicked Landwehr soldiers fired at his car, taking it to be part of a French advance guard. At every stop, he was told that the enemy had driven German cavalry from the Marne and had crossed the river in pursuit.


Hentsch's description is a 1st army half-way in the middle of fleeing. In one area British cavalry are already there.


	General von Kuhl, First Army’s chief of staff, met Hentsch on a dusty road at Mareuil. He quickly brought his former assistant up to speed: First Army that morning had been seriously threatened by Maunoury’s attacks on the Ourcq; aviators had reported the British advance into the gap between the two German armies in the area north of the Petit Morin River stretching from Montmirail west to La Fertésous-Jouarre; and Hans von Gronau’s IV Reserve Corps had been ground down in the fighting. But the arrival of Ferdinand von Quast’s IX Corps and Friedrich Sixt von Arnim’s IV Corps had stabilized the situation.


Kuhl says the 1st army is taking a beating but stablized by reinforcements. I think these are the corps that Bulow had ordered to retreat earlier that Kluck ordered instead to the Ourcq, before Bulow decides the first army was doomed.


	The two officers then entered Kuhl’s operations room. No protocol was kept. Neither cared to send for General von Kluck, who was a mere two to three hundred meters away at his command post. Obviously, two General Staff officers could decide First Army’s operations without its commander.


this is suspicious. Was Kluck pro-German? he had made some odd manuevres before I think


	Kuhl announced that First Army’s right wing was about to turn Maunoury’s left flank, and that he viewed the BEF’s advance into the gap “not at all tragically” since the British had reeled back in confusion ever since Mons and Le Cateau. “We knew from previous experience,” one of Kuhl’s staff officers later stated, “how slowly the British operated.” In any case, the two German cavalry corps would be able to “deal” with the BEF. A second staff officer recalled that Hentsch was “dumbfounded” by this optimistic evaluation of the situation.


Kuhl says the situation in the gap isn't that bad and Hentsch says he was "dumbfounded."


	Hentsch then made his formal presentation. Fifth Army was tied down at Verdun; Sixth and Seventh armies likewise were pinned at Nancy-Épinal; and Bülow’s VII Corps had not “withdrawn” behind the Marne but had been “hurled” back across the river. To wit, the time for a general retreat had come.


Hentsch is pessimistic (wasn't he more optimistic about the 5th army before?), decides its time to retreat.


	...Kuhl “vigorously” objected.43 First Army’s right wing was about to break Maunoury’s left; the attack had to be given a chance to succeed; a retreat by his exhausted and disorganized forces was out of the question. And how, he demanded to know, had Bülow come to retreat behind the Marne? Hentsch obfuscated. “The decision to retreat,” he coldly replied, “had been a bitter pill for Old Bülow to swallow.”


how would Hensch know details about Bulow's decision that Kuhl wouldn't now? Bulow decided to retreat after Hentsch left.


	He then repeated the unsubstantiated but critical comment made by either Bülow or Matthes at Montmort that Second Army had been reduced to “cinders” by Franchet d’Espèrey’s vicious attacks. Finally, Hentsch pulled his ace out of his sleeve: He had come with “full power of authority” and “in the name of the Oberste-Heeresleitung” ordered First Army to retreat. It was less than a clinical staff performance.


Hentsch very pessemistic, repeats that 2nd army is "cinders" and says "by the way I have full authorization to make you retreat"


	Kuhl was thunderstruck. If Second Army had indeed been reduced to “cinders” and was being forced to withdraw from the Marne, then “not even a victory over Maunoury” could spare First Army’s left flank from certain destruction. In the terse verdict of the German official history, “The dice were cast.” Kuhl had no direct telephone line to Luxembourg, and he chose not to use one of his aircraft to send a staff officer to Montmort to confer with Bülow or Lauenstein. Later on, he simply informed Kluck of his discussion with Hentsch. “With a heavy heart, General von Kluck was obliged to accept the order.”


Kuhl choses to not do anything to confer with Bulow or Lauenstein--apparently he takes Hentsch at his word. He reports on this to Kluck who "with a heavy heart," accepts the order to retreat.


	Kuhl, who understood the inner workings of the General Staff system better than anyone, conceded at Hentsch’s requested Court of Inquiry in April 1917 that the lieutenant colonel had “not exceeded his authority.” Erich Ludendorff, then deputy chief of staff of the German army, concurred. “He [Hentsch] merely acted according to the instructions he received from the then Chief of the General Staff [Moltke].”


It's like Moltke just gave up and let shady people like Bulow and Hentsch decide everything, and they decided to lose at Marne.


	Hentsch, “psychologically deeply shaken” by the gravity of his action and fearful that he would be “blamed for the unfortunate termination of the [Schlieffen-Moltke] operation,”46 departed Mareuil at 1 PM—not to brief Second Army on his discussions with Kuhl but to inform Third, Fourth, and Fifth armies of the decision to retreat.


Hentsch in a hurry to retreat? He doesn't breif the second army and instead tells the rest to retreat. I thought he had a plan with Bulow to retreat only if the 1st army doesn't reinforce his right flank...


	Fifteen minutes later, Kluck issued formal orders “at the behest of the OHL” for First Army to break off the battle with French Sixth Army and to withdraw “in the general direction of Soissons.”47 Thus ended First Army’s bloody thirty-day, six-hundred-kilometer advance on Paris.


so they might have had a chance to win, but they'll never know since Hentsch just showed up and decided to order everyone to retreat. No wonder they were pissed later.


	There are times when senior military leaders have the right and the duty not to obey orders that make no sense, but to act in the best interests of their army and country. General Ludwig Yorck von Wartenburg was one such commander, who in December 1812 had signed a neutrality pact with Russia at Tauroggen rather than to continue to have the Prussian army serve as a hoplite force for Napoleon I. On 9 September 1914, Kluck and Kuhl owed it to their soldiers and their country to see the battle with French Sixth Army through to conclusion. For the last chance to win the campaign in the west rested  their decision. A simple demand for formal written orders from the kaiser or the chief of the General Staff would have done the trick since, given the deplorable state of German communications, it would have taken two days to send the message and to receive a reply from Moltke. Instead, we are left with the great “what if?” on the Ourcq.


That's a good point--Kluck could have just sent a letter to Moltke basically saying "are you sure?", kept fighting, maybe won, and even if Moltke replied "yes retreat at once" you wouldn't really be able to fault him for it.


	LIEUTENANT COLONEL HENTSCH RETURNED to LUXEMBOURG at 12:40 PM on 10 September. The atmosphere at the OHL was highly charged. The day before, while Hentsch was making his rounds, Moltke, hearing of the BEF’s advance into the infamous gap by way of an intercepted wireless, had lost his nerve and recommended a withdrawal all along the line.


Moltke had reccomended a full retreat the next day anyway. He was apparently really worried about that gap

	
	The senior generals in the kaiser’s entourage counseled continuation of the offensive. Wilhelm II agreed. He adamantly rejected Moltke’s advice and demanded precise information on the status of the German right wing. But the discussions were “all superfluous,” Chief of the Military Cabinet Moriz von Lyncker noted, since there existed no means of communication with Kluck.


Kaiser wants to keep on, but Lyncker says it doesn't matter because they can't contact Kluck.

Herwig goes on to say Moltke fights with the Kaier over this, gets angry, says Bulow was in favor of withdrawing and he is "one of the most experienced."

	...Hentsch’s report on 10 September decided the issue. First Army, he informed Moltke, “was responsible for the entire retreat” because by removing III and IX corps from Bülow’s right wing, it had allowed the distance between the two armies to widen by fifteen kilometers, and the enemy was now exploiting it. Disingenuously, he reported that First Army had already “issued orders to withdraw,” and that he, Hentsch, had merely tried to steer that withdrawal into the direction desired by the OHL!


for whatever reason, Hentsch lies and says it wasn't his idea to retreat. He says the first army had already decided to retreat.

What's his excuse? "nervousness" at being responsible? problem us, reporting it this way makes it sound like everyone was in agreement with retreating, and not just Hentsch trying to sell retreating to everyone like a door-to-door salesman. So his lie here would make it easier for Moltke to justify his cowardice.


	...Hentsch had left Luxembourg on 8 September convinced of the need for a general retreat and realignment of the armies in the west. His talks with Bülow and Lauenstein at Montmort had only reinforced that conviction. At Mareuil, Hentsch—with his talk of Second Army being little more than “cinders,” of its already ongoing withdrawal, and of his “full power of authority” to issue orders to retreat “in the name of the Oberste Heeres-Leitung”—had left Kuhl no choice but to withdraw from the Ourcq. For that action, Hentsch was fully responsible.


basically, Hentsch had already decided on retreat when he left and tried to sell it to everyone else. And it does some like some of the officers (Bulow, Kuhl?) helped him make it easier.


	Moltke was “pleasantly surprised” by Hentsch’s report. The danger of Kluck’s left wing being crushed by the BEF and the French cavalry corps had been removed; First Army’s withdrawal to Fismes would allow it to link up with Second Army again and thus eliminate the fifty-kilometer gap; and Fourth and Fifth armies could hold their lines. “Thank God,” Moltke cried out, “then the situation seems much better than I thought.”53 The offensive could be resumed just as soon as the new Seventh Army had been formed at Saint-Quentin.


Moltke apparently really worried about the gap right up to the retreat. Happy to hear news of retreat and something that justifies it. Seems to think they can re-group and push again.


	...Still, the savvy Hentsch asked Moltke to visit Third, Fourth, and Fifth armies “to make sure that I did the right thing.”54 The chief of the General Staff agreed to set off early next morning. Württemberg’s war minister, Otto von Marchtaler, caustically noted, “He should have done that earlier; too late!”


yeah, how come he never went to the front until after the retreat?


	Perhaps to “punish” Kluck for his bold initiative (against express orders) in crossing the Marne ahead of Second Army, Moltke once again placed First Army under Bülow’s command. He simply refused to accept that his most senior commander in the field had set in motion the entire chain of action that would lead to a general retreat from the Marne.


why is that? that's suspicious


	Moltke’s temporary recovery of spirits belied his true state of mind. For there is no question that by 8–10 September, Helmuth von Moltke was a broken man, mentally and physically. The heart problems for which he had been treated in 1911, 1912, and 1913 and that had led to arteriosclerosis had returned, aggravated by the onset of a gallbladder infection.56 His closest associates at the OHL noted his loss of energy, declining willpower, and inability to make decisions. To them, he looked tired and lethargic. They were not alone. Crown Prince Rupprecht of Bavaria, concerned that “the OHL has lost its nerves,” had traveled to German headquarters on 8 September to discuss the assault on Nancy. He was shocked. Moltke gave the impression of being “a sick, broken man. His tall frame was stooped and he looked incredibly debilitated.”


Moltke a "broken man" by 8 September.


	...The next day, War Minister Erich von Falkenhayn again wielded his acid-dripping pen. “Our General Staff has totally lost their heads,” he noted in his diary. “Schlieffen’s notes have come to an end and therewith also Moltke’s wit.”58 Karl von Wenninger, Bavaria’s military plenipotentiary to the OHL, also took up the theme of a squandered “Schlieffen Plan.” 


this doesn't sound right... seems like problem wasn't going outside the shclieffen plan (I mean they had the basic idea, right?) but Moltke not ordering commanders determined to act as stupidly as possible except to retreat.


	...General von Lyncker, who as chief of the Military Cabinet was responsible for all military appointments, ruminated about the “extremely serious” situation in France. “The armies have been pulled apart in a thin line [forming] a great arc from the Vosges [Mountains] to Paris.” On 10 September, he concluded that the Schlieffen-Moltke Plan had unraveled. “In sum, one must appreciate that the entire operation—that is, the encirclement [of French forces] from the north and northwest—has been utterly unsuccessful.” 


Moltke had them all but surrounded then decided to retreat


Herwig goes on to describe the French forces during the retreat


	...And Joffre’s Special Order No. 19 the following day had again shown Franchet d’Espèrey the way: “The main body of the Fifth Army, marching due north, will drive the forces opposed to it beyond the Marne.”67 But instead of using his numerical superiority as a “breakthrough force” (armée de rupture) to destroy a retreating foe—either by envelopment or breakthrough—“Desperate Frankie” advanced only “methodically”68 and with Fifth Army in echelon, its right (!) wing in advance.


why not? its odd, as if both sides made odd decision or disobeyed orders always in such a way that the war can't be decided decisively. The end result of the retreat at Marne was a stalemate and years of trench warfare.


	Fortunately for Franchet d’Espèrey, Bülow strangely chose not to destroy the Marne bridges after his units retreated over them.


Bulow helping the French in multiple ways.


	...The Allied breakthrough remained a mirage. Despite Joffre’s constant exhortations, the BEF moved north at a snail’s pace, still some thirty kilometers behind Joffre’s desired jump-off line.


this is the same kind of problem as not destroying the retreating armies--if the BEF had actually got through faster, they might have been able to destroy the 1st army or at least force a decisive battle.


	...By nightfall, the BEF was still ten kilometers behind Joffre’s original departure line. In historian Sewell Tyng’s stinging words, Sir John French’s army had “exercised no effective intervention” at the “point of greatest strategic significance and at the crucial moment of the battle.” In strategic terms, its advance into the German gap “remained no more than a threat which was never translated into decisive action.”


the British just poked it in a little and the Germans ran away scared


	...Wilhelm, like Hausen two days before, decided on a nighttime bayonet attack by VI, XIII, and XVI army corps. Using his telephone line from Varennes to Luxembourg, he obtained Moltke’s sanction.90 But as Bavarian casualties before Nancy mounted dramatically, the chief of the General Staff rescinded his approval. Wilhelm and his chief of staff, Konstantin Schmidt von Knobelsdorf, took the matter to Chief of Operations Tappen and again threatened to seek an imperial ruling.

	Moltke relented. At 2 AM on a cold and rainy 10 September, almost one hundred thousand Landser, with rifles unloaded and bayonets fixed, stormed French positions around Vaux-Marie, north of Sainte-Menehould.


Wilhelm wants to do a bayonette charge but Moltke is pussying out as usual. Tappen threatens to get the Kaiser to yell at him and Moltke pussies-out again and gives the go-ahead.


	The charge, like that of George Pickett at Gettysburg in July 1863, was shattered by enemy artillery.


It fails. Moltke sucks. Moltke is the WW1 version of Donald Trump.


	...Near the end of that savage butchery, at around 9 AM, Lieutenant Colonel Hentsch arrived at Varennes on the return leg of his tour of the front. Arguing that Second Army had been reduced to “cinders,”


meanwhile, Hertsch still wants everyone to know that the 2nd army is "cinders"


	that the enemy had driven a wedge between German First and Second armies, and that a full withdrawal was under way, he ordered Fifth Army to fall back to the line Sainte-Menehould–Clermont. Crown Prince Wilhelm and Schmidt von Kobelsdorff vehemently refused to obey the order and demanded such written instruction from Wilhelm II or Moltke.


why couldn't Kluck do that?


	...If the word cinders (Schlacke) applied to anyone, it was to Third Army, which had lost 14,987 men in the first ten days of September.98 There was nothing to fall back on, as Dresden had already sent out all available reserves—111 officers, 351 noncommissioned officers, 4,050 ranks, and 330 horses.99 Incredibly, Hausen stated that Third Army, stretched across a forty-kilometer front, could hold its position until the new offensive with Seventh Army commenced.


Hausen has a new idea

it's terrible


	...Sometime before 1 PM, Moltke arrived at Fourth Army headquarters at Courtisols. The mood there was “confident.”


hah


	...His chief of staff, General Walther von Lüwitz, lectured Moltke that a major withdrawal would have a decimating “moral effect” on the troops.


Moltke seems to be bad at this


	Then the proverbial bolt from the blue: Just as Tappen was drafting orders for Fifth, Fourth, and Third armies to maintain their positions, his staff overheard a relayed radio message from Bülow at Second Army headquarters to the OHL. “Enemy appears to want to direct his main offensive against the right flank and center of Third Army” in an obvious attempt to break through at Vitry-le-François.102 A “deeply shaken” Moltke saw no reason to doubt Bülow. The only countermeasure was to withdraw the entire German center to the line Suippes–Sainte-Menehould


so they could have stopped the retreat that Bulow initiated, and were drafting orders for the 3rd-5th armies to stay, then Bulow comes out of nowhere that the enemy "appears to want" to make an offensive. Moltke is "deeply shaken." He orders all of his armies to retreat.


	...Thus, a Major Hasse on Third Army’s staff confirmed Bülow’s dire prognosis: Foch’s Ninth Army was threatening the entire front of Third Army. No sooner had Hasse completed his briefing than Third Army’s radio operators intercepted a call from Duke Albrecht’s Fourth Army to the OHL: “Strong enemy forces marching against Vitry-le-François and Maisons-en-Champagne.”103 There was not a moment to lose. At 1:30 PM, Moltke made what he later called “the hardest decision of my life, [one] which made my heart bleed,”104 the general order to retreat in echelon. He instructed Second Army to fall back to Thuizy (southeast of Reims), Third Army to the line Thuizy-Suippes, Fourth Army to Suippes–Sainte-Menehould, and Fifth Army to east of Sainte-Menehould. This would essentially become the stationary trench line of the Western Front.


There were major armies advancing on the 3rd army. Should look back at what Herwig says, but it looks like this wouldn't have beens so bad if the 2nd and 1st armies hadn't started retreating earlier. Moltke makes "the hardest decision of his life" and orders them all to retreat to the line where they fight in trench warfare for the next three years.


	...Moltke declined to motor on to First Army. Perhaps finally acknowledging the lack of leadership on the German right wing, he placed Heeringen’s new Seventh Army at Saint-Quentin under his most senior army commander—Karl von Bülow.


why does he keep putting Bulow in charge of anything? what's his problem?


	Moltke returned to his headquarters in the Hôtel de Cologne at Luxembourg in a driving downpour around 2 AM on 12 September. His first order was to relieve the severely ill Max von Hausen of command of Third Army. He next briefed Wilhelm II on his tour of the front. According to Hans von Plessen, chief of Imperial Headquarters, the kaiser became enraged, “slammed his fist on the table and forbade any further retreat.”107 Moltke then went to bed, where he was comforted by several of his staff officers—and by his wife, Eliza.


Herwig knows

it has to be

he starts off lamenting the horrible nazi "myths" about ww1, just like Sally Marks does. Then he proceeds to prove that not only are the "myths" wrong, things are even worse then anyone thought.

He's trolling them. He knows there are historians spewing bullshit. He knows they use the argument that anything that could possibly show the "stab in the back myth" true or that the German army could have won will be shot down as "German propagada" by them. So he goes ahead and agrees with him, says "yup that's german propaganda" while destroying all of their arguments.


	In a belated bid to reverse what they considered to be the rapidly escalating disaster occasioned by Moltke’s order to retreat, Deputy Chief of Staff von Stein and Chief of Operations Tappen set off early in the morning of 13 September on a tour of army headquarters. At Montmédy, they came across Dommes, returning from Fourth and Fifth armies. The trio quickly agreed on a last-ditch effort to save the German campaign paign in the west: They would plug the still-twenty-kilometer-wide gap between First and Second armies by withdrawing one army corps each from Third, Fourth, and Fifth armies. They informed Wilhelm II of their plans by telegraph at 8 PM. There is no record of the kaiser’s response.


von Stein and Tappen decide to peel some troops off 3rd 4th and 5th to fill the gap. Why couldn't Moltke do that...


	General von Einem, until then commander of VII Corps and now head of Saxon Third Army, offered up XII Corps and Duke Albrecht’s XVIII Corps from Fourth Army. Chief of Staff Schmidt von Knobelsdorf of Fifth Army grudgingly agreed to release VI Corps—which was, in fact, fighting with Albrecht’s Fourth Army. Even then, he did so only on condition that it first be given a day of rest and not be subjected to “long marches.” Bülow, when informed of the plan, believed it might effect at least a “much desired moral success.”


or why couldn't Bulow, for that matter


	Whether the three corps’ exhausted men and horses could even have made the 100-to-150-kilometer march must remain an open question, as must their possible deployment once there, for the fronts were rapidly moving during the German retreat from the Marne. Whatever the case, by the time Stein, Tappen, and Dommes returned to Luxembourg “frozen through and through” at 5:15 AM on 15 September, events there had overtaken their plan.


by then it was too late.


	For on 14 September, Chief of the Military Cabinet von Lyncker had informed Wilhelm II that “Moltke’s nerves are at an end and [he] is no longer able to conduct operations.”109 The kaiser had agreed and in what has been depicted as “a terrible scene” had ordered Moltke to step down on grounds of “ill health.”110 Deputy Chief of Staff von Stein, in Moltke’s words, was also “sacrificed.”111 The decision took Moltke completely by surprise. “I refuse to do this! I AM not sick. If H[is] M[ajesty] is unhappy with the conduct of operations, then I will go!”


Motlke whines and refuses to step down at first after Kaiser sacks him.

	
	But in the end he accepted what he twice called his “martyrdom” to spare both his Supreme War Lord and the nation embarrassment.


wtf is wrong with this guy


	Prussian war minister von Falkenhayn was to succeed Moltke, but the change in command would not be made public until 20 January 1915 to conceal the defeat at the Marne. Indeed, when Falkenhayn on 28 September requested that the Foreign Office publish a General Staff report on the debacle at the Marne, Chancellor Theobald von Bethmann Hollweg forbade such disclosure.


channelor Hollweg forbade the defeat at Marne from being revealed. What's interesting is that in doing this he might have also implicitly forbade the public from learning what they needed to know in order to demand a peace treaty, at least for awhile... The German government's secrecy probably made more people angry at them later.


	On 11 September, Einem, en route to taking over Third Army, by chance had come across Moltke at Reims. “I met a totally broken and disconcerted man.” Incredibly, Moltke began the conversation by asking Einem, “My God, how could this possibly have happened?” Einem lost his composure. “You yourself ought to know the answer to that best of all! How could you ever have remained at Luxembourg and allowed the reins of leadership totally to slip from your hands?” Moltke was taken aback. “But, dear Einem, I could not possibly have dragged the Kaiser through half of France during our advance!” Einem’s “harsh” reply was meant to cut to the quick. “Why not? The Kaiser most likely would not have had anything against it. And if your Great Uncle could square it with his sense of responsibility to take his King right onto the battlefields of Königgrätz [1866] and Sedan [1870], you and the Kaiser could at least have come sufficiently close to the front to keep the reins in your hands.”115 For Moltke, the war thus ended as it had begun—with a brutal, negative comparison to his uncle, the Elder Moltke.


Moltke "totally broken" by 11 September. Moltke asks Einem "how could this have possibly have happened" which is weird since knowing that was Moltke's job. Motlke's excuse for staying at Luexmbourg and allowing the "reigns of leadership" to slip was that he didn't want to "drag the Kaisher through have of France" during the advance (why not?).


	To the German soldiers at the sharp end of the stick, the order to retreat seemed grotesque. They did not feel like a beaten army. Georg Wichura, whose 5th ID for days had valiantly held up the advance of the BEF and the French cavalry corps between Monbertoin and Montreuil-aux-Lions, was “decimated” by the order. The “mood swing” among his men was “terrible, everywhere confused looks.” “A thousand serious thoughts went through their heads,” the division’s diary noted. “Legs like lead. Silent and exhausted, as if in a trance, the column plods on ahead.”116 Similar reactions were noted at Third Army. The order to retreat arrived like a “bolt of thunder” at 133d RIR. Its commander, Lieutenant Colonel Schmidt, recalled, “I saw many men cry, the tears rolled down their cheeks; others simply expressed amazement.” Lieutenant Colonel Wilke of 178th IR noted “understandable shrugging of shoulders, sad shaking of heads. … Finally, it all turned into a dumbfounded silence filled with ominous anticipation.”117 The general feeling among the Saxon troops was that “it was not our fault, we stood our ground.”


soldiers confused, crestfallen by order to retreat

some officers defy order and others consider insubordination


	...For four days, Joffre’s armies fought a bloody battle of pursuit against dogged German rear guards over fields littered with the stinking remains of men and beasts, broken war equipment, burning villages, and streams of refugees. But the legs of the French infantry were as tired as those of the German, and slowly the enemy slipped out of Joffre’s grasp.


Joffre's forces didn't catch up with the retreating forces


	...By 13–14 September, the erstwhile German pivot wing, reinforced by the new Seventh Army from Saint-Quentin, had dug in on the commanding heights along the northern bank of the Aisne River. On 13 September, Maunoury informed Joffre that Sixth Army, “which has not had a day of rest in about fifteen days, very much needs 24 hours rest.”127 Franchet d’Espèrey the next day refused to obey Joffre’s order to mount a major offensive northward toward Berry-au-Bac, Gernicourt, and Neufchâtel. “It is not rear guards that are in front of us,” he testily lectured the generalissimo, “but an organized [defensive] position.”128 Even the feisty Foch informed GQG the next day that Ninth Army was meeting “great resistance” along its “entire front.”


Instead of pursing them and finishing the battle, they let them dig in. I guess this is how trench warfare started.


	The Battle of the Marne did not end the war. But if it was “tactically indecisive,” in the words of historian Hew Strachan, “strategically and operationally” it was a “truly decisive battle in the Napoleonic sense.”


the battle was "decisive" in that it decidedly shifted the war into something that could go on indefinitely


	...Germany had failed to achieve the victory promised in the Schlieffen-Moltke deployment plan; it now faced a two-front war of incalculable duration against overwhelming odds. A new school of German military historians5 goes so far as to suggest that Germany had lost the Great War by September 1914.


should look into why Germany kept fighting the war after this


	Still, “what if?” scenarios abound. What if Germany had not violated Belgium’s neutrality; would Britain still have entered the war? What if Helmuth von Moltke had not sought a double envelopment of the enemy in Alsace-Lorraine and in northern France; could at least half of the 331,000 soldiers on the left wing have helped the right wing to victory? What if he had not sent III and IX army corps to the east; could one of those have filled the famous gap between Second and First armies on the Marne, and the other helped Third Army break French Ninth Army’s fragile front at the Saint-Gond Marshes? What if the commanders of German First and Second armies had simply refused to follow Lieutenant Colonel Richard Hentsch’s “recommendation” to retreat from the Marne; could German First and Second armies have held on the Ourcq and Marne rivers, with possibly war-ending results?


Each of these "what if's" has some odd circumstances surrounding the decision. It's a small wonder "stab in the back" myths appeared after this.


	The campaign in the west in 1914 revealed two distinct command styles. Moltke was content to remain at Army Supreme Command headquarters far removed from the front—first in Koblenz and then in Luxembourg—and to give his field commanders great latitude in interpreting his General Directives. He chose not to exercise close control over them by way of telephones, automobiles, aircraft, or General Staff officers. After all, they had conducted the great annual prewar maneuvers and war games and as such could be counted on to execute his “thoughts.” Already, in peacetime, Moltke had let it be known that it sufficed for “Commanding Generals” simply to be “informed about the intentions of the High Command,” and that this could easily be accomplished “orally through the sending of an officer from the Headquarters.”13 The reality of war proved otherwise. Some commanders failed the ultimate test, war, mainly because of a lack of competence (Max von Hausen); some partly because of advanced age (Karl von Bülow); and others partly because of ill health (Helmuth von Moltke, Otto von Lauenstein).


Moltke said earlier he thinks that commanders just need to tell their generals the intentions of high command and let their generals do the rest. But, this didn't work.

Bulow and Kluck went on to command German armies until 1915.


	...[Joffre] never regretted his sometimes unjustified firings. He declined after the war to engage the “victims” in a war of memoirs.


interesting--maybe who he decided to keep and fire could say something about him?


	...To be sure, some historians have suggested that Chancellor Theobald von Bethmann Hollweg’s infamous “war-aims program”* of 9 September, at the very height of the struggle at the Marne, committed Germany to push on to victory regardless of the cost.36 


What is this? did Holwegg do anything to prolong the war after Marne?


	there were those at Imperial Headquarters who fully understood that the time had come in the fall of 1914 to end the Great Folly. Field Marshal Gottlieb von Haeseler, activated for field duty at the tender age of seventy-eight, advised Wilhelm II to sheath the sword. “It seems to me that the moment has come which we must try to end the war.”37 The kaiser refused the advice. Moltke’s successor, Erich von Falkenhayn, by 19 November had reached the same conclusion as Haeseler before him. Victory lay beyond reach. It would be “impossible,” he lectured Bethmann Hollweg, to “beat” the Allied armies “to such a point where we can come to a decent peace.” By continuing the war, Germany “would run the danger of slowly exhausting ourselves.”38 The chancellor rejected the counsel.


von Haeselr and von Falkenhayn advise the Kaiser and Hollweg to end the war, but each refuse.


	It began at the Marne in 1914. It ended at Versailles in 1919. In between, about sixty million young men had been mobilized, ten million killed, and twenty million wounded. With the 20/20 vision of hindsight, the great tragedy of the Marne is that it was strategically indecisive. Had German First Army destroyed French Sixth Army east of Paris; had French Fifth Army and the BEF driven through the gap between German First and Second armies expeditiously; had French Fifth Army pursued German Second Army more energetically beyond the Marne; then perhaps the world would have been spared the greater catastrophe that was to follow in 1939–45.


If they had actually fought it out to the end, the war might have ended quickly. Moltke's cowardice helped slaughter millions.


------

So who was trying to influence Moltke and what were they up to?


Apparently, Steiner was an influence on Moltke


what was Moltke's deal? did he really believe in "anthroposolgy"?


his actions at Marne are inexcusable. Did he know what he was doing, or was he out of his mind?


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Anthroposophical_Society

these guys are still around


http://www.test.uucollegium.org/a-new-collection-of-primary-sources-for-unitarian-universalist-history/
	“A New Collection of Primary Sources for Unitarian Universalist History”

	...Dan McKanan holds the Emerson chair at Harvard Divinity School, where he has taught since 2008. He is the author of Prophetic Encounters: Religion and the American Radical Tradition and three other books on religion and social change in the United States. Currently he is researching the ways anthroposophy and other esoteric spiritualities can inspire work for economic cooperation and ecological harmony.


maybe there's something here?


https://anthroposophynashville.org/
	The Nashville Rudolf Steiner Group will meet the first and third Tuesdays of the month evenings at 7 pm at the First Unitarian Universalist Church of Nashville, 1808 Woodmont Blvd., Nashville, Tennessee 37215.  This group is reading Spiritual Beings in the Heavenly Bodies and in the Kingdom of Nature -Rudolf Steiner .


maybe a link, not sure how strong it is


http://humansarefree.com/2015/09/the-dawn-of-aquarius-new-people-new.html
	The current turmoil and conflict unleashed on the planet by the United States and Britain is only the beginning of the climax of a struggle between cosmic influences of which most people are completely unaware. Today, America and Britain embody atrophied and degraded Piscean energies. 

	...Alice A. Bailey, who is credited by many as the founder of the contemporary New Age movement, saw a unique role for Russia in ushering in the new era. Writing at a time when Russia was firmly behind the communist iron curtain, she predicted:

    Behind the closed borders of that mysterious and magnificent country [Russia], a great and spiritual conflict is proceeding, and the rare mystical spirit and the truly religious orientation of the people is the eternal guarantee that a true and living religion and culture will finally emerge.

	Rudolf Steiner (1861-1925), who established the Anthroposophical society, believed the Slavic “folk soul” would play a major role in the future development of a new humanity. He saw the Slavs as a bridge between the Orient (East) and the Occident (West).

	According to Steiner, the religious thought of the Orient belongs to the past; the Occident’s philosophical-scientific thought to the present; the Slavic soul will bridge the two and create a pathway to a spiritual future.

	More than any other national soul, claimed Steiner, the Russian group soul strives to realise the world of the spirit. In Russia the synthesis of the highest features of both Eastern and Western cultures would one day be achieved.

    	“Its geographic location places Russia between two extreme, monolithic cultures – between the materialist countries of the West and the passive, world-denying countries of the East. It is appropriate that Russia creatively unite these extremes,” wrote Nikolai Belotsvetov, one of Steiner’s leading Russian followers.

    	“Our country is a peculiar country, placed between the hammer of Europe and the anvil of Asia, destined to reconcile them in one way or another,” wrote the world famous chemist Dmitri Mendeleev. “It is my deep conviction that Russia is called to allay the age-old hostility between Europe and Asia, to reconcile and unite those two different worlds, and find a proper balance between the progressive but proud and inconsequent individualism of Europe and the sense of social and political cohesion of Asia…”


Steiner and "anthroposophology" shows up a bit in Russian propaganda sites too


https://books.google.com/books?id=p4NJbN1BDzoC&pg=PA155&lpg=PA155
	...only a year after the Bolsheviks came to power in Russia, Rudolf Steiner indicated 'that in them [Lenin and Trotksy]' the greatest, most intense enemies of the spiritual evolution of mankind could be seen', in whom 'there lives ... hatred for the supersensible, even if this comes to epxression ... in other words'


	Subsequently, as he gzed ever deeper into the Russian tragedy, Rudolf Stiener in 1919 came to pronounce and even sterner sentence. He called Lenin 'the hangman' and 'grave-digger of all spiritual life', in whom was manifested the aspirations towards 'wild destruction of everything of a spiritual nature.'


Steiner says Lenin, Bolshevisk are an enemy of "spiritual nature."

makes me wonder if Steiner's idea had any connection to Nazism? Nazism had a hint of mysticism as well as a heap of anti-bolshevism


https://spiritualityisnoexcuse.wordpress.com/2015/08/24/rudolf-steiner-racism-nazis-why-anthroposophy-doesnt-grow-up/

Steiner had a bunch of schools in Germany, but the Nazis closed them, although some Nazis wanted to keep them open. Author also says Anthroposhologoly is racist.

	And why wasn’t I told that although Himmler didn’t like the schools, he did like Biodynamic agriculture? Even more importantly there was a Biodynamic farm at Dachau concentration camp. Weleda, (the Anthroposophical company well known today for cosmetics), provided doctors at Dachau with chemical supplies for experiments on prisoners. But I never heard anything about that when I was told about the closing of the schools.


some weird shit going on with Steiner


	Sadly, Anthroposophy is largely based on the idea of a hierarchy of races. This is of course inherently and inevitably racist. It is the kind of ideology that has been utterly smashed to pieces by modern genetics. There may be a biological meaning for the term “race”, but there is no biological basis for constructing any kind of evolutionary racial hierarchy.

	Anthroposophy, however, teaches that there is a spiritual basis for such a hierarchy. And guess which race is at the top…. And guess which spiritual movement is at the top of the top! Correct.


said Germans were spiritually superior?


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rudolf_Steiner#Reception
	Towards the end of Steiner's life and after his death, there were massive defamatory press attacks mounted on him by early National Socialist leaders (including Adolf Hitler) and other right-wing nationalists. These criticized Steiner's thought and anthroposophy as being incompatible with National Socialist racial ideology, and charged him of being influenced by his close connections with Jews and even that he himself was Jewish.


on the other hand, this says a lot of Steiner's critics were Nazis



------


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=de&u=http://nodrm.hgv-online.de/nodrm/fulfillment%3Fdistributor%3Dwuh%26orderid%3Dvr_ipabo_66.249.64.190_2016-09-01_00-40-11%26resid%3D10_3244_2191-995X_2014_3_1E_145%26auth%3DO2xLVEXWcbWM%252BtT7z84%252F%252BwvcVKc%253D&prev=search
	Was the withdrawal order correct? The German troops were not
just before a victory? After the war the secret between Moltke
and Steiner, wild speculation and conspira-
Theory of the Round: Stand Moltke Influence? Steiner had him with him
magic and occult techniques? Was Moltke on Geisterseher, who placed himself unobserved at the head of the German army
had to lead the troops into the doom? 

	Erich Ludendorff, for many years a close colleague of Moltke in the General-
stab, belonged to those who after warfare, when it came to the question of guilt
and the reworking of the defeat went, targeted rumors about Moltke
He spoke of "abuse of souls," the "occult spell," and "
already early recognizable pacifist inclinations 1 of his boss. Ludendorff
apparently assumed that Steiner had been an opponent of the war, who had been with him
and internationalist ideas, the General Staff
have been.


after the war, Ludendorff (and others?) ask if Moltke was a in with the occult or a pacifist internationalist


------

https://archive.org/details/LudendorffErich-DasMarne-drama-DerFallMoltke-hentsch

here is Ludendorff's little book on the "Marne Drama"

worth reading, cross-check against Herwig. Get some insight into Ludendorff too

however, the OCR is terrible

doesn't look like anything online besdies the pdf in German